OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET
Budget
of the U.S.
Government
FISCAL YEAR 2023
OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET
Budget
of the U.S.
Government
FISCAL YEAR 2023
Budget of the United States Government,
Fiscal Year 2023 contains the Budget Message of the
President, information on the President’s priorities,
and summary tables.
Analytical Perspectives, Budget of the United
States Government, Fiscal Year 2023 contains analyses that are designed to highlight specified subject
areas or provide other significant presentations of
budget data that place the budget in perspective.
This volume includes economic and accounting analyses, information on Federal receipts and collections,
analyses of Federal spending, information on Federal
borrowing and debt, baseline or current services estimates, and other technical presentations.
Supplemental tables and other materials
that are part of the Analytical Perspectives volume are available at https://whitehouse.gov/omb/
analytical-perspectives/.
Appendix, Budget of the United States
Government, Fiscal Year 2023 contains detailed information on the various appropriations and funds
that constitute the budget and is designed primarily
for the use of the Appropriations Committees. The
Appendix contains more detailed financial information on individual programs and appropriation accounts than any of the other budget documents. It
includes for each agency: the proposed text of appropriations language; budget schedules for each account; legislative proposals; narrative explanations
of each budget account; and proposed general provisions applicable to the appropriations of entire agencies or group of agencies. Information is also provided on certain activities whose transactions are not
part of the budget totals.
BUDGET INFORMATION AVAILABLE ONLINE
The President’s Budget and supporting materials are available online at https://whitehouse.gov/
omb/budget/. This link includes electronic versions
of all the budget volumes, supplemental materials
that are part of the Analytical Perspectives volume,
spreadsheets of many of the budget tables, and a
public use budget database. This link also includes
Historical Tables that provide data on budget receipts, outlays, surpluses or deficits, Federal debt,
and Federal employment over an extended time period, generally from 1940 or earlier to 2027. Also
available are links to documents and materials from
budgets of prior years.
For more information on access to electronic versions of the budget documents, call (202) 512-1530
in the D.C. area or toll-free (888) 293-6498. To purchase the printed documents call (202) 512-1800.
THE BUDGET DOCUMENTS
F ro as le t yb eh S epu ri tn e edn tn fo D co mu e tn S.U ,s G . evo r emn tn P Office I tn er en t: tskoob ro e P vog.opg. enoh : lot l f ree ( )668 -215 ;0081 D C a re ( a )202 -215 0081
Fa :x ( )202 -215 aM 4012 il: I potS DCC W , ihsa tgn no D , C -20402 1000
ublishing
ISBN 978-0-16-095232-6
6-095232-6
95232690000
U.S. GOVERNMENT PUBLISHING OFFICE, WASHINGTON 2022
GENERAL NOTES
1. All years referenced for budget data are fiscal years unless otherwise noted. All years referenced for economic
data are calendar years unless otherwise noted.
2. At the time the Budget was prepared, none of the full-year appropriations bills for 2022 have been enacted,
therefore, the programs and activities normally provided for in the full-year appropriations bills were operating under a continuing resolution (Public Law 117-43, division A, as amended by Public Law 117-70, division
A; Public Law 117-86, division A; and Public Law 117-95). References to 2022 spending in the text and tables
reflect the levels provided by the continuing resolution and, if applicable, the following Public Laws which
provided additional appropriations to certain accounts in 2022—
• The Disaster Relief Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2022 (Public Law 117-43, division B);
• The Afghanistan Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2022 (Public Law 117-43, division C);
• The Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Appropriations Act (Public Law 117-58, division J); and
• The Additional Afghanistan Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2022 (Public Law 117-70, division B).
3. The estimates in the 2023 Budget do not reflect the effects of the Ukraine Supplemental Appropriations Act,
2022 (included in Public Law 117-103) due to the late date of enactment.
4. Detail in this document may not add to the totals due to rounding.
Table of Contents
The Budget Message of the President ................................................................................................1
Confronting Urgent Crises and Delivering Historic Progress ....................................................3
Building a Better America ..................................................................................................................13
Ensuring an Equitable, Effective, and Accountable Government
that Delivers Results for All ......................................................................................................37
Department of Agriculture .................................................................................................................45
Department of Commerce ...................................................................................................................49
Department of Defense ........................................................................................................................53
Department of Education ...................................................................................................................57
Department of Energy .........................................................................................................................61
Department of Health and Human Services ..................................................................................65
Department of Homeland Security ...................................................................................................71
Department of Housing and Urban Development ........................................................................73
Department of the Interior .................................................................................................................77
Department of Justice .........................................................................................................................81
Department of Labor ............................................................................................................................85
Department of State and Other International Programs ...........................................................89
Department of Transportation ..........................................................................................................93
Department of the Treasury ...............................................................................................................97
Department of Veterans Affairs .........................................................................................................99
Corps of Engineers—Civil Works ....................................................................................................103
Environmental Protection Agency .................................................................................................105
National Aeronautics and Space Administration .......................................................................109
National Science Foundation ...........................................................................................................111
Small Business Administration .......................................................................................................113
Social Security Administration .......................................................................................................115
Summary Tables ..................................................................................................................................117
OMB Contributors to the 2023 Budget ...........................................................................................145
Page

1
There is no greater testament to the grit and resilience of the American people than the extraordinary progress we have made together over the last year.
America entered 2021 in the midst of a devastating health crisis, on the heels of the worst economic
crisis since the Great Depression. We ended 2021 having created over 6.5 million new jobs, the most
our Nation has ever recorded in a single year. Our economy grew at a rate of 5.7 percent, the strongest growth in nearly 40 years. As of February, the unemployment rate has fallen from 6.4 percent
when I took office to 3.8 percent—the fastest decline in recorded history. We are bringing everyone
along, and leaving no one behind; child poverty is projected to reach the lowest level ever recorded,
while long-term unemployment, youth unemployment, and Black and Hispanic unemployment have
all dropped at record rates. Though family budgets are still tight, millions more Americans are earning paychecks today—and families have more money in their pockets than they did a year ago.
This progress was no accident. It was a direct result of the new economic vision for America I ran
on—to build our economy from the bottom up and the middle out.
That vision was reflected in the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, which lifted our Nation out of
crisis; fueled our efforts to vaccinate America and combat the COVID-19 pandemic globally; enabled
small businesses and State and local governments to hire, rehire, and retain workers; and delivered
immediate economic relief to tens of millions of Americans—to put food on their tables, keep a roof
over their heads, enable them to work by keeping schools and child care providers open, and maintain their dignity in the face of the pandemic.
That vision was also reflected in the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law—the most sweeping investment to rebuild America in history. After years of merely talking about fixing our infrastructure, we
brought together Democrats and Republicans to finally get it done. Already, that law is paving the
way for better jobs for millions of Americans—modernizing roads, bridges, ports, and airports; building a national network of charging stations, so America can own the electric car market; replacing
lead pipes across the Nation, so every child can drink clean water at home and at school; providing
affordable high-speed internet for every American; and strengthening our resilience to withstand
both cyber and physical threats, including the devastating effects of the climate crisis.
There have been challenges as we have recovered from the COVID-19 pandemic. Due to the speed
of our recovery, businesses have had a hard time hiring workers quickly enough to keep pace with
resurgent demand. Disruptions to global supply chains have also contributed to higher prices. As
a result, America was not immune to the worldwide inflation that has followed the pandemic—leaving too many families struggling to keep up with their bills. Since January, that pain has also been
compounded by the anticipation and aftermath of Vladimir Putin’s invasion of Ukraine—from the
time he began amassing troops on Ukraine’s borders, triggering a response in global oil markets, the
price of a gallon of gas has risen by more than a dollar here at home as of mid-March.
Today, however, as a result of the new economic vision we are building our economy around, we
are well-positioned to meet the challenges and seize the opportunities of this decisive decade. We
are competing with China from a position of strength, while leading a global coalition united in
THE BUDGET MESSAGE OF THE PRESIDENT
To the Congress of the United States:
2 The Budget Message of the President
condemnation of Russian aggression against Ukraine. We are tackling the climate crisis with urgency, strengthening the global health architecture to combat COVID-19 and future pandemics, and
enhancing cybersecurity and addressing emerging cyber threats. We are joining with allies and partners to write the rules of 21st Century economics, trade, and technology.
My Budget details the next steps forward on our journey to execute a new economic vision, reduce
costs for families, reduce the deficit, and build a better America. It is a Budget anchored in my bedrock belief that America is at its best when we invest in the backbone of our Nation: the hardworking
people in every community who make our Nation run.
My Budget lays out detailed investments to build on a record-breaking year of broad-based, inclusive growth—and meet the challenges of the 21st Century. It is a call to reduce costs for families’
biggest expenses; grow, educate, and invest in our workforce; bolster our public health infrastructure;
save lives by investing in strategies such as community policing and community violence interventions, strategies proven to reduce gun crime; and advance equity, environmental justice, and opportunity for all Americans.
As I discussed in my 2022 State of the Union Address, my Budget also reflects a bipartisan unity
agenda—areas where we can all come together to make progress. That includes investments to help
beat the opioid epidemic; take on the invisible costs of the mental health crisis, especially among our
children; support our veterans; and end cancer as we know it. My super-charged Cancer Moonshot
plan has a goal of cutting cancer death rates by at least 50 percent over the next 25 years—while my
vision for ARPA-H, the Advanced Research Projects Agency for Health, seeks breakthroughs in cancer, Alzheimer’s, diabetes, and more.
Critically, my Budget would also keep our Nation on a sound fiscal course. It fights inflation and
helps families deal with rising costs by growing our economy, making more goods in America, and lowering the costs families face. Its bold ideas are fully paid for, with tax reforms that more than offset
the cost of new investments. It fulfills my ironclad promise that no one earning less than $400,000
per year would pay an additional penny in new taxes—while ensuring that the wealthiest Americans
and the biggest corporations begin to pay their fair share. It keeps us on track to reduce the deficit
this year to less than half of what it was before I took office.
After a year of historic progress, I am more optimistic about America today than I have ever been.
We are on a path to win the competition for the 21st Century. We are prepared once again to turn a
moment of crisis into a breathtaking opportunity. We are stronger today than we were a year ago—
and we will be stronger a year from now than we are today.
All we have to do is keep coming together—to keep building, keep giving working families a fighting
chance, and keep expanding the possibilities of our Nation. That is what my Budget is all about, and
I look forward to working together to keep delivering for the American people.
JOSEPH R. BIDEN, JR.
The White House.
3
CONFRONTING URGENT CRISES AND
DELIVERING HISTORIC PROGRESS
When the President took office, the United
States was confronting overlapping crises of unprecedented scope and scale: a once-in-a-century
pandemic; a sharp economic downturn; an accelerating climate crisis; and a legacy of persistent
inequity. On day one of his Administration, the
President immediately got to work leveraging
every tool at his disposal to tackle these crises
head-on—mobilizing the Nation around an ambitious agenda to deliver results for working
families. Under the President’s leadership—and
thanks to the grit and resilience of the American
people in the face of significant challenges—
America has made historic progress.
POWERING A HISTORIC ECONOMIC RESURGENCE
When the President took office, he faced an
economy that was struggling to recover from
the most severe downturn since the Great
Depression. The unemployment rate stood at
6.4 percent, with 10 million Americans unable
to find a job. Factoring in workers who dropped
out of the labor force or couldn’t find full-time
work, the unemployment rate was closer to 11
percent. Between February 2020 and January
2021, the labor force participation rate for women dropped by 3.7 percent overall, 6.4 percent
for Black women, and 7.1 percent for Hispanic
women, undoing more than 35 years of progress
in labor force participation. More than 18 million Americans were receiving unemployment
benefits, and more than half of the unemployed
had been without a job for more than 15 weeks.
Thousands of small businesses—the backbone
of the American economy—were forced to close
their doors, some permanently. Millions of
Americans reported that they were struggling to
pay their rent or mortgage, put food on the table,
and cover basic expenses.
In the face of these challenges, the President
took decisive action—not only to put a floor under the immediate economic fallout, but to begin
rebuilding the economy from the bottom-up and
the middle-out. The President’s strategy helped
rescue the economy, delivered urgently needed
relief to families and small businesses, fueled
record-breaking economic growth and job creation, and bolstered American competitiveness
and manufacturing.
Fueling Record-Breaking Economic
Growth and Job Creation
Thanks to the American Rescue Plan Act of
2021 (American Rescue Plan) and the President’s
vaccination program, the American economy is
recovering faster than other advanced economies around the world, with record-breaking
economic growth and job creation. In 2021, the
Administration achieved the best record of job
creation in American history, with the single
largest calendar year decrease in the unemployment rate on record. As of February 2022, the
unemployment rate had fallen to 3.8 percent.
Prior to passage of the American Rescue Plan,
the Congressional Budget Office did not project
the unemployment rate dropping to 3.8 percent
at any point over this entire decade. Since the
4 Confronting Urgent Crises and Delivering Historic Progress
President took office, the economy has created
7.4 million jobs. The number of long-term unemployed Americans decreased by two million during the President’s first year in office—a record
decline. More than 1.6 million women have reentered the workforce.
As more Americans have gotten back to work,
the economy has come roaring back to life. In
2021, the American economy grew at 5.7 percent,
the fastest rate in nearly four decades. For the
first time in 20 years, the economy grew faster
than China’s. Applications for new small businesses increased 30 percent since before the pandemic. Retail sales rose by $90 billion. Between
the American Rescue Plan’s tax cuts for families
that are raising children and rising wages for middle class families, the average American had more
money in their pocket each month in 2021 than
they did in 2020—after accounting for inflation.
Strengthening Supply Chains,
Promoting Competition, and
Bolstering Manufacturing
To sustain and build on this economic momentum, the President has taken aggressive actions
to address other global challenges triggered by
the COVID-19 pandemic and expand the productive capacity of the economy—strengthening domestic supply chains, promoting competition and
innovation to help lower prices, and bolstering
American manufacturing.
In the face of global supply chain bottlenecks
and global inflation, last year the President issued
an Executive Order 14017, “America’s Supply
Chains,” to strengthen the Nation’s supply chains
and launched the Supply Chain Disruptions
Task Force to address disruptions linked to the
COVID-19 pandemic. Thanks to those efforts,
more cargo is moving through American ports
than at any time in the Nation’s history. The
number of containers sitting on the docks at
the Ports of Los Angeles and Long Beach—two
of the largest ports in America—for more than
eight days has been cut by more than 70 percent
since the beginning of November 2021. Holiday
sales surged 14 percent last year—a new record.
Despite dire predictions about delivery delays
at the end of last year, holiday season delivery
times dropped below their pre-pandemic levels,
while retail inventories hit an all-time record.
In addition, the Administration’s Action Plan for
America’s Ports and Waterways and Trucking
Action Plan to Strengthen America’s Trucking
Workforce continue to help American port operators move a record amount of goods from ships to
shelves as quickly as possible and connect more
Americans to good jobs in the trucking industry.
The President has also taken key steps to promote greater competition, protect consumers, and
lower prices. In July 2021, the President signed
a historic Executive Order 14036, “Promoting
Competition in the American Economy,” to encourage competition across industries, including travel, healthcare, food, internet service, and
more. Executive Order 14036 includes 72 initiatives by more than a dozen Federal agencies to
promptly tackle some of the most pressing competition problems across the economy. In the
months since, the Administration has worked to
lower prices for hearing aids and has taken on
meat processors that are raking in record profits while raising prices for consumers at the grocery store. Also, enforcement agencies like the
Federal Trade Commission and the Department
of Justice (DOJ) have taken strong actions to protect consumers from anti-competitive mergers
that could have raised prices for consumers and
businesses.
The President has also relentlessly focused on
implementing an industrial strategy to revitalize
America’s manufacturing base. During his first
week in office, the President signed Executive
Order 14005, “Ensuring the Future is Made in
All of America by All of America’s Workers,” that
created the first-ever Made in America Office
within the Office of Management and Budget
and launched a Government-wide initiative to
leverage the Federal Government’s procurement
power to support American manufacturing and
American workers. To help translate that commitment into action, the President announced the
most robust changes to the Buy American Act of
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 5
1933 in more than 70 years—raising the domestic
content threshold, strengthening domestic supply
chains for critical goods, and increasing transparency and accountability. Since the President took
office, the economy has added more than 423,000
new manufacturing jobs. Manufacturing as a
share of Gross Domestic Product has returned
to pre-pandemic levels. In recent months, major
companies have announced significant investments in new manufacturing lines and factories
that will create thousands of good-paying jobs in
the United States.
MOUNTING A FORCEFUL RESPONSE TO THE PANDEMIC
In January 2021, the United States lacked the
tools to fully protect people against COVID-19.
Less than one percent of Americans—some two
million people—were fully vaccinated. Less than
half of our Nation’s schools were open for in-person instruction. Zero at-home tests were on the
market. The Nation faced shortages of protective equipment for frontline workers and didn’t
have enough vaccines, vaccinators, or locations
where people could get vaccinated. Meanwhile,
the rapid spread of the virus had disrupted the
education of millions of students, forced an estimated 1-in-4 child care providers to close their
doors, taken a significant toll on Americans’ mental health, produced a massive surge in domestic
violence incidents and overdose deaths, worsened
food and housing insecurity, and deepened longstanding health inequities in communities across
the Nation.
From the day he took office, the President
has been unrelenting in his focus on ensuring
that the American people have the tools necessary to protect themselves against COVID-19:
more vaccines, boosters, tests, masks, and treatments. Through the American Rescue Plan, the
Administration secured $160 billion to support
the President’s vaccination program, therapeutics, testing and mitigation, personal protective
equipment, and the broader COVID-19 response.
These resources have played a key role in preventing hospitalizations and deaths from COVID-19
and combatting the Delta and Omicron variants.
As a result of these efforts, the United States
is moving forward safely. As of March 2022, more
than 216 million Americans—including more
than 75 percent of adults—had been fully vaccinated. Vaccines are approved or authorized for
all Americans five years of age and older. There
are more than 90,000 vaccination locations in
communities across the Nation, with 90 percent
of Americans living within five miles of a site.
The Administration is securing millions of doses
of a highly effective pill to treat COVID-19. In
addition, the President’s focus on equity is delivering results: the latest CDC data show that
gaps in vaccination rates among Latino, Black,
and White adults have been effectively closed.
After a year of children falling behind on learning, the President took action to open schools and
get kids and teachers back into their classrooms.
The American Rescue Plan provided $130 billion
to schools to allow for their safe operation and
address the COVID-19 pandemic’s impacts on
learning, as well as an additional $10 billion to
support COVID-19 testing. The Administration
has also ensured schools have the flexibility and
resources they need to ensure children are fed
healthy meals. As a result, about 99 percent of
schools are now open, full-time and in person—up
from just 46 percent when the President took office. This progress has been crucial to ensuring
that all students can safely be back where they
belong—learning alongside their peers—and to
helping them recover from any learning loss or
mental health setbacks they experienced since
the onset of the COVID-19 pandemic.
As the Administration combats the COVID-19
pandemic at home, the United States is also leading the international effort to respond to the
Global COVID-19 pandemic and vaccinate the
world. At the President’s direction, the United
States has committed to donating 1.2 billion vaccine doses for free with no strings attached—
the largest commitment in the world—and has
6 Confronting Urgent Crises and Delivering Historic Progress
already shipped 500 million doses to 112 countries, four times more doses than any other country. The Administration is also working to expand
access to tests, treatments, and personal protective equipment globally. These efforts are saving lives, improving our national and economic
security, and helping prevent the emergence and
spread of other dangerous variants and future
biological catastrophes like pandemics.
Delivering Urgent Relief
With the passage of the American Rescue
Plan, the Administration quickly mobilized vital
resources to help families and small businesses
weather the worst of the pandemic and create a
bridge to an economic recovery.
In 2021, the Administration delivered more
than 175 million economic impact payments of
$1,400 to the vast majority of Americans—totaling over $400 billion in relief. The American
Rescue Plan expanded the Child Tax Credit for
families of more than 61 million children, with
up to $3,600 available for families with children
under six, and $3,000 for families with children
6 to 17 years old. For the first time—and beginning just four months after the American Rescue
Plan’s passage—these payments were made on a
monthly basis, providing a reliable boost to working families to help cover essential expenses. The
American Rescue Plan also helped make quality
health insurance coverage through the Affordable
Care Act more affordable than ever—with
families saving an average of $2,400 on their annual premiums, and 4 out of 5 consumers finding
quality coverage for under $10 a month.
At the same time, the American Rescue
Plan provided funding to all 50 States and
more than 34,000 cities, towns, and counties
to help prevent layoffs and get workers back
on the job. It provided $28 billion through the
Restaurant Revitalization Fund (RRF) to help
more than 100,000 restaurants and bars keep
their doors open. The RRF was part of the more
than $450 billion in emergency relief delivered
to more than six million small businesses in
2021 through the Administration’s implementation of the Paycheck Protection Program,
COVID Economic Injury Disaster Loan (EIDL)
program, the COVID EIDL Targeted and
Supplemental Advance programs, and the
Shuttered Venue Operators Grants program.
The Administration also implemented the
Emergency Rental Assistance program, which
delivered 3.8 million payments totaling over
$33 billion to eligible households in 2021. Over
80 percent of the assistance was delivered to lowest-income households (those earning 50 percent
of area median income and below). As a result
of these efforts, the Administration has built a
nationwide infrastructure for rental assistance
and eviction prevention, helping keep eviction
filings below 60 percent of historical levels and
preventing households from experiencing further economic setbacks associated with housing
insecurity.
DELIVERING PROGRESS AT HOME
Under the President’s leadership, our Nation
has not only risen to meet urgent crises, but we
have begun building a better and more resilient
America. Since taking office, the President has
advanced an agenda to bring more dignity, opportunity, security, and prosperity to working families across the Nation—from rebuilding America’s
infrastructure and laying a new foundation for
growth, to taking historic action to combat the
climate crisis, to embedding equity as a priority
across the Federal Government.
Rebuilding America’s
Crumbling Infrastructure
After decades of talk in Washington about rebuilding our crumbling infrastructure, last year
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 7
the President worked with members of both
parties in the Congress to pass and sign into
law the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act
(Bipartisan Infrastructure Law)—a once-in-ageneration investment in our Nation’s infrastructure and competitiveness that will help build a
better America, create good-paying union jobs,
ease inflationary pressures, and grow the economy sustainably and equitably so that everyone
has the chance to get ahead for decades to come.
For the up to 10 million American households
that lack safe drinking water, the Bipartisan
Infrastructure Law invests $55 billion to deliver
clean water to all American families and eliminate the Nation’s lead service lines—including
in tribal, rural, and disadvantaged communities.
To ensure that every American has access to reliable, affordable, high-speed internet, it invests a
historic $65 billion for broadband deployment to
help lower the cost of internet service and to close
the digital divide. To fix and rebuild our roads
and bridges, it reauthorizes surface transportation programs for five years and makes the single
largest investment in repairing and reconstructing our Nation’s bridges since the construction of
the interstate highway system.
The Bipartisan Infrastructure Law also: includes crucial resources to improve transportation options for millions of Americans and reduce
greenhouse emissions through the largest investment in public transit in U.S. history; upgrades
the Nation’s airports and ports to strengthen
domestic supply chains; makes the largest investment in passenger rail since the creation of
Amtrak; builds a national network of electric vehicle chargers; makes our Nation’s infrastructure
resilient against the impacts of climate change,
cyber-attacks, and extreme weather events; and
includes more for our Nation.
In the months since the President signed the
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law into law, the
Administration has hit the ground running to
deliver results. Already, the Administration has
mobilized resources to: connect tribal Nations to
reliable, affordable high-speed internet; replace,
repair, and rehabilitate bridges across the Nation;
upgrade critical infrastructure at 3,075 airports;
update America’s aging water infrastructure,
sewerage systems, pipes and service lines; and
stop toxic waste from harming communities.
Taking Aggressive Action to
Tackle the Climate Crisis
When the President took office, he made tackling the climate crisis a central priority across the
entire Federal Government. At his direction, the
Administration has launched an unprecedented
effort to reduce climate pollution while creating
good-paying union jobs, advancing environmental justice, strengthening the Nation’s resilience,
and protecting public health.
On the first day of his Administration, the
President rejoined the Paris Agreement. The
President set an ambitious goal to reduce greenhouse gas pollution 50 to 52 percent from 2005
levels by 2030, while rallying countries around
the world to make their own bold contributions.
At the 2021 United Nations Climate Change
Conference, the President launched the U.S.
Methane Emissions Reduction Action Plan in support of the Global Methane Pledge of September
18, 2021 (Global Methane Pledge) to reduce the
world’s methane emissions 30 percent from 2020
levels by 2030. To advance the global phasedown
of hydrofluorocarbons, the President secured domestic action to reduce emissions of these super
pollutants by 85 percent within 15 years. Also,
to reward clean manufacturing in the global
marketplace, the President announced a groundbreaking commitment to negotiate the world’s
first carbon-based arrangement on steel and aluminum trade with the European Union.
The President also set a target to eliminate carbon pollution from the electricity sector by 2035
and is fast-tracking clean energy—including the
launch of the American offshore wind industry,
with the first approvals of large-scale projects on
the path to 30 gigawatts by 2030. The President’s
support for innovation and deployment of wind,
solar, storage, transmission, and more is creating
good-paying union jobs and lowering energy bills
8 Confronting Urgent Crises and Delivering Historic Progress
for consumers. To jumpstart an electric transportation future that’s Made in America, the President
brought together automakers and autoworkers
around a new ambitious goal for 50 percent electric vehicle sales share in 2030. The President also
launched a Federal Sustainability Plan to lead by
example through the Federal Government’s vehicle fleet, buildings, and purchasing power. The
President has pursued new climate-smart agriculture and forestry initiatives, protections for cherished monuments and habitats, and the America
the Beautiful initiative to conserve 30 percent of
U.S. lands and waters by 2030. Also, the President
launched whole-of-Government efforts to build
resilience to intensifying climate impacts, protect
the economy and financial systems from climaterelated financial risks, and secured emergency
funding last year to help communities recover
from disasters and related crop losses.
The President is also making good on his
Justice40 commitment to deliver 40 percent of
the benefits from Federal investments in climate
and clean energy to disadvantaged communities to build their economies. To create goodpaying union jobs in hard-hit energy communities, the President has driven Federal resources
to coal, oil and gas, and power plant communities. The President made environmental justice
and economic revitalization a centerpiece of the
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law, which includes
the largest investment in addressing legacy pollution in American history, including capping orphaned oil and gas wells that are major sources
of methane emissions and local air pollution. The
Environmental Protection Agency has committed
to cleanup and clear the backlog of 49 previously
unfunded Superfund sites and accelerate cleanup
at dozens of other sites across the Nation.
Through the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law,
the Administration also secured the largest investments ever in the Nation’s water infrastructure, power grid, public transit, and resilience.
The law will help replace lead service lines and
reduce exposure to the dangerous per- and polyfluoroalkyl chemical substances. It will make
communities safer and our infrastructure more
resilient to the impacts of climate change and
cyber-attacks, with an investment of over $50 billion to protect against droughts, heat, floods, and
wildfires, in addition to a major investment in
weatherization. It invests more than $65 billion
through the Department of Energy to upgrade
our power infrastructure, facilitate the expansion of renewables and clean energy, and fund
new programs to support the development, demonstration, and deployment of cutting-edge clean
energy technologies to accelerate our transition
to a zero-emission economy. Also, it will deliver
thousands of electric school buses nationwide,
including in rural communities, helping school
districts across the Nation buy clean, Americanmade, zero-emission buses, and replace the yellow school bus fleet for America’s children.
Advancing Equity across the
Economy and Nation
The promise of our Nation is that every
American has an equal chance to live to their full
potential. Yet persistent systemic inequities and
barriers to opportunity have denied this promise
for so many. That is why the President has taken
historic steps to put equity at the center of his
agenda—and why the President assembled the
most diverse cabinet in American history to deliver on this Government-wide effort.
Beginning on his first day in office, the
President took a series of landmark executive
actions to advance equity. The President signed
a day-one Executive Order 13985, “Advancing
Racial Equity and Support for Underserved
Communities Through the Federal Government,”
on advancing equity and racial justice across
the Federal Government; a day-one Executive
Order 13988, “Preventing and Combating
Discrimination on the Basis of Gender Identity or
Sexual Orientation,” directing Federal agencies to
extend protections against discrimination based
on gender identity and sexual orientation, upon
which agencies have already acted in the areas of
housing, lending services, education, healthcare,
and more; and Executive Order 14035, “Diversity,
Equity, Inclusion, and Accessibility in the Federal
Workforce,” on advancing diversity, equity,
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 9
inclusion, and accessibility (DEIA) across the
Federal workforce. In the months since, Federal
agencies have been hard at work implementing
these orders—delivering more equitable external
work, revised DEIA policies and trainings, and
updated civil rights guidance and regulations.
The Administration set a Government-wide
goal of increasing the share of Federal contracts
to small disadvantaged businesses, including
those owned by people of color, by 50 percent by
2025—which would translate to an increase of
$100 billion to these firms over five years. The
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law made permanent
the Minority Business Development Agency, the
only Federal entity focused exclusively on promoting growth and competitiveness of minority-owned businesses, and elevated the head of
the Agency to the Under Secretary level. The
Administration provided $32 billion specifically
for tribal communities and Native Americans
as part of the American Rescue Plan, as well as
$13 billion in direct investments in tribal communities through the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law.
Also, the American Rescue Plan’s $122 billion
Elementary and Secondary School Emergency
Relief Fund, in addition to providing critically
needed funds to safely reopen and operate schools
and support students, included landmark maintenance of equity requirements that protected
high-poverty districts and schools from disproportionate funding reductions and the highest
poverty districts from any reductions.
On International Women’s Day in March 2021,
the President signed Executive Order 14020,
“Establishment of the White House Gender Policy
Council,” establishing the first White House
Gender Policy Council within the Executive Office
of the President and charged the office with leading a Government-wide effort to advance gender
equity and equality. To guide that work, last year
the Administration issued the first ever National
Strategy on Gender Equity and Equality in the
United Sates to advance equal opportunity for
people of all genders—now, agencies are developing action plans to achieve their top priorities
for advancing gender equity and equality. The
Administration has also: taken critical steps to
eliminate racial disparities in maternal health;
advanced historic military justice reform; deployed resources from the American Rescue Plan
for domestic violence and sexual assault prevention and services; and announced bold commitments to advance women’s economic security,
gender-based violence prevention and response,
and sexual and reproductive health and rights
both at home and around the world.
The President has also moved decisively
to condemn racism, xenophobia, and intolerance against Asian Americans (AA) and Native
Hawaiian and Other Pacific Islanders (NHOPI).
In his first week in office, the President signed
a Presidential Memorandum establishing an official policy to ensure the Federal Government
stands up against racism, xenophobia, nativism,
and bias. The memorandum directed all Federal
agencies to take steps to ensure their actions mitigate anti-Asian bias and xenophobia, especially
in the response to the COVID-19 pandemic, and
charged DOJ to partner with AA and NHOPI communities to respond to and prevent hate crimes
and violence. In May 2021, the President signed
into law the COVID-19 Hate Crimes Act, bipartisan legislation that makes significant improvements to the Nation’s response to hate crimes.
The Administration is also creating opportunity and building wealth in rural communities. For example, the American Rescue Plan’s
Coronavirus State and Local Fiscal Recovery
Fund has enabled States to invest in critical rural broadband and water infrastructure. In addition, the Administration’s efforts to strengthen
the food system through American Rescue Plan
funding are opening up new markets for farmers
and ranchers in rural America and supporting a
fairer, more competitive, and more resilient meat
and poultry supply chain. The Administration is
also working to keep rural hospitals open, supporting rural providers, expanding rural healthcare coverage, and making it more affordable
than ever, with nearly 700,000 rural Americans
gaining coverage through the Patient Protection
and Affordable Care Act in 2021 alone and families saving an average of $2,400 per year due to
the American Rescue Plan.
10 Confronting Urgent Crises and Delivering Historic Progress
RESTORING AMERICAN LEADERSHIP ON THE WORLD STAGE
As the President has restored the Nation’s
strength at home, he has revitalized our alliances and partnerships around the world, brought
American leadership to bear on the defining issues of our time, and invested in our military
advantage. The President has prioritized strategic competition with China and worked with
allies and partners to resist coercion and deter
aggression from Beijing and Moscow, and ended
America’s 20-year war in Afghanistan while removing all U.S. troops. The President has led a
global response to the COVID-19 pandemic and
made historic investments to confront the climate
crisis. As the United States enters what will
be a decisive decade, the President is positioning America to win the competition for the 21st
Century.
The President strengthened our foundational partnership with Europe on the full range of
global challenges, including climate, health security, trade and technology, and our collective and
decisive response to Russian aggression against
Ukraine. In the Indo-Pacific, America is strengthening its role and expanding its cooperation with
longtime allies and partners, including new diplomatic, defense and security, critical and emerging technology and supply chain, and climate
and global health initiatives, while supporting
stronger ties between our European and IndoPacific allies. Closer to home, the United States
has invested in relationships in the Western
Hemisphere, including by reviving the North
American Leaders’ Summit to consult with neighboring countries, committing to work together on
major regional migration efforts, and collaborating on health security, democratic renewal, and
shared economic growth. In the Middle East and
North Africa, the United States is working to deescalate tensions, curb Iran’s destabilizing activities, and help regional partners lay the foundation
for greater security, prosperity, and opportunity
for their people. The United States is partnering with African nations and publics to solve
problems of common interest—from health security to shared economic prosperity to countering
terrorism—mindful of the continent’s importance
to critical global issues.
From his first days in office, the President has
restored U.S. leadership to the most significant
global challenges of our time. At the President’s
direction, the United States has served as the
world’s vaccine arsenal, pledging more than 1.2
billion COVID-19 vaccines to countries around
the world, providing lifesaving supplies, and
hosting a Global COVID-19 Summit to build better health security for the future. The President
renewed U.S. leadership on climate, including
by rejoining the Paris Agreement. Alongside
the Group of Seven partners, the United States
launched the Build Back Better World Initiative
to meet the developing world’s infrastructure
needs transparently, sustainably, and with high
standards. The President convened 110 governments in the first Summit for Democracy
to catalyze action to strengthen democracy at
home and abroad. The United States rejoined
and reinforced international institutions such as
the World Health Organization and the United
Nations Human Rights Council. In addition,
the Administration reprioritized cybersecurity by
strengthening resilience at home and accelerating cooperation with allies and the private sector.
Under the President’s leadership, the United
States has resolved significant trade disputes, including on airplanes, steel, and aluminum, and
protected American workers by centering them in
our foreign policy. Last year, the United States
rallied more than 100 countries to join the Global
Methane Pledge to cut emissions by 30 percent by
2030. In addition to fueling the global economic
recovery, America secured a historic win for workers and middle-class families through the agreement of 130 countries to support a global minimum tax for the world’s largest corporations.
As America leads with diplomacy, we are also
investing in our military—the strongest fighting
force the world has ever known. We are investing
in our warfighting advantages, understanding
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 11
that a combat-credible military is the foundation
of deterrence and America’s ability to prevail in
conflict. At the same time, the United States
is making disciplined choices about the use of
military force and focusing its attention on the
military’s primary responsibilities: to defend
the homeland; deter conflict; and to fight and
win the Nation’s wars, while remaining committed to the wellbeing of its servicemembers and
their families.

13
BUILDING A BETTER AMERICA
Under the President’s leadership, America
is on the move again. Together, in the face of
unprecedented crises and ongoing challenges,
we have begun to change the trajectory of our
economy to finally make it work for working
people—with historic job creation, faster economic growth, and more money in workers’
pockets. We are moving forward safely, continuing to combat the pandemic and building better preparedness for the next health
emergency. We have mobilized the Federal
Government to tackle the climate crisis with
the urgency that the science demands. We
have launched a Government-wide effort to
advance equity and expand opportunity across
our Nation and economy. We have revitalized
our global alliances and our leadership on the
world stage. While much work remains, we are
poised to meet the challenges and opportunities ahead.
The President’s Budget details his vision for
how to carry this momentum forward and build
a better America. It is a Budget anchored in
the President’s bedrock belief that the economy
grows from the bottom up and the middle out, and
that America is at its best when all Americans—
not just the wealthiest few—can get ahead and
pursue their promise and potential.
In last year’s Budget, the President put forward
a set of proposals designed to ensure America
emerged from the pandemic even stronger than
before. Just months later, the President’s proposals to rebuild America’s crumbling infrastructure, expand access to clean drinking water,
and invest in communities too often left behind
were enacted in the Infrastructure Investment
and Jobs Act (Bipartisan Infrastructure Law).
Earlier this month, the Congress reached a bipartisan agreement to fund the Government for
2022, ending a damaging series of short-term
continuing resolutions and taking a first step to
reinvest in research, education, public health,
and other core functions of the Government.
 In the State of the Union, the President reiterated his commitment to work with the Congress
to pass legislation to lower costs for American
families, reduce the deficit, and expand the productive capacity of the American economy. The
President supports legislation that: cuts costs
for prescription drugs, healthcare premiums,
child care, long-term care, housing, and college, including tuition-free community college
and expanded support for Historically Black
Colleges and Universities (HBCUs), Tribally
Controlled Colleges and Universities (TCCUs),
and Minority-Serving Institutions (MSIs); reduces energy costs by combatting climate change
and accelerating the transition to a clean energy economy while creating good-paying jobs
for American workers; supports families with
access to free, high-quality preschool and paid
family and medical leave and by continuing the
enhanced Child Tax Credit and Earned Income
Tax Credit; and provides health coverage to millions of uninsured Americans. The President
believes these proposals must be paired with reforms that ensure corporations and the wealthiest Americans pay their fair share, including by
paying the taxes they already owe and closing
loopholes that they exploit.
Because discussions with the Congress continue, the President’s Budget includes a deficit
14 Building a Better America
neutral reserve fund to account for future legislation, preserving the revenue from proposed tax
and prescription drug reforms for the investments
needed to bring down costs for American families
and expand our productive capacity. This approach reflects the President’s continued commitments to: advancing the policies that strengthen
our economy and reduce costs for American families; working collaboratively with the Congress
to shape this legislation; and fully paying for the
long-term costs of all new investments and reducing the deficit. As the President said in the State
of the Union, he is committed to working with the
Congress on legislation that both cuts costs for
families and reduces the Federal deficit. To be
conservative, however, the Budget reflects this reserve fund as deficit neutral.
In addition, the President’s 2023 Budget proposes other targeted investments that would:
help expand the productive capacity of our economy to create jobs, bring down prices, and continue
our historic recovery; improve our public health
infrastructure and spur transformational medical research; combat and prevent gun violence
and other violent crime; drive action to lead the
world in combating the climate crisis; and make
higher education more affordable and accessible
while advancing equity, opportunity, and security
for all Americans. (Due to the timing of enactment, the 2023 Budget does not reflect the details of the 2022 appropriations bill, and investment levels in the Budget are compared to 2021
funding.)
The Budget also provides the resources necessary to deliver on our commitments to the
American people’s security and prosperity by
revitalizing American leadership on the world
stage. We are at the beginning of a decisive decade that will determine the future of strategic
competition with China, the trajectory of the
climate crisis, and whether the rules governing
technology, trade, and international economics
enshrine or violate our democratic values. The
Budget enables us to meet these challenges by
investing both in our domestic and international sources of strength—from our dynamic and
diverse workforce, to our industrial and innovation base, to our military and development enterprise, to our unparalleled network of allies and
partners. In doing so, the Budget enables us to
marshal global coalitions to act from a position of
strength, whether in the face of Russian aggression or transnational threats.
The Budget also delivers on the President’s
commitment to fiscal responsibility. The deficit
is on track to drop by more than $1 trillion this
year, the largest-ever one-year decline. Under
the Budget policies, annual deficits would fall to
less than half of last year’s levels as a share of
the economy, while the economic burden of debt
would remain low. The Budget’s investments are
more than paid for through additional tax reforms that ensure corporations and the wealthiest Americans pay their fair share, allowing us
to cut costs for American families, strengthen our
economy, and cut deficits and debt by more than
$1 trillion over the coming decade.
PROMOTING JOB CREATION, REDUCING COST PRESSURES, AND
BOOSTING THE PRODUCTIVE CAPACITY OF THE ECONOMY
In 2021, America saw the strongest monthly
job growth ever recorded, the largest decline in
unemployment ever recorded, and the strongest economic growth in nearly four decades.
Importantly, the benefits from this growth were
broadly shared, and not only concentrated among
those at the very top. At the same time, the United
States—like virtually all advanced economies
around the world—is facing pandemic-driven
price increases that strain family budgets. That
is why the President is laser focused on building
a more productive economy that can deliver more
goods and services to the American people while
bringing down costs and driving growth and job
creation. The Budget builds on the progress
the Administration has already made—as well
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 15
as additional steps the President is pursuing—
through a package of investments that would bolster the supply-side of the economy, create jobs
and address cost pressures, and expand the economy’s capacity over the medium- and long-term.
Strengthening Supply Chains,
Bolstering Manufacturing, and
Improving Infrastructure
Strengthens the Nation’s Supply Chains
through Domestic Manufacturing. To help ignite a resurgence of American manufacturing and
strengthen domestic supply chains, the Budget
provides $372  million, an increase of $206  million over the 2021 enacted level, for the National
Institutes of Standards and Technology’s manufacturing programs to launch two additional
manufacturing innovation institutes in 2023 and
continue support for the two institutes funded in
2022. The Budget includes a $125 million increase
for the Manufacturing Extension Partnership to
make America’s small and medium manufacturers more competitive, as well as $200 million for
a new Solar Manufacturing Accelerator at the
Department of Energy (DOE) to build domestic
capacity in solar energy supply chains while moving away from imported products manufactured
using unacceptable labor practices. The Budget
provides $30  million to support programs that
help ensure entrepreneurs have the tools and
networks they need to bring cutting-edge innovation to the market.
Accelerates Efforts to Move More Goods
Faster through American Ports and
Waterways. The Budget continues support for
the historic levels of Federal investment to modernize America’s port and waterway infrastructure provided under the Bipartisan Infrastructure
Law. The Budget includes $230  million for the
Port Infrastructure Development Program to
strengthen maritime freight capacity. In addition to keeping the Nation’s supply chain moving by improving efficiency, the Department of
Transportation will prioritize projects that also
lower emissions—reducing environmental impact
in and around America’s ports. The Budget also
includes $1.7 billion for the Harbor Maintenance
Trust Fund to facilitate safe, reliable, and environmentally sustainable navigation at the
Nation’s coastal ports.
Reduces Bottlenecks and Commute
Times through Investments in Competitive
Programs. The Budget provides robust support
for transportation projects that reduce commute
times, improve safety, reduce freight bottlenecks,
better connect communities, and reduce transportation-related greenhouse gas emissions. For
example, investments include $4  billion for the
new Bipartisan Infrastructure Law-authorized
National Infrastructure Investments grant programs to support transportation projects with
significant benefits across multiple modes.
Modernizes and Upgrades Roads and
Bridges. To modernize, repair, and improve
the safety and efficiency of the Nation’s network of roads and bridges, the Budget provides
$68.9  billion for the Federal-aid Highway program, including: $9.4  billion provided by the
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law for 2023; $8 billion
to rebuild the Nation’s bridges; $1.4 billion to deploy a nationwide, publicly-accessible network of
electric vehicle chargers and other alternative
fueling infrastructure; $1.3 billion for a new carbon reduction grant program; and $1.7 billion for
a new resiliency grant program to make surface
transportation infrastructure more resilient to
hazards such as climate change.
Invests in Reliable Passenger and Freight
Rail. To ensure the safety and performance of
the rail industry today and deliver the passenger
rail network of the future, the Budget provides a
historic $17.9 billion, a $15 billion increase over
the 2021 enacted level. This includes $4.7 billion
in additional funding on top of the $13.2 billion already provided by the Bipartisan Infrastructure
Law for 2023. These resources would support
$7.4  billion to significantly improve Amtrak’s
rolling stock and facilities, and $10.1 billion for
existing and new competitive grant programs to
support passenger rail modernization and expansion, address critical safety needs, and support
the vitality of the freight rail network.
16 Building a Better America
Connects All Americans to High-Speed,
Affordable, and Reliable Internet. The
President is committed to ensuring that every
American has access to broadband, which would
not only strengthen rural economies, but also create high-paying union jobs installing broadband.
Building on key investments in the Bipartisan
Infrastructure Law, the Budget provides
$600 million for the ReConnect program, which
provides grants and loans to deploy broadband
to unserved areas—especially tribal areas—and
$25 million to help rural telecommunications cooperatives refinance their Rural Utilities Service
debt and upgrade their broadband facilities.
Addressing Cost Pressures and
Expanding Economic Capacity
Increases Affordable Housing Supply. To
address the critical shortage of affordable housing in communities throughout the Nation, the
Budget proposes $50 billion in mandatory funding
and additional Low-Income Housing Tax Credits
(LIHTC) to address market gaps, increase housing supply, and help to stabilize housing prices
over the long-term. Specifically, the Budget provides $35  billion in mandatory funding at the
Department of Housing and Urban Development
(HUD) for State and local housing finance agencies and their partners to provide grants, revolving loan funds and other streamlined financing
tools, as well as grants to advance State and local jurisdictions’ efforts to remove barriers to affordable housing development. In addition, the
Budget proposes $5 billion in mandatory funding
for the Department of the Treasury’s Community
Development Financial Institutions Fund to support financing of new construction and substantial
rehabilitation that creates net new units of affordable rental and for sale housing. The Budget also
proposes modifying LIHTC to better incentivize
new unit production, with a 10-year cost of nearly
$10 billion. The Budget also provides more than
$1.9 billion in discretionary funding for the HOME
Investment Partnerships Program to construct
and rehabilitate affordable rental housing and
provide homeownership opportunities—the highest funding level for HOME in nearly 15 years.
Fosters Competitive and Productive
Markets and Targets Corporate
Concentration. The Budget reflects the
Administration’s commitment to vigorous marketplace competition through robust enforcement
of antitrust law by including historic increases
of $88  million for the Antitrust Division of the
Department of Justice (DOJ) and $139 million for
the Federal Trade Commission. The President
also supports legislation that would align executives’ interests with the long-term interests of
shareholders, workers, and the economy by requiring executives to hold on to company shares
that they receive for several years after receiving
them, and prohibiting them from selling shares
in the years after a stock buyback. This would
discourage corporations from using profits to repurchase stock and enrich executives, rather than
investing in long-term growth and innovation.
Builds a Competitive and Resilient
Food Supply Chain. The Budget strengthens
market oversight through investments in the
Agricultural Marketing Service and the Animal
and Plant Health Inspection Service, resulting
in competitive meat and poultry product prices
for American families and increased protection
against invasive pests and zoonotic diseases.
These programs build on the pandemic and supply chain assistance funding in the American
Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (American Rescue Plan)
to address pandemic-related vulnerabilities in
the food system and create new market opportunities and good-paying jobs.
Promotes Innovation and Science in
Underrepresented Communities. The
Budget supports programs, including community-led capacity building and training, that expand equitable inclusion in Federal science and
technology programs and the use of scientific
and technological innovation to advance equitable outcomes. The Budget provides $393 million for the National Science Foundation (NSF),
an increase of $172  million or 78 percent above
the 2021 enacted level, for programs dedicated to
increasing the participation of historically underrepresented communities in science and engineering fields. The Budget also provides $260 million
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 17
for DOE initiatives to build science and technology capacity in underserved institutions, including HBCUs, Hispanic Serving Institutions
(HSIs), and TCCUs. In addition, the Budget provides $315 million through the U.S. Department
of Agriculture (USDA) in agriculture research,
education, and extension grants to build capacity
in underserved institutions, including HBCUs,
HSIs, and TCCUs.
Expanding Opportunities for
Workers and Small Businesses
Expands Access to Capital for Small
Businesses. The Budget addresses the need
for greater access to affordable capital, particularly in underserved communities. The Budget
increases the authorized lending levels in key
Small Business Administration (SBA) programs
by a total of $9.5 billion to significantly expand
the availability of working capital, fixed capital,
and venture capital funding for small businesses. The Administration looks forward to working
with the Congress to ensure small manufacturers
have sufficient working capital to help them meet
human resource needs and purchase raw materials/inventory, while incentivizing them to finance
renewable energy equipment projects. 
Supports Minority-Owned Businesses
to Narrow Racial Wealth Gaps. The Budget
elevates the stature and increases the capacity
of the Minority Business Development Agency
by providing the full $110 million authorized in
the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law. This funding would bolster services provided to minorityowned enterprises by expanding the Business
Center program, funding Rural Business Centers,
opening new regional offices, and supporting innovative initiatives to foster economic resiliency.
Creates New Global Markets for American
Goods. The Budget provides an additional
$26  million over 2021 enacted levels to bolster
commercial diplomacy and enhance export promotion through a targeted expansion of the Foreign
Commercial Service at the International Trade
Administration, which would help American
businesses seeking to increase exports abroad,
navigate new foreign markets, or find market
opportunities.
Equips Workers with Skills They Need to
Obtain High-Quality Jobs. The Budget invests
$100  million to help community colleges work
with the public workforce development system
and employers to design and deliver high-quality
workforce programs. The Budget also provides
$100  million for a new Sectoral Employment
through Career Training for Occupational
Readiness program, which would support training programs focused on growing industries, enabling disadvantaged workers to enter on-ramps
to middle class jobs, and creating the skilled
workforce the economy needs to thrive.
Expands Access to Registered Apprenticeships (RA). RA is a proven earn-and-learn
model that raises participants’ wages and puts
them on a reliable path to the middle class. The
Budget invests $303  million, a $118  million increase above the 2021 enacted level, to expand
RA opportunities in high growth fields, such as
information technology, advanced manufacturing,
healthcare, and transportation, while increasing
access for historically underrepresented groups,
including people of color and women. To improve
access to RA for women, the Budget doubles the
Department of Labor’s (DOL) investment in its
Women in Apprenticeship and Nontraditional
Occupations grants, which provide pre-apprenticeship opportunities to boost women’s participation in RA.
Provides Youth Training and Employment
Pathways. The Budget invests in programs
that provide young people with equitable access
to high-quality training and career opportunities, including $75  million for a new National
Youth Employment Program to create high-quality summer and year-round job opportunities for
underserved youth. The Budget also provides
$145  million for YouthBuild, $48  million above
the 2021 enacted level, to enable more at-risk
youth to gain the education and occupational
skills they need to obtain good jobs. To further
advance equity and inclusion, the Budget also
18 Building a Better America
provides $15 million to test new ways to enable
low-income youth with disabilities—including
youth who are in foster care, involved in the
justice system, or are experiencing homelessness—to successfully transition to employment.
RESTORING AMERICAN LEADERSHIP AND CONFRONTING GLOBAL
THREATS
To ensure and strengthen American security,
prosperity, and democracy, we must both deliver
at home and lead on the world stage. The Budget
invests in the key pillars of our international
strength in order to position us to contend with
determined competitors, address transnational
threats, and manage crises as they arise. The
Budget invests in deepening and modernizing
our alliances and partnerships, as we are stronger in managing challenges—whether in the form
of China’s trade abuses, Russian aggression, or
the worsening climate crisis—when we work in
concert with those who share our values or interests. The Budget bolsters our cybersecurity
and strengthens our military by ensuring we
have the resources necessary to sustain deterrence and backstop our diplomacy, as well as fight
and win the Nation’s wars if necessary. Also, the
Budget renews our commitment to sustainable
and inclusive development, including through the
President’s Build Back Better World initiative,
which supports building stronger infrastructure
to confront the climate crisis, strengthening global health security, working toward gender equality, and shaping the rules of the road for digital
connectivity. In addition, the Budget makes critical investments in addressing the root causes of
migration while strengthening our immigration
system, and in meeting the sacred commitments
we have made to our Nation’s veterans.
Confronting 21st Century Threats
Supports United States’ European Allies
and Partners.  The Budget supports Ukraine,
the United States’ strong partnerships with
North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) allies, and other European partner states by bolstering funding to enhance the capabilities and
readiness of U.S. forces, NATO allies, and regional partners in the face of Russian aggression.
Promotes Integrated Deterrence in the
Indo-Pacific and Globally. The Budget proposes $773 billion for the Department of Defense
(DOD). To sustain and strengthen deterrence,
the Budget prioritizes China as the Department’s
pacing challenge. The 2023 Pacific Deterrence
Initiative highlights some of the key investments
that DOD is making that are focused on strengthening deterrence in the Indo-Pacific region. Also,
DOD is building the concepts, capabilities, and
posture necessary to meet these challenges, working in concert with the interagency and America’s
allies and partners to ensure that deterrence is
integrated across domains, theaters, and the
spectrum of conflict.
Defends Freedom Globally. To support
American leadership in defending democracy,
freedom, and security worldwide, the Budget
includes nearly $1.8 billion to support a free
and open, connected, secure, and resilient IndoPacific Region and the Indo-Pacific Strategy,
and $400 million for the Countering the People’s
Republic of China Malign Influence Fund. In
addition, the Budget provides $682  million for
Ukraine, an increase of $219  million above the
2021 enacted level, to counter Russian malign
influence and to meet emerging needs related to
security, energy, cybersecurity issues, disinformation, macroeconomic stabilization, and civil society resilience.
Supports Democracy Globally. In response to political fragility and increasing authoritarianism around the world, the Budget
provides more than $3.2 billion to support global democracy, human rights, anti-corruption,
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 19
and governance programming, consistent with
the commitments made during the President’s
Summit for Democracy. The Budget advances
the Presidential Memorandum on Advancing
the Human Rights of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual,
Transgender, Queer, and Intersex Persons around
the World, the U.S. Strategy on Countering
Corruption, and the Presidential Initiative on
Democratic Renewal.
Counters Persistent Threats. While focused on maintaining robust deterrence against
China and Russia, the Budget would also enable
DOD to counter other persistent threats including those posed by North Korea, Iran, and violent
extremist organizations.
Advances U.S. Cybersecurity.  The Budget
invests in cybersecurity programs to protect
the Nation from malicious cyber actors and cyber campaigns. Last year, the President signed
Executive Order 14028, “Improving the Nation’s
Cybersecurity,” charting a new course to improve
the Nation’s cybersecurity. Executive Order
14028 prioritizes protecting and modernizing
Federal Government systems and data, improving information-sharing between the U.S.
Government and the private sector, enhancing
standards for secure software development, improving detection of cyber threats and vulnerabilities on Federal systems, and strengthening
the United States’ ability to respond to incidents
when they occur.
Modernizes the Nuclear Deterrent. The
Budget maintains a strong, credible nuclear deterrent, as a foundational aspect of integrated
deterrence, for the security of the Nation and
U.S. allies. The Budget supports the U.S. nuclear triad and the necessary ongoing nuclear
modernization programs, to include the nuclear command, control, and communication
networks.
Marshalling American Leadership
to Tackle Global Challenges
Renews America’s Leadership in
International Institutions. The Budget
continues the Administration’s efforts to lead
through international organizations by meeting the Nation’s commitments to fully fund U.S.
contributions and to pay United Nations peacekeeping dues on time and in full. The Budget
also provides $1.4  billion for the World Bank’s
International Development Association (IDA).
This investment restores the United States’ historical role as the largest World Bank donor to
support the development of low- and middleincome countries, which benefits the American
people by increasing global stability, mitigating
climate and health risks, and developing new
markets for U.S exports. The U.S. contribution
would also support the United States’ $3.5 billion
pledge to the next IDA replenishment, a critical
component of the global response to the devastating impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic on developing countries.
Advances American Leadership in Global
Health, Including Global Health Security
and Pandemic Preparedness. The Budget
includes $10.6  billion to bolster U.S. leadership
in addressing global health and health security
challenges, a $1.4 billion increase above the 2021
enacted level. Within this total, the Budget demonstrates U.S. leadership by supporting a $2 billion contribution to the Global Fund’s seventh replenishment, for an intended pledge of $6 billion
over three years, to save lives and continue the
fight against HIV/AIDS, tuberculosis, and malaria, and to support the Global Fund’s expanding
response to the COVID-19 pandemic and global
health strengthening. This total also includes
$1 billion to prevent, prepare for, and respond to
future infectious disease outbreaks, including the
continued expansion of Global Health Security
Agenda capacity-building programs and a multilateral financial intermediary fund for health security and pandemic preparedness. The Budget
also invests in the global health workforce and
systems to enhance countries’ abilities to provide core health services, improve health systems
20 Building a Better America
resiliency, and respond to crises while mitigating the impacts of crises on routine health services. In addition, the Budget includes $6.5 billion in mandatory funding for the Department
of State and the U.S. Agency for International
Development over five years to make transformative investments in pandemic and other biological threat preparedness globally in support
of U.S. biodefense and pandemic preparedness
strategies and plans. This pandemic preparedness funding would strengthen the global health
workforce, support pandemic preparedness research and development (R&D), advance global
R&D capacity, and support health security capacity and financing to prevent, detect, and respond
to future COVID-19 variants and other infectious
disease outbreaks.
Advances Equity and Equality Globally.
The Budget provides $2.6 billion to advance gender equity and equality across a broad range of
sectors. This includes $200 million for the Gender
Equity and Equality Action Fund to advance the
economic security of women and girls. This total
also includes funding to strengthen the participation of women in conflict prevention, resolution,
and recovery through the implementation of the
Women, Peace, and Security Act of 2017.
Continues Collaborative U.S. Leadership
in Central America and Haiti. As part of a
comprehensive strategy to drive systemic reform
while addressing the root causes of irregular
migration from Central America to the United
States, the Budget invests $987 million in the region to continue meeting the President’s four-year
commitment of $4 billion. Further, in response
to deteriorating conditions and widespread violence in Haiti, the Budget invests $275  million
to strengthen Haiti’s recovery from political and
economic shocks, such as strengthening the capacity of the Haitian National Police, combating
corruption, strengthening the capacity of civil society, and support services for marginalized populations. These investments would ensure that
the United States is able to revitalize partnerships that build economic resilience, democratic
stability, and citizen security in the region.
Strengthens U.S. Leadership on Refugee
and Humanitarian Issues. The Budget provides more than $10 billion to respond to the unprecedented need arising from conflict and natural disasters around the world to serve over 70
countries and approximately 240 million people.
The Budget continues rebuilding the Nation’s
refugee admissions program and supports up to
125,000 admissions in 2023.
Strengthening America’s
Immigration System
Ensures a Fair and Efficient Immigration
System. The Administration is committed to
ensuring that United States Citizenship and
Immigration Services (USCIS) meets its mission
of administering the Nation’s lawful immigration
system and safeguarding its integrity and promise by efficiently and fairly adjudicating requests
for immigration benefits. The Budget provides
$765 million for USCIS to efficiently process increasing asylum caseloads, address the immigration application backlog, and improve refugee
processing.
Supports America’s Promise to Refugees.
The Budget provides $6.3 billion to the Office of
Refugee Resettlement (ORR) to help rebuild the
Nation’s refugee resettlement infrastructure and
support the resettling of up to 125,000 refugees
in 2023. The Budget would also help ensure that
unaccompanied immigrant children are unified
with relatives and sponsors as safely and quickly
as possible and receive appropriate care and services while in ORR custody.
Improves Border Processing and
Management. The Budget provides $15.3  billion for the U.S. Customs and Border Protection
and $8.1  billion for the U.S. Immigration and
Customs Enforcement to enforce the immigration
laws, further secure the border, and effectively
manage irregular migration along the Southwest
border, including $309 million for border security
technology and $494  million for noncitizen processing and care costs.
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 21
Improves Immigration Courts. The Budget
invests $1.4 billion, an increase of $621 million
above the 2021 enacted level, in the Executive
Office for Immigration Review (EOIR) to continue addressing the backlog of over 1.5 million
cases that are currently pending in the immigration courts. This funding supports 100 new immigration judges, including the support personnel
required to create maximum efficiencies in the
court systems, as well as an expansion of EOIR’s
virtual court initiative. The Budget would also
invest new resources in legal access programming, including $150  million in discretionary
resources to provide access to representation for
adults and families in immigration proceedings.
Complementing this new program is a proposal
for $4.5 billion in mandatory resources to expand
these efforts over a 10-year period. Providing resources to support legal representation in the immigration court system creates greater efficiencies in processing cases while making the system
fairer and more equitable.
Delivering on Our
Commitments to Veterans
Prioritizes Veteran Medical Care. The
Budget provides $119 billion—a historic 32-percent increase above the 2021 enacted level for the
Department of Veterans Affairs (VA). In addition
to fully funding inpatient, outpatient, mental
health, and long-term care services, the Budget
supports programs that improve VA healthcare
quality and delivery, including investments in
training programs for clinicians, health professionals, and medical students. With more women
choosing VA for their healthcare than ever before,
the Budget also invests $9.8 billion for all of women veterans’ healthcare, including $767  million
toward women’s gender specific care. The Budget
also further supports VA’s preparedness for regional and national public health emergencies.
Prioritizes Veteran Suicide Prevention.
The Budget provides $497  million to support
the Administration’s veteran suicide prevention
initiatives, including: implementation of the
Veterans Crisis Line’s 988 expansion initiative;
the suicide prevention 2.0 program to grow public health efforts in communities; a lethal means
safety campaign in partnership with other agencies; and the Staff Sergeant Parker Gordon Fox
Suicide Prevention Grant Program to enhance
community-based clinical strategies.
Bolsters Efforts to End Veteran
Homelessness. The Budget increases resources
for veterans’ homelessness programs to $2.7 billion, with the goal of ensuring every veteran has
permanent, sustainable housing with access to
healthcare and other supportive services to prevent and end veteran homelessness.
Invests in Caregivers Support Program.
The Budget recognizes the important role of family caregivers in supporting the health and wellness of veterans. The Budget provides funding
for the Program of General Caregivers Support
Services. The Budget also provides $1.8 billion
for the Program of Comprehensive Assistance for
Family Caregivers, which includes stipend payments and support services to help empower family caregivers of eligible veterans.
Supports Research Critical to Veterans’
Health Needs. Extensive research at VA medical centers, outpatient clinics, and nursing homes
each year has significantly contributed to advancements in healthcare for veterans and all
Americans. The Budget provides $916  million
to continue the development of VA’s research
enterprise, including research in support of the
American Pandemic Preparedness: Transforming
Our Capabilities plan’s goals. The Budget also
invests $81 million within VA research programs
for precision oncology to provide access to the
best possible cancer care for veterans.
Continues and Enhances Efficient
Delivery of Veterans Benefits. The Budget
would ensure that veterans receive the benefits
they have earned and deserve, such as disability compensation, education and employment
training, and home loan guarantees. The Budget
invests $120 million for VA to support automating the disability compensation claims process
from submission to authorization which would
22 Building a Better America
increase VA’s ability to deliver faster and more
accurate claim decisions for veterans.
Addresses Environmental Exposures. The
Budget increases resources for new presumptive disability compensation claims related to
environmental exposures from military service.
The Budget also invests $51  million within VA
research programs and $63  million within the
VA medical care program for Health Outcomes
Military Exposures to increase scientific understanding of and clinical support for veterans and
healthcare providers regarding the potential
adverse impacts from environmental exposures
during military service.
Honors the Memory of All Veterans. The
Budget includes $430 million to ensure veterans
and their families have access to exceptional memorial benefits, including two new and replacement national cemeteries. These funds maintain
national shrine standards at the 158 VA managed
cemeteries and provide the initial operational investment required to open new cemeteries.
STRENGTHENING AMERICA’S PUBLIC HEALTH INFRASTRUCTURE
From the President’s first days in office, the
Administration has mounted a forceful response
to the COVID-19 pandemic and taken action
to advance the health and well-being of the
American people. Through the American Rescue
Plan, the Administration secured critical resources to support the President’s historic vaccination
program, testing and mitigation, therapeutics,
and personal protective equipment—and to help
make quality health insurance available through
the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act
more affordable. To build on this progress and
bolster America’s public health infrastructure,
the Budget includes key investments to ensure
the United States is prepared to confront future
pandemics and other biological threats domestically and globally, expand access to critical health
services, address other diseases and epidemics,
and advance and accelerate transformative medical research.
Ensuring World-Class Public
Health Infrastructure
Prepares for Future Pandemics and Other
Biological Threats. While combatting the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, the United States
must catalyze advances in science, technology,
and core capabilities to prepare the Nation for
the next biological threat and strengthen U.S.
and global health security. The Budget makes
transformative investments in pandemic preparedness across the Department of Health
and Human Services (HHS) public health agencies—$81.7  billion available over five years—to
enable an agile, coordinated, and comprehensive
public health response to protect American lives,
families, and the economy and to prevent, detect,
and respond to emerging biological catastrophes.
The Budget builds toward a goal of making effective vaccines and therapeutics available within
100 days of identifying a new pathogen by investing in basic and advanced R&D of medical
countermeasures for high priority viral families
and biological threats, including expansion and
modernization of clinical trial infrastructure and
regulatory capacity necessary to inform evaluation and subsequent authorizations or approvals,
as well as expansion of domestic manufacturing
capacity to ensure sufficient supply is available.
The Budget also enhances public health infrastructure by making significant investments in
public health laboratory capacity, domestic and
global threat surveillance, and public health
workforce development that would enable States,
localities, tribal nations, and Territories to mount
a rapid and robust response to future threats.
Further, the Budget encourages development of
innovative antimicrobial drugs through advance
market commitments for critical-need antimicrobial drugs. The President also supports extending telehealth coverage under Medicare beyond
the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency to study
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 23
its impact on utilization of services and access to
care. In addition, the Budget supports enhanced
DOD and DOE investments in: medical countermeasures, including vaccines, diagnostics, and
therapeutics research and manufacturing; disease detection and biosurveillance; advanced
computing; lab biosafety and biosecurity; and
threat reduction activities with America’s global
partners.
Builds Advanced Public Health Systems
and Capacity. The Budget includes $9.9 billion
in discretionary funding to build capacity at the
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC)
and at the State and local levels, an increase of
$2.8  billion over the 2021 enacted level. These
resources would improve the core immunization
program, expand public health infrastructure
in States and Territories, strengthen the public
health workforce, support efforts to modernize
public health data collection, increase capacity
for forecasting and analyzing future outbreaks,
including at Center for Forecasting and Outbreak
Analytics, and conduct studies on long COVID conditions to inform diagnosis and treatment options.
In addition, to advance health equity, the Budget
invests in CDC programs related to viral hepatitis,
youth mental health, and sickle cell disease. To
address gun violence as a public health epidemic,
the Budget invests in community violence intervention and firearm safety research.
Expands Access to Vaccines. The Budget
establishes a new Vaccines for Adults (VFA) program, which would provide uninsured adults
with access to all vaccines recommended by the
Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices
at no cost. As a complement to the successful
Vaccines for Children (VFC) program, the VFA
program would reduce disparities in vaccine
coverage and promote infrastructure for broad,
access to routine and outbreak vaccines. The
Budget would also expand the VFC program to
include all children under age 19 enrolled in the
Children’s Health Insurance Program and consolidate vaccine coverage under Medicare Part B,
making more preventive vaccines available at no
cost to Medicare beneficiaries.
Guarantees Adequate and Stable Funding
for the Indian Health Service (IHS). The
Budget significantly increases IHS’s funding over
time, and shifts it from discretionary to mandatory funding. For the first year of the proposal, the
Budget includes $9.1 billion in mandatory funding, an increase of $2.9 billion above 2021. After
that, IHS funding would automatically grow to
keep pace with healthcare costs and population
growth and gradually close longstanding service and facility shortfalls. Providing IHS stable
and predictable funding would improve access to
high quality healthcare, rectify historical underfunding of the Indian Health system, eliminate
existing facilities backlogs, address health inequities, and modernize IHS’ electronic health record system. This proposal has been informed by
consultations with tribal nations on the issue of
IHS funding and will be refined based on ongoing
consultation.
Advances Maternal Health and Health
Equity. The United States has the highest maternal mortality rate among developed nations,
with an unacceptably high mortality rate for
Black and American Indian and Alaska Native
women. The Budget includes $470  million to:
reduce maternal mortality and morbidity rates;
expand maternal health initiatives in rural communities; implement implicit bias training for
healthcare providers; create pregnancy medical
home demonstration projects; and address the
highest rates of perinatal health disparities, including by supporting the perinatal health workforce. The Budget also extends and increases
funding for the Maternal, Infant, and Early
Childhood Home Visiting Program, which serves
approximately 71,000 families at risk for poor
maternal and child health outcomes each year,
and is proven to reduce disparities in infant mortality. To address the lack of data on health disparities and further improve access to care, the
Budget strengthens collection and evaluation of
health equity data. Recognizing that maternal
mental health conditions are the most common
complications of pregnancy and childbirth, the
Budget continues to support the maternal mental
health hotline and the screening and treatment
for maternal depression and related behavioral
24 Building a Better America
health disorders. The Administration also looks
forward to working with the Congress to advance
the President’s goal of doubling the Federal investment in community health centers, which
would help reduce health disparities by expanding access to care.
Supports Survivors of Domestic Violence
and Other Forms of Gender BasedViolence. The Budget proposes significant
increases to support and protect survivors of
gender-based violence, including $519  million
for the Family Violence Prevention and Services
(FVPSA) program to support domestic violence
survivors—more than double the 2021 enacted
level. This amount continues funding availability for FVPSA-funded resource centers, including
those that support the Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual,
Transgender, Queer, and Intersex community.
The Budget would provide additional funding for
domestic violence hotlines and cash assistance
for survivors of domestic violence, as well as
funding to support a demonstration project evaluating services for survivors at the intersection
of housing instability, substance use coercion,
and child welfare. In addition, the Budget would
provide over $66  million for victims of human
trafficking and survivors of torture, an increase
of nearly $21 million over the 2021 enacted level.
The Budget also proposes a historic investment
of $1 billion to support Violence Against Women
Act of 1994 (VAWA) programs, a $487 million or
95-percent increase over the 2021 enacted level.
The Budget supports substantial increases for
longstanding VAWA programs, including in legal assistance for victims, transitional housing,
and sexual assault services. The Budget also
provides resources for new programs to support
transgender survivors, build community-based
organizational capacity, combat online harassment and abuse, and address emerging issues in
gender-based violence.
Expands Access to Healthcare Services
for Low-Income Women. The Budget provides $400 million, an increase of nearly 40 percent over the 2021 enacted level, to the Title X
Family Planning program, which provides family planning and other healthcare to low-income
individuals. This increase in Title X funding
would improve overall access to vital reproductive and preventive health services and advance
gender and health equity.
Addressing Other Diseases
and Epidemics
Transforms Mental Healthcare. Mental
health is essential to overall health, and the
United States faces a mental health crisis that
has been exacerbated by the COVID-19 pandemic. To address this crisis, the Budget proposes reforms to health coverage and major investments
in the mental health workforce. For people with
private health insurance, the Budget requires
all health plans to cover mental health and substance use disorder benefits and ensures that
plans have an adequate network of behavioral
health providers. For Medicare, TRICARE, the
VA healthcare system, health insurance issuers,
group health plans, and the Federal Employees
Health Benefit Program, the Budget lowers costs
for mental health services for patients. The
Budget also requires parity in coverage between
mental health and substance use disorder—or
behavioral health—and other medical benefits,
and expands the types of providers covered
under Medicare to treat these conditions. The
Budget invests in increasing the number of mental health providers serving Medicaid beneficiaries, as well as in behavioral health workforce
development and service expansion, including
in primary care clinics and at non-traditional
sites. The Budget also provides sustained and
increased funding for community-based centers
and clinics, including a State option to receive
enhanced Medicaid reimbursement on a permanent basis. In addition, the Budget makes
historic investments in youth mental health and
suicide prevention programs and in training, educational loan repayment, and scholarships that
help address the shortage of behavioral health
providers, especially in underserved communities. The Budget also strengthens access to crisis services by building out the National Suicide
Prevention Lifeline, which will transition from a
10-digit number to 988 in July 2022.
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 25
Accelerates Innovation through the
Advanced Research Projects Agency for
Health (ARPA-H). The Budget proposes a major investment of $5 billion for ARPA-H, significantly increasing direct Federal R&D spending
in health to improve the health of all Americans.
With an initial focus on cancer and other diseases
such as diabetes and dementia, this major investment would drive transformational innovation
in health technologies and speed the application
and implementation of health breakthroughs.
Funding for ARPA-H, along with additional funding for the National Institutes of Health, total a
$49 billion request to continue to support research
that enhances health, lengthens life, reduces illness and disability, and spurs new biotechnology
productions and innovation.
Advances the Cancer Moonshot Initiative.
The Budget proposes investments in ARPA-H,
the National Cancer Institute, CDC, and the Food
and Drug Administration to accelerate the rate
of progress against cancer by working toward reducing the cancer death rate by at least 50 percent over the next 25 years and improving the
experience of people who are living with or who
have survived cancer.
Commits to Ending the HIV/AIDS
Epidemic. The National HIV/AIDS Strategy
for the United States 2022–2025 commits to a
75-percent reduction in HIV infection by 2025.
To meet this ambitious target and ultimately end the HIV/AIDS epidemic in the United
States, the Budget includes $850 million across
HHS to aggressively reduce new HIV cases by
increasing access to HIV prevention and care
programs and ensuring equitable access to support services. This includes increasing access to
pre-exposure prophylaxis (also known as PrEP)
among Medicaid beneficiaries, which is expected
to improve health and lower Medicaid costs for
HIV treatment. The Budget also proposes a new
mandatory program to guarantee PrEP at no cost
for all uninsured and underinsured individuals,
provide essential wrap-around services through
States and localities, and establish a network of
community providers to reach underserved areas
and populations.
Addresses the Opioid and Drug Overdose
Epidemic. The drug overdose epidemic claimed
an estimated 104,000 lives in the 12-month period
ending in September, 2021. To end this epidemic,
a full range of service and supports are needed
for individuals who use or are at risk of using
substances that cause overdose, and their families. The Budget invests in services that prevent
substance use disorder, expand quality evidencebased treatment, and help individuals sustain
recovery. The Budget also includes $663 million
specific to VA’s Opioid Prevention and Treatment
programs, including programs in support of the
Jason Simcakoski Memorial and Promise Act.
TAKING HISTORIC STEPS TO COMBAT THE CLIMATE CRISIS AND
ADVANCE ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE
The President has not only taken bold action
to confront the climate crisis, but he has turned it
into an opportunity to create good-paying union
jobs, advance environmental justice, and position America to lead the industries of the future.
At his direction, the Administration has moved
swiftly and decisively to restore America’s global climate leadership, accelerate clean energy to
lower costs and create jobs, jumpstart an electric
future that is Made in America, advance environmental justice in line with Justice40 and economic
revitalization, and bolster our Nation’s resilience
in the face of accelerating extreme weather and
natural disasters. To build on this progress, the
President’s Budget invests a total of $44.9 billion
to tackle the climate crisis, a $16.7 billion increase
over 2021 enacted. The Budget also makes historic investments in environmental justice, coal
and powerplant communities facing energy transition, and innovation. These investments would
enhance U.S. competitiveness and put America
on a path to reduce greenhouse gas emissions 50
26 Building a Better America
to 52 percent by 2030—all while supporting communities that have been left behind and ensuring
that 40 percent of the benefits from tackling the
climate crisis are targeted toward addressing the
disproportionately high cumulative impacts on
disadvantaged communities.
Advancing Clean Energy,
Climate Data, and Resilience
Invests in Clean Energy Infrastructure
and Innovation. The Budget invests $3 billion
to support clean energy projects that would create
good-paying jobs and drive progress toward the
Administration’s climate goals. Investments include $502 million to weatherize and retrofit lowincome homes, including $100 million for a new
Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program
(LIHEAP) Advantage pilot to electrify and decarbonize low-income homes. In addition, the Budget
funds $150 million to electrify tribal homes and
transition tribal colleges and universities to renewable energy, and $90 million for a new Grid
Deployment Office to build the grid of the future.
In addition, the Budget provides $150 million in
credit subsidy for the DOE Title XVII Innovative
Technology Loan Guarantee Program to support
up to $5 billion in loans to eligible projects that
avoid, reduce, or sequester greenhouse gas emissions. DOE would also launch a new Net-Zero
Laboratory Initiative with a $58 million competition to reduce emissions across the national laboratory complex.
Strengthens Domestic Clean Energy
Manufacturing. Meeting the challenge of climate change will require a dramatic scale-up in
domestic manufacturing of key climate and clean
energy equipment, providing opportunities for
U.S. workers. The Budget includes $200 million
to launch a new Solar Manufacturing Accelerator
that would help create a robust domestic
manufacturing sector capable of meeting the
Administration’s solar deployment goals without
relying on imported goods manufactured using
unacceptable labor practices. At the same time,
it is imperative that the United States partners
with its allies to create resilient clean energy
supply chains. In addition, the Budget proposes
a new $1 billion mandatory investment to launch
a Global Clean Energy Manufacturing effort that
would build resilient supply chains for climate
and clean energy equipment through engagement
with allies, enabling an effective global response
to the climate crisis while creating economic opportunities for the United States to increase its
share of the global clean technology market.
Increases Demand for American Made,
Zero-Emission Vehicles through Federal
Procurement. The Budget invests $757 million
for zero-emission fleet vehicles and supporting
charging or fueling infrastructure in the individual budgets of 19 Federal agencies to provide
an immediate, clear, and stable source of demand
to help accelerate American industrial capacity
to produce clean vehicles and components. This
includes $300 million for dedicated funds at the
General Services Administration for other agencies and for charging infrastructure at the United
States Postal Service (USPS).
Provides Resources, Tools, and
Coordination to Reduce Greenhouse Gas
Emissions. To help reduce greenhouse gas
emissions and make the Nation’s infrastructure
more resilient, the Budget invests $100  million
in grants to States and Tribes that would support the implementation of on-the-ground efforts
to reduce and prevent greenhouse gas emissions
in communities across the Nation, such as ensuring safe and effective oil and gas well pollution
management and prevention, and supporting
State and local government development of zero
emissions vehicle charging infrastructure. The
Budget also provides an additional $35  million
over the 2021 enacted level to continue phasing
out potent greenhouse gases known as hydrofluorocarbons, as well as resources to spur the
development of a Federal climate data portal
with support from the Department of the Interior
(DOI) that would provide the public with accessible information on historical and projected climate impacts. The Budget also supports multiagency efforts to integrate science-based tools
into conservation planning in order to measure,
monitor, report, and verify carbon sequestration,
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 27
greenhouse gas reduction, wildlife stewardship,
and other environmental services at the farm level and on Federal lands. In addition, the Budget
supports enhancement of greenhouse monitoring
and measurement capabilities, as well as efforts
to make greenhouse gas data more accessible to a
broad range of users.
Strengthens Climate Resilience. The
Budget provides more than $18  billion for
climate resilience and adaptation programs
across the Federal Government, including
$3.5  billion for the Department of Homeland
Security, $5.9 billion at DOI, $1 billion for HUD,
and $376 million for the National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration (NOAA). These
critical investments would reduce the risk of
damages from floods and storms, restore the
Nation’s aquatic ecosystems, and make HUDassisted multifamily homes more energy and
water efficient and climate resilient. Resources
include $507  million, $93  million above the
2021 enacted level, for the Federal Emergency
Management Agency’s (FEMA) flood hazard
mapping program to incorporate climate science and future risks and robust investments
in FEMA programs that help disadvantaged
communities build resilience against natural
disasters. The Budget also sustains funding
for key conservation and ecosystem management initiatives, including the Civilian Climate
Corps, alongside a historic $1.4 billion investment in the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law for
ecosystem restoration across America.
Invests in Conservation and Carbon
Sequestration. The Budget invests in the
Administration’s America the Beautiful
Initiative, a multi-agency, multi-jurisdictional ecosystem management effort that would
strengthen conservation partnerships between
communities and Federal partners such as DOI,
USDA, and NOAA. The President’s historic
goal of conserving and restoring 30 percent of
America’s lands and waters by 2030 incentivizes America’s farmers, ranchers, and forest
landowners to sequester carbon in soils and vegetation, and support the efforts and visions of
States and tribal nations.
Bolsters the Nation’s Frontline Defenses
against Catastrophic Wildfires. Protecting
communities, ecosystems, and infrastructure
from wildfire requires a resilient and reliable
Federal workforce. The Budget provides nearly $3.9  billion for Forest Service Wildland Fire
Management, an increase of $778  million, plus
an additional $2.6 billion authorized in the suppression cap adjustment. The Budget upholds
the President’s commitment that no Federal firefighter will make less than $15 an hour, and increases the size of the Federal firefighting workforce by providing $1.8 billion for personnel and
preparedness. Consistent with the President’s
commitment to use the latest technologies in
the fight against wildfires, the Budget also permanently sustains a pilot program that leverages sensitive satellite imagery to rapidly detect
wildfires. The Budget also invests $646 million
in Hazardous Fuels Management and Burned
Area Rehabilitation programs to help reduce the
risk and severity of wildfires and restore lands
that were devastated by catastrophic fire over
the last several years. This funding complements
the $2.5 billion for hazardous fuels management
and $650  million for burned area rehabilitation projects provided through the Bipartisan
Infrastructure Law.
Securing Environmental Justice and
Delivering for Communities Left Behind
Advances Equity and Environmental
Justice. The Budget provides historic support
for underserved communities, and advances the
President’s Justice40 commitment to ensure 40
percent of the benefits of Federal investments in
climate and clean energy reach disadvantaged
communities. The Budget includes more than
$12 million to coordinate implementation of the
Justice40 initiative at impacted agencies. The
Budget bolsters the Environmental Protection
Agency’s (EPA) environment justice efforts by
investing over $1.5 billion across numerous programs that would help create good-paying jobs,
clean up pollution, implement Justice40, advance
racial equity, and secure environmental justice for
communities that too often have been left behind,
28 Building a Better America
including rural and tribal communities. To better
align with this vision, EPA’s Budget structure includes the new Environmental Justice National
Program Manager to help administer this work.
The Budget also provides over $670  million for
EPA’s enforcement and compliance assurance efforts, including funding to implement an enforcement plan for climate and environmental justice
inspections and community outreach. The Budget
invests over $3 billion in DOI programs covered
under the Justice40 initiative, such as tribal
housing improvements, wildlife conservation
grants, and energy infrastructure development
in insular communities. In addition, the Budget
provides DOE with $47  million to strengthen
the Agency’s environmental justice mission,
$100 million to launch a new LIHEAP Advantage
pilot to retrofit low-income homes with efficient
electric appliances and systems, and $31 million
for a new Equitable Clean Energy Transition initiative to help energy and environmental justice
communities navigate and benefit from the transition to a clean energy economy. The Budget
also provides $1.4 million for DOJ to establish an
Office for Environmental Justice to further this
important work.
Supports the Clean Energy Transition in
Rural America. The Budget provides $300 million in new funding for grants, loans, and debt
forgiveness for rural electric providers as they
transition to clean energy, as well as $6.5 billion
in loan authority for rural electric loans, an increase of $1 billion over the 2021 enacted level.
The Budget also provides $20 million to support
the new Rural Clean Energy Initiative, to provide
technical assistance and promote coordination
between USDA, DOE, and DOI that is necessary
to achieve the President’s de-carbonization goals
and ensure clean energy funding is implemented
effectively in rural areas. The Budget also supports multi-agency efforts to integrate sciencebased tools into conservation planning in order
to measure, monitor, report, and verify carbon
sequestration, greenhouse gas reduction, wildlife
stewardship, and other environmental services at
the farm level and on Federal lands. 
Supports Legacy Energy Communities.
The Budget includes over $9 billion in discretionary funding for priority programs and initiatives
across the Federal Government that support economic revitalization and job creation in hard-hit
coal, oil and gas, and power plant communities.
This includes $100 million to support DOL’s role
in the multi-agency POWER+ Initiative, which
aims to assist displaced workers and transform
local economies and communities transitioning away from fossil fuel production to new, sustainable industries. The Budget also includes
$35 million, administered by DOL in partnership
with the Appalachian Regional Commission and
the Delta Regional Authority, to help Appalachian
and Delta communities develop local and regional
workforce development strategies that promote
long-term economic stability and opportunities
for workers, especially those connected to the energy industry.
Upgrades Drinking Water and Wastewater Infrastructure Nationwide. The
Budget provides roughly $4 billion for EPA water
infrastructure programs, an increase of $1  billion over the 2021 enacted level. This includes
full funding of grant programs authorized by the
Drinking Water and Wastewater Infrastructure
Act of 2021, an increase of $160 million over 2021
enacted for EPA’s Reducing Lead in Drinking
Water grant program. Outside of EPA, the Budget
also includes $717 million in direct appropriation
and $1.5 billion in loan level for USDA’s Water
and Wastewater Grant and Loan Program. These
resources would help upgrade drinking water
and wastewater infrastructure nationwide, with
a focus on underserved communities that have
historically been overlooked.
Protects Communities from Hazardous
Waste and Environmental Damage.
Preventing and cleaning up environmental damage that harms communities and poses a risk to
public health and safety is a top Administration
priority. The Budget includes $7.6  billion for
DOE’s Environmental Management program to
support the cleanup of community sites used during the Manhattan Project and Cold War for nuclear weapons production, including $40 million
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 29
for a new initiative to support historically underserved communities. The Budget also provides
$1.2 billion for the Superfund program for EPA
to continue cleaning up some of the Nation’s
most contaminated land, respond to environmental emergencies and natural disasters, and
begin to adjust for revenue from the Superfund
Tax. The Budget also provides $215 million for
EPA’s Brownfields program to enable EPA to provide technical assistance and grants to communities, including disadvantaged communities, so
they can safely clean up and reuse contaminated
properties. These funds complement Brownfields
funding provided in the Bipartisan Infrastructure
Law. These programs also support presidential
priorities such as the Cancer Moonshot Initiative,
by addressing contaminants that lead to greater
cancer risk.
Tackles Per- and Polyfluoroalkyl
Substances (PFAS) Pollution. PFAS are a set
of man-made chemicals that threaten the health
and safety of communities across the Nation, disproportionately impacting historically disadvantaged communities. As part of the President’s
commitment to tackling PFAS pollution, the
Budget provides approximately $126  million,
$57 million over the 2021 enacted level, for EPA
to: increase the understanding of PFAS impacts
to human health, as well as its ecological effects;
restrict use to prevent PFAS from entering the
air, land, and water; and remediate PFAS that
have been released into the environment.
Investing in Innovation
and Climate Science
Improves Climate Data and Forecasting.
The Budget significantly improves the Nation’s
ability to predict extreme weather and climate
events so that American businesses and communities can have accurate and accessible information to allow them to better prepare for
such events. This includes a bold investment of
$2.3  billion for the next generation of weather
satellites at NOAA which would help support the
development of next generation technologies, and
$2.4 billion for the Earth Science program at the
National Aeronautics and Space Administration,
including more than $200 million to develop an
Earth System Observatory that would provide
a three-dimensional, holistic view of Earth to
better understand natural hazards and climate
change. The Budget also provides an additional
$13  million over 2021 enacted levels to bolster
EPA’s abilities to forecast where smoke from wildfires could harm people and communicate where
smoke events are occurring.
Makes Historic Investments in Innovation
and Climate Research. To support the
Administration’s whole-of-Government approach
to tackle the climate crisis, the Budget provides a
historic investment of $17 billion for climate science and innovation, including more than $9 billion to DOE for clean energy research, development and demonstration, an increase of more
than 33 percent over the 2021 enacted level.
Within this total, the Budget provides $700 million for the Advanced Research and Projects
Agency – Energy (ARPA-E) and proposes expanded authority for ARPA-E to more fully address
innovation gaps around adaptation, mitigation,
and resilience to the impacts of climate change.
The Budget provides $913 million at NSF for research to better understand climate change and
its adverse impacts and $500 million for R&D in
clean energy and emission mitigation technologies.  The Budget invests $6  million in USDA’s
climate hubs, a multi-agency undertaking to leverage climate science and increase landowner
awareness of—and engagement in—efforts to
combat climate change. In addition, the overall
budget for DOE’s Office of Science would grow 11
percent over 2021 enacted levels.
Restoring America’s Global
Climate Leadership
Advances the President’s Historic
Climate Pledge. The Budget request includes
over $11  billion in international climate finance, meeting the President’s pledge to quadruple international climate finance a year
early. U.S. international climate assistance and
financing would: accelerate the global energy
30 Building a Better America
transition to net-zero emissions by 2050; help
developing countries build resilience to the
growing impacts of climate change, including
through the President’s Emergency Plan for
Adaptation and Resilience (PREPARE) and
other programs; and support the implementation of the President’s Plan to Conserve Global
Forests: Critical Carbon Sinks. Among these
critical investments are $1.6  billion for the
Green Climate Fund, a critical multilateral tool
for financing climate adaptation and mitigation
projects in developing countries and support
for a $3.2 billion loan to the Clean Technology
Fund to finance clean energy projects in developing countries.
EXPANDING ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY, ADVANCING EQUITY, AND
STRENGTHENING AMERICAN DEMOCRACY
From his first days in office, the President
has pursued an agenda to ensure all Americans
can lead lives of dignity and extend the reach of
America’s promise. To further that agenda, the
Budget includes a range of crucial investments to
help ensure that all Americans can pursue their
potential and fully participate in our economy
and our democracy—improving education and
supporting students; advancing equity, dignity,
and security across our Nation and economy;
expanding housing opportunities; and ensuring
safety and justice and reinvigorating American
democracy.
Improving Education
Makes Historic Investments in HighPoverty Schools. To advance the goal of providing a high-quality education to every student,
the Budget provides $36.5 billion for Title I, more
than doubling the program’s funding compared
to the 2021 enacted level, through a combination
of discretionary and mandatory funding. Title
I helps schools provide students in low-income
communities the learning opportunities and supports they need to succeed. This substantial new
support for the program, which serves 25 million
students in nearly 90 percent of school districts
across the Nation, would be a major step toward
fulfilling the President’s commitment to addressing long-standing funding disparities between
under-resourced schools—which disproportionately serve students of color—and their wealthier
counterparts.
Makes Historic Investments in College
Affordability and Completion. To help lowand middle-income students overcome financial
barriers to postsecondary education, the Budget
proposes to double the maximum Pell Grant by
2029.  This begins with a historic $2,175 increase
for the 2023-2024 school year, compared to the
2021-2022 school year, thereby expanding access
and reaching nearly 6.7  million students. The
Budget would also support strategies to improve
the retention, transfer, and completion of students by investing the Federal TRIO Programs,
Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for
Undergraduate Programs, and new retention and
completion grants. The Budget also invests in
institutional capacity at HBCUs, TCCUs, MSIs,
and low-resourced institutions such as community colleges, by providing an increase of $752 million over the 2021 enacted level. This funding includes $450  million in four-year HBCUs,
TCCUs, and MSIs to expand research and development infrastructure at these institutions.
The Administration also looks forward to working with the Congress on changes to the Higher
Education Act that ease the burden of student
debt, including through improvements to the
Income Driven Repayment and Public Service
Loan Forgiveness programs.
Expands Access to Affordable, HighQuality Early Child Care and Learning. The
Budget provides $20.2 billion for HHS’s early care
and education programs, an increase of $3.3 billion over the 2021 enacted level. This includes
$7.6 billion for the Child Care and Development
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 31
Block Grant, an increase of $1.7 billion over the
2021 enacted level, to expand access to quality,
affordable child care for families. In addition, the
Budget helps young children enter kindergarten
ready to learn by providing $12.2 billion for Head
Start, an increase of $1.5  billion over the 2021
enacted level. The Budget also helps States identify and fill gaps in early education programs by
funding the Preschool Development Grants program at $450 million, an increase of $175 million
over the 2021 enacted level.
Prioritizes the Health and Well-Being of
Students. Disruptions caused by the COVID-19
pandemic continue to take a toll on the physical and mental health of students, teachers, and
school staff. Recognizing the profound effect of
physical and mental health on academic achievement, the Budget includes a $1  billion investment to increase the number of school counselors,
psychologists, social workers, nurses, and other
health professionals in schools.
Increases Support for Children with
Disabilities. The President is committed to
ensuring that children with disabilities receive
the services and support they need to thrive in
school and graduate ready for college or a career.
The Budget provides an additional $3.3  billion
over 2021 enacted levels—the largest two-year
increase ever—for Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act (IDEA) Grants to States, with a
total of $16.3 billion to support special education
and related services for students in grades Pre-K
through 12. The Budget also doubles funding to
$932 million for IDEA Part C grants, which support early intervention services for infants and
families with disabilities that have a proven record of improving academic and developmental
outcomes.
Advancing Equity, Dignity, and Security
Expands Opportunities for Minority- and
Women-Owned Businesses. The Budget provides a $31  million increase over the 2021 enacted level to support women, people of color,
veterans, and other underserved entrepreneurs
through SBA’s Entrepreneurial Development
programs. This bold commitment ensures entrepreneurs have access to counseling, training, and
mentoring services. The Budget also provides
$331 million for the Department of the Treasury’s
Community Development Financial Institutions
(CDFI) Fund, an increase of $61  million, or 23
percent, above the 2021 enacted level. CDFIs
provide historically underserved and often lowincome communities access to credit, capital, and
financial support to grow businesses, increase affordable housing, and reinforce healthy neighborhood development.
Supports Economic Development and
Invests in Underserved Communities. The
Budget provides $3.8 billion for the Community
Development Block Grant program to help communities modernize infrastructure, invest in economic development, create parks and other public amenities, and provide social services. The
Budget includes a targeted increase of $195 million to spur equitable development and the removal of barriers to revitalization in 100 of the
most underserved neighborhoods in the United
States.
Empowers and Protects Workers. To ensure workers are treated with dignity and respect
in the workplace, the Budget invests $2.2 billion,
an increase of $397  million above the 2021 enacted level, in DOL’s worker protection agencies.
Between 2016 and 2020, these agencies lost approximately 14 percent of their staff, limiting
their ability to perform inspections and conduct
investigations. The Budget would enable DOL
to conduct the enforcement and regulatory work
needed to ensure workers’ wages and benefits are
protected, address the misclassification of workers as independent contractors, and improve
workplace health and safety. The Budget also
ensures fair treatment for  millions of workers
by restoring resources to oversee and enforce the
equal employment obligations of Federal contractors, including protections against discrimination
based on race, gender, disability, gender identity,
and sexual orientation.
32 Building a Better America
Reduces Lead and Other Home Health
Hazards for Vulnerable Families. The Budget
provides $400 million, an increase of $40 million
above the 2021 enacted level, for States, local governments, and nonprofits to reduce lead-based
paint and other health hazards in the homes of
low-income families with young children. The
Budget also includes $25 million to address leadbased paint and $60 million to prevent and mitigate other housing-related hazards, such as fire
safety and mold, in Public Housing.
Provides Robust Support for Tribal
Communities. The Budget requests $4.5  billion for DOI tribal programs, more than $1 billion above the 2021 enacted level. These investments would support public safety and justice,
social services, climate resilience, and educational needs to uphold Federal trust responsibilities
and promote equity for historically underserved
communities. This includes a $156  million increase to support reconstruction work at seven
Bureau of Indian Education schools. This funding complements Bipartisan Infrastructure Law
investments to address climate resilience needs
in tribal communities. The Budget proposes to
reclassify Contract Support Costs and Indian
Self-Determination and Education Assistance
Act of 1975 Section 105(l) leases as mandatory
spending, providing certainty in meeting these
ongoing needs through dedicated funding sources. The Budget further proposes to provide mandatory funding to the Bureau of Reclamation
for operation and maintenance of previously enacted Indian Water Rights Settlements, and the
Administration is interested in working with the
Congress on an approach to provide a mandatory
funding source for future settlements. The Budget
also complements Bipartisan Infrastructure Law
investments to address climate resilience needs
in tribal communities with $673 million in tribal
climate funding at DOI.
Advances Child and Family Well-Being in
the Child Welfare System. The Budget proposes to expand and incentivize the use of evidencebased foster care prevention services to keep families safely together and to reduce the number of
children entering foster care. For children who do
need to be placed into foster care, the Budget provides States with support and incentives to place
more children with relatives or other adults who
have an existing emotional bond with the child
and fewer children in group homes and institutions, while also providing additional funding to
support youth who age out of care without a permanent caregiver. The Budget proposes to nearly
double flexible funding for States through the
Promoting Safe and Stable Families program and
proposes new provisions to expand access to legal
representation for children and families in the
child welfare system. The Budget also provides
$100 million in competitive grants for States and
localities to advance reforms that would reduce
the overrepresentation of children and families of
color in the child welfare system, address the disparate experiences and outcomes of these families, and provide more families with the support
they need to remain safely together. In addition,
the Budget provides $215 million for States and
community-based organizations to respond to
and prevent child abuse.
Supports Health and Economic Security
of America’s Seniors and People with
Disabilities. The Budget provides $14.8 billion,
an increase of $1.8 billion above the 2021 enacted
level, to improve services at the Social Security
Administration’s field offices, State disability determination services, and teleservice centers for
retirees, people with disabilities, and their families. At HUD, the Budget supports 2,000 units of
new permanently affordable housing specifically
for seniors and people with disabilities, supporting the Administration’s priority to maximize
independent living for people with disabilities.
The Budget also includes nearly $500  million
to Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
Survey and Certification, a 24-percent increase,
to support health and safety inspections at nursing homes and enhances Medicare for seniors by
expanding behavioral health benefits, eliminating cost sharing for vaccines, and adding coverage
of services from community health workers. The
President also looks forward to working with the
Congress on other policies to improve economic
security and access to healthcare for seniors and
people with disabilities.
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 33
Strengthens the Unemployment Insurance
(UI) Program and Combats Fraud. The UI program has helped millions of Americans through
periods of unemployment during the COVID-19
pandemic. The Budget invests $3.4  billion, an
increase of $769 million above the 2021 enacted
level, to modernize, protect, and strengthen this
critical program. This includes several investments aimed at tackling fraud in the UI program,
including funding to support more robust identity
verification for UI applicants, help States develop
and test fraud-prevention tools and strategies,
and allow the Office of Inspector General to increase its investigations into fraud rings targeting the UI program.
Improves Healthcare, Nutrition Assistance, and Economic Support for Americans
in Puerto Rico and Other Territories. The
President supports: eliminating Medicaid funding caps for Puerto Rico and other Territories
while aligning their matching rate with States;
granting U.S. Territories the option to transition
from current block grants to the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program; and providing
parity to U.S. Territories in the Supplemental
Security Income Program. The Administration
will continue to work with the Congress to advance these policies.
Expanding Housing Opportunity
Expands the Housing Choice Voucher
Program and Enhances Household Mobility.
The Housing Choice Voucher program currently
provides 2.3  million low-income families with
rental assistance to obtain housing in the private
market. The Budget provides $32.1 billion, an increase of $6.4 billion—including emergency funding—over the 2021 enacted level, to maintain
services for all currently assisted families and
to expand assistance to an additional 200,000
households compared to the 2021 level, particularly those who are experiencing homelessness or
fleeing, or attempting to flee, domestic violence or
other forms of gender-based violence. The Budget
also funds mobility-related supportive services to
provide low-income families with greater options
to move to higher-opportunity neighborhoods.
Advances Efforts to End Homelessness.
To prevent and reduce homelessness, the Budget
provides $3.6  billion, an increase of $580  million over the 2021 enacted level, for Homeless
Assistance Grants to meet renewal needs and
expand assistance to nearly 25,000 additional
households, including survivors of domestic violence and homeless youth.
Prevents and Redresses Housing
Discrimination and Supports Access to
Homeownership for First-Generation
Homebuyers. The Budget provides $86 million
in grants to support State and local fair housing
enforcement organizations and bolster education,
outreach, and training on rights and responsibilities under Federal fair housing laws. The Budget
supports access to homeownership for underserved borrowers, including many first-time and
minority homebuyers, through Federal Housing
Administration and Ginnie Mae credit guarantees. The Budget also provides $115 million for
complementary loan and down payment assistance pilot proposals to expand homeownership
opportunities for first-generation and/or lowwealth first-time homebuyers.
Invests in Affordable Housing in Tribal
Communities. Native Americans are seven
times more likely to live in overcrowded conditions and five times more likely to have inadequate plumbing, kitchen, or heating systems than
all U.S. households. The Budget helps address
poor housing conditions in tribal areas by providing $1 billion to fund tribal efforts to expand affordable housing, improve housing conditions and
infrastructure, and increase economic opportunities for low-income families.
Addresses Housing Needs in Rural
America. The Budget includes $1.9  billion for
USDA’s rural housing loan and grant programs,
including increases for the rural multifamily housing programs which would help address housing
insecurity, rent burdens, and the impacts of climate
change in rural America, including through a new
34 Building a Better America
policy requiring construction practices to improve
energy or water efficiency, implement green features, or strengthen climate resilience. The multifamily housing programs would fund the preservation or development of 224 affordable multifamily
housing properties, totaling 11,100 units and provide rental assistance to 270,000 units. USDA’s
single-family housing loans would provide new
homeownership opportunities to 171,000 rural
borrowers. The Budget also provides $39 million
to continue the Rural Partners Network initiative
from 2022, which connects America’s rural communities to a broad range of programs and resources
throughout the Federal Government.
Addressing Violent Crime, Ensuring
Justice, and Strengthening
American Democracy
Invests in Federal Law Enforcement
to Combat Gun Crime and Other Violent
Crime. The Budget once again makes robust
investments to bolster Federal law enforcement
capacity. The Budget includes $17.4  billion, an
increase of $1.7  billion above the 2021 enacted
level, for DOJ law enforcement, including a total
of $1.7 billion for the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco,
Firearms, and Explosives (ATF) to expand multijurisdictional gun trafficking strike forces with
additional personnel, increase regulation of
the firearms industry, enhance ATF’s National
Integrated Ballistic Information Network, and
modernize the National Tracing Center. The
Budget includes $1.8 billion for the U.S. Marshals
Service to support personnel dedicated to fighting
violent crime, including through fugitive apprehension and enforcement operations. The Budget
also provides the Federal Bureau of Investigation
with an additional $69 million to address violent
crime, including violent crimes against children
and crime in Indian Country. In addition, the
U.S. Attorneys are provided with $72.1 million to
prosecute violent crimes.
Supports State and Local Law Enforcement and Community Violence Prevention
and Intervention Programs to Make Our
Neighborhoods Safer. The Budget provides
$3.2 billion in discretionary resources for State
and local grants and $30 billion in mandatory resources to support law enforcement, crime prevention, and community violence intervention.
Reinvigorates Federal Civil Rights
Enforcement. In order to address longstanding
inequities and strengthen civil rights protections,
the Budget invests $367  million, an increase of
$101 million over the 2021 enacted level, in civil
rights protection across DOJ. These resources
support police reform, the prosecution of hate
crimes, enforcement of voting rights, and efforts to
provide equitable access to justice. Investments
also provide mediation and conciliation services
through the Community Relations Service.
Reforms the Federal Criminal Justice
System. The Budget leverages the capacity of
the Federal justice system to advance innovative
criminal justice reform initiatives and serve as a
model for reform that is not only comprehensive
in scope, but evidence-informed and high-impact.
The Budget supports key investments in First Step
Act implementation, including $100 million for a
historic collaboration with the Bureau of Prisons
(BOP), DOJ, and DOL for a national initiative to
provide comprehensive workforce development
services to people in the Federal prison system,
both during their time in the BOP facilities and after they are transferred to community placement.
In support of Federal law enforcement reform and
oversight, the Budget also proposes $106 million
to support the deployment of body-worn cameras
(BWC) to DOJ’s law enforcement officers, as well
as an impact evaluation to assess the role of BWC
in advancing criminal justice reform.
Protects U.S. Elections and the Right to
Vote. As America’s democracy faces threats
across the Nation, the State, county, and municipal governments that run Federal elections have
struggled to obtain resources commensurate with
the improved access and security that voters expect and deserve. Federal funding for the equipment, systems, and personnel that comprise the
Nation’s critical election infrastructure has been
episodic or crisis-driven. To provide State and local election officials with a predictable funding
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 35
stream for critical capital investments and increased staffing and services, the Budget proposes $10 billion in new elections assistance funding
to be allocated over 10 years. The Budget also
proposes to fund an expansion of USPS delivery
capacity in underserved areas and support for
vote-by-mail, including making ballots postagefree and reducing the cost of other election-related mail for jurisdictions and voters.
PUTTING THE NATION ON A SOUND FISCAL AND ECONOMIC COURSE
When the President took office, the COVID-19
pandemic and resulting economic crisis had driven deficits to high levels: $3.1 trillion, or 14.9 percent, of Gross Domestic Product (GDP) in 2020.
Thanks in part to the success of the American
Rescue Plan and the President’s economic strategy, strong economic growth has driven deficits
down dramatically. The Budget projects a deficit
of $1.4 trillion, or 5.8 percent, of GDP for 2022—
less than half the deficit the President inherited
and more than $1 trillion less than the deficit for
2021.
The Budget builds on this progress by proposing smart, targeted, and fully-offset investments
designed to expand economic capacity, spur durable economic growth, create jobs, reduce cost pressures, and foster shared prosperity. The Budget
reflects the President’s belief that growing the
economy from the bottom up and the middle out
creates more growth, higher wages, more jobs,
lower prices, less poverty, and makes it easier to
achieve fiscal sustainability.
The Budget also reflects the President’s commitment to put the Nation on a sound fiscal
course by more than fully offsetting the cost of its
new investments. Overall, the Budget’s policies
would reduce deficits by more than $1 trillion over
10 years through additional tax reforms that ensure corporations and the wealthiest Americans
pay their fair share. Under the Budget policies,
annual deficits would fall further as a share of
the economy, while the economic burden of debt
would stay low.
Paying for Investments through
a Fairer Tax System
The Budget’s investments are more than paid
for through reforms that would create a fairer tax
system.
Proposes a New Minimum Tax on
Billionaires. The tax code currently offers
special treatment for the types of income that
wealthy people enjoy. This special treatment,
combined with sophisticated tax planning and giant loopholes, allows many of the very wealthiest
people in the world to end up paying a lower tax
rate on their full income than many middle-class
households. To finally address this glaring problem, the Budget includes a 20 percent minimum
tax on multi-millionaires and billionaires who so
often pay indefensibly low tax rates. This minimum tax would apply only to the wealthiest 0.01
percent of households—those with more than
$100  million—and over half the revenue would
come from billionaires alone.
Ensures Corporations Pay Their Fair
Share. The Budget also includes an increase to
the rate that corporations pay in taxes on their
profits. Corporations received an enormous tax
break in 2017. While their profits have soared,
their investment in the economy did not. Those
tax breaks did not trickle down to workers or consumers. Instead of allowing some of the most profitable corporations in the world to avoid paying
their fair share, the Budget would raise the corporate tax rate to 28 percent, still well below the
35 percent rate that prevailed for most of the last
several decades. This increase is complemented
by other changes to the corporate tax code that
would incentivize job creation and investment in
36 Building a Better America
the United States and ensure that large corporations pay their fair share.
Prevents Multinational Corporations
from Using Tax Havens to Game the System.
For decades, American workers and taxpayers
have paid the price for a tax system that has
rewarded multinational corporations for shipping jobs and profits overseas. Last year, the
Administration rallied more than 130 countries
to agree to a global minimum tax that will ensure
that profitable corporations pay their fair share
and incentivizes U.S. multinationals to create
jobs and invest in the United States. The Budget
contains additional measures to ensure that multinationals operating in the United States cannot
use tax havens to undercut the global minimum.
Improving the Nation’s Fiscal Outlook
The Budget’s investments boost economic
growth, reduce cost pressures, and promote
shared prosperity in a way that improves the fiscal outlook of the United States and reduces fiscal risks over the long term.
The Administration is on track to becoming the
first in history to reduce the deficit by more than
$1 trillion in a single year. Under the Budget’s
policies, deficits would continue to decline from
recent levels. Deficits would fall from 14.9 percent of GDP in 2020 to 5.8 percent of GDP this
year and then decline further and remain below 5
percent of GDP through the 10-year window.
Moreover, under the Budget’s policies, the
medium-term economic burden of Federal debt
would remain low. Real interest—the Federal
Government’s annual interest payments after adjusting for inflation—directly measures the cost
of servicing the debt: the real resources that are
going toward paying off old debt, instead of investing in the future.
The widespread, persistent, and global phenomenon of interest rates falling even as debt
has risen has meant that the burden associated
with debt over the near and medium term has
decreased. Even as the economy has recovered
and growth has come roaring back, interest rates
remain well below historical averages.
Real interest has averaged about one percent
of the economy since 1980 and was about two percent in the 1990s. Since then, the effective real
interest rate on Federal debt has fallen ten-fold,
from over 4 percent to 0.4 percent in the 2010s.
As a result, real interest has fallen—and real interest costs are expected to remain negative in
2022. The Budget’s economic assumptions anticipate that real interest rates would rise over
the coming decade, using projections in line with
private forecasters. Nevertheless, under these
assumptions, the President’s policies would keep
real interest at or below the historical average
over the coming decade. This means that we
have the capacity to make fully-offset, critical investments that expand the productive capacity of
the economy while also keeping real interest cost
burdens low by historical standards.
At the same time, the United States does face
fiscal challenges over the long term—driven
largely by demographic pressures on health and
retirement programs, an inequitable tax system, and rising healthcare costs. There is also
uncertainty about the interest rate outlook. The
Budget’s proposals prudently address these future challenges by reforming the tax system and
more than paying for all new policies, reducing
deficits over the long run. In total, the Budget
policies reduce deficits by more than $1  trillion
over the next 10 years
Overall, the Budget details an economically
and fiscally responsible path forward—addressing the long-term fiscal challenges facing the
Nation while making investments that produce
stronger economic growth and broadly shared
prosperity well into the future.
37
ENSURING AN EQUITABLE, EFFECTIVE,
AND ACCOUNTABLE GOVERNMENT
THAT DELIVERS RESULTS FOR ALL
Under the President’s leadership, the Nation
is rising to meet the full range of challenges
and opportunities before us. As set forth in
the President’s Management Agenda (PMA),
making the most of this historic moment and
delivering on the President’s agenda also requires strengthening the Government’s capacity to meet the needs of all Americans—toward
a Government that works for people by meeting them where they are. To help deliver that
future, the President’s Budget advances the
goals of the PMA across three key priority areas: strengthening and empowering the Federal
workforce; delivering excellent, equitable, and
secure Federal services and customer experience; and managing the business of Government
to build a better America. This work—including
the investments the Budget puts forward in support of the PMA—is critical for bolstering the
Federal Government’s capacity and capabilities
to deliver for the American people today and for
years to come.
Values in Action
The Administration’s work to further develop
and implement the PMA, including through the
Budget, is guided by values: equity, dignity, accountability, and results. These values guide the
Administration’s work to deliver results for the
public and strengthen the capacity of Federal
agencies. For example, the Budget advances
these values by:
Advancing Equity as a Core Part of
Government Management and DecisionMaking Processes. To support the
Administration’s whole-of-Government approach
to advancing equity, the Budget provides resources to hire Federal agency talent and expertise
needed to help embed equity in agency decisionmaking and policy-making, such as civil rights
legal expertise, human-centered design, public
engagement and participatory design, evaluation
and evidence design, planning and analysis, and
data science. For example, the Budget includes
resources to: expand the Department of Labor’s
Civil Rights Center in order to begin establishing regional offices across the Nation that can be
more responsive to regional equity challenges;
promote greater equity in service delivery at
the Veterans Benefits Administration by placing
evaluation analysts to assess potential disparities among veterans who have historically been
disadvantaged based on their race, ethnicity, sex,
sexual orientation, or gender identity; and help
to bolster the Federal Emergency Management
Agency’s capacity to identify inequities and barriers to access in the application process for disaster assistance.
Treating Every Person with Dignity
and Meeting the American People Where
They Are. The Administration values and respects the inherent dignity of all people. The
Government of the United States is working to
recommit to being “of the people, by the people,
[and] for the people” in order to solve the complex challenges the Nation faces. Through the
PMA and the President’s Executive Order 14058,
“Transforming Federal Customer Experience
and Service Delivery to Rebuild Trust in
Government,” the Administration has developed
an accountability framework for designing and
delivering services with a focus on the actual
38 ENSURING AN EQUITABLE, EFFECTIVE, AND ACCOUNTABLE GOVERNMENT
experience of the people whom Federal agencies
are meant to serve. The Budget supports agencies conducting activities in support of this framework, including building increased mechanisms
for providing feedback and input from the public
into the work of the Government, hiring for the
skills and expertise required to conduct human
centered design, and forming interagency teams
to tackle pain points from the lens of how people
experience the Government’s role in important
events in their lives.
Managing Federal Funding with Accountability and Integrity. The Administration is
committed to improving program integrity and
ensuring effective stewardship of taxpayer dollars, including through implementation of the
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (American
Rescue Plan) and the Infrastructure Investment
and Jobs Act (Bipartisan Infrastructure Law). To
deliver on those commitments, the Administration
has provided comprehensive guidance to Federal
agencies to ensure coordinated and consistent approaches to fostering program integrity and delivering on the intended outcomes for financial assistance programs. In addition, as the President
has made clear, results and accountability go
hand-in-hand. To that end, the Administration
is committed to collaborating with the Congress
and the oversight community, including Offices
of Inspectors General and the U.S. Government
Accountability Office, as appropriate, and across
various sectors and levels of the Government.
Also, the Administration will apply its commitment to accountability and transparency to implementation of the resources provided by the
President’s Budget as well, through sound financial management and a focus on delivering effective and equitable funding.
Managing the Government to Deliver
Results that Improve Lives. As part of the
Administration’s commitment to deliver results
for all, Federal agencies have worked with external stakeholders and their own workforces to create four-year strategic plans that define mission
success, as well as two-year Agency Priority Goals
(APGs), reflecting each agency’s top implementation priorities. Concurrent with the President’s
Budget, Federal agencies have identified strategic goals, strategic objectives, and APGs that
reflect the bottom line of the Government advancing outcomes across key Administration priorities, including improving customer experience,
advancing equity, combatting climate change,
improving the Nation’s infrastructure, and meeting the health, welfare, and economic challenges of the COVID-19 pandemic. In addition, the
Office of Management and Budget (OMB) has
deployed Cross-Agency Priority (CAP) Goals to
establish cross-cutting targets that cover a limited number of mission and management areas
where Government-wide direction will be helpful
to drive collective action on these cross-cutting issues. The public will be able to follow progress toward PMA priorities, agency strategic plans, and
APGs, on https://Performance.gov, which will be
updated quarterly.
Strengthening and Empowering
the Federal Workforce
The strength of any organization rests on its
people. As the Nation’s largest employer, more
than four million Americans work for the Federal
Government, both at home in the United States
and overseas. Those serving in Government today are dedicated and talented professional public servants. That is why the President has taken
significant steps to protect, empower, and rebuild the career Federal workforce, and why the
President charged the White House Task Force
on Worker Organizing and Empowerment with
developing steps to augment the voice of frontline
Federal workers. The Budget makes further investments in the Federal workforce by providing
agencies with new tools to help win the competition for highly-skilled talent. The Budget builds
on this work and advances the first PMA priority—strengthening and empowering the Federal
workforce—by:
Making Every Federal Job a Good
Job, Where All Employees are Engaged,
Supported, Heard, and Empowered. Federal
agencies must cultivate the passion of their employees and empower them to advance agency
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 39
missions—and the Federal Government must be
a model employer with respect to worker organizing, collective bargaining, and labor-management
partnership. The voices of Federal employees
are critical to agency management, which is why
the Administration is strengthening the annual
Federal Employee Viewpoint Survey and piloting a Government-wide pulse survey of Federal
employees. These efforts will help agencies retain qualified employees, empower workers to
make their agencies better, create a pipeline of
qualified leaders, and provide better services to
the public. The Budget supports these objectives
by ensuring that all those in Federal jobs earn at
least $15 per hour and providing a pay increase
of 4.6 percent for civilian and military personnel.
The Budget also supports the Office of Personnel
Management (OPM) and agencies’ ability to answer the President’s call for agencies to lead by
example in supporting worker organizing and
collective bargaining.
Helping Agencies Attract and Hire Talent
that Reflect America’s Diversity across the
Federal Government. Federal agencies are focused on attracting more people to Federal service
over the long term, while also addressing immediate
agency hiring needs to rebuild capacity. The Federal
Government is continuing to implement practices to
hire based on skills rather than educational qualifications alone. Certain agency hiring practices are
changing, including applicant assessment methods,
to ensure that those most capable of performing the
role do not get needlessly overlooked because they do
not have a college degree. Agencies are also aligning
with the Government-wide Strategic Plan to Advance
Diversity, Equity, Inclusion, and Accessibility in the
Federal Workforce, including through efforts to develop cultures within agencies that can foster a
more diverse, equitable, inclusive, and accessible
environment. To support hiring surges necessary
to deliver on the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law
and streamline hiring practices across the Federal
Government, the Budget includes resources to help
Federal agencies increase capacity for recruiting
and talent management. This includes continued
support for agency “talent teams” in each of the 24
Chief Financial Officers Act agencies. Given that
internships can introduce students and those in
the early stages of their careers to public service,
the Budget prioritizes internships and equitable access to internships. Developing pipelines for internships would also be prioritized around the Nation
through a reinvigorated vision and funding model
for Federal Executive Boards, to ensure a pulse on
the Federal impact in communities and support
Federal employees and agencies across the Nation.
The Budget also provides resources to support new
requirements for personnel vetting and the Trusted
Workforce 2.0 Initiative, which is designed to ensure
all Americans can trust the Federal workforce to
protect people, property, information, and mission.
Reimagining and Building a Roadmap
to the Future of Federal Work. The Federal
Government has an opportunity to reimagine the
way Federal employees work. By utilizing expanded flexibilities in work arrangements such
as: expanded telework and alternative work
schedules; increased adoption of technology, such
as cloud computing collaboration tools; and automation supported by information technology investments in the Budget the Government can enhance its ability to recruit and retain top talent,
staying competitive with broader trends in how
Americans work. A changing world has proven
that innovation is possible in the way Federal
employees work and operate, including changing needs and uses for Federal workplaces, which
agencies will continue to evaluate and assess.
Building the Personnel System and
Support Required to Sustain the Federal
Government as a Model Employer. As the
Government faces increasingly complex challenges, the need for Federal leaders, managers,
and front-line staff with the right skills in the
right jobs has never been greater. To meet this
need, the Budget supports OPM in enhancing
its ability to lead Federal human capital management, and serve as a central, strategic leader
in Federal human resources, in alignment with
OPM’s Strategic Plan. In support of this work,
the Budget requests $418 million, a $88 million
increase over the 2021 enacted level, for OPM’s
Salaries and Expenses account, its primary discretionary appropriation. This funding would
support staffing to enhance customer service
40 ENSURING AN EQUITABLE, EFFECTIVE, AND ACCOUNTABLE GOVERNMENT
provided by OPM to Federal agencies, allowing
further collaboration in support of the Federal
Government’s strategic workforce planning and
talent acquisition functions.
Delivering Excellent, Equitable,
and Secure Federal Services
and Customer Experience
Every interaction between the Government
and the public is an opportunity to deliver the
value and competence Americans expect and deserve. The American people rely on Federal services to support them through disasters, advance
their businesses, provide opportunities for their
families, safeguard their rights, and help rebuild
their communities. That is why the President
signed Executive Order 14058 that will help
agencies center services around those who use
them—toward delivering simple, secure, effective,
equitable, and responsive solutions. The Budget
advances these efforts and the second PMA priority—delivering excellent, equitable, and secure
Federal services and customer experience—by:
Improving the Service Design, Digital
Products, and Customer-Experience Management of Federal High-Impact Service
Providers. The Budget supports Federal High
Impact Service Providers—those services that
serve the largest percentage of people, conduct
the greatest volume of transactions annually,
and have an outsized impact on the lives of the
individuals they serve. Focusing on these highimpact services would yield capabilities, tools,
and practices that cascade to other Federal programs and services Government-wide. For example, the Budget includes an additional $2 million to build the Office of Customer Experience at
the U.S. Department of Agriculture, which would
improve delivery of critical programs for farmers, producers, and ranchers, as well as support
for the nutrition of more than six million participants in the Women, Infants, and Children program. The Budget supports the Small Business
Administration’s efforts to establish baseline
customer experience measures for application
processes across the Agency’s loan, grant, and
contracting programs, as well as streamlining the
online disaster assistance application experience.
The Budget also includes resources to advance
customer experience efforts at the Department of
Housing and Urban Development, to help deliver
on the President’s housing priorities, including
eliminating barriers that restrict housing and
neighborhood choice, furthering fair housing, and
providing redress to those who have experienced
housing discrimination. In addition, the Budget’s
investments in digital modernization would allow the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service to enable
Americans to access more permits online, and the
Budget would help the Transportation Security
Administration expand the use of innovative
technologies to reduce passenger wait times at
airport security checkpoints. The Budget also
invests in the Social Security Administration’s
efforts to make it easier for individuals to file
for Social Security retirement benefits, apply for
replacement Social Security cards, and apply for
need-based Supplemental Security Income disability payments. In addition, the Budget would
also provide $2.7  billion to the Department of
Education’s Office of Federal Student Aid to provide better support to student loan borrowers
by implementing customer experience improvements and ensuring the successful transition
from the current short-term loan servicing contracts into a more stable long-term contract and
servicing environment.
Designing, Building, and Managing
Government Service Delivery for Key Life
Experiences that Reach across Federal
Agencies. When a person experiences a disaster, loses a job, or faces another key moment in
their lives, Federal Government services should
meet them where they are instead of forcing
them to navigate Government siloes. By better
coordinating service delivery based on the life
experience of the customer, instead of around existing funding streams or organizational structures, Government can better serve the public.
The Budget advances these efforts by providing
funding for interagency teams to simplify the
process of accessing Government services, such
as, services for those surviving a natural disaster,
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 41
approaching retirement, having a child, and navigating supports after a financial shock.
Enabling Simple, Seamless, and Secure
Customer Experiences across High Impact
Service Providers. The Budget supports efforts to develop shared products, services, and
standards while designing safe and secure products that better meet customer needs. For example, these resources would support efforts at
the Departments of Veterans Affairs and Defense
to provide streamlined login credentials for servicemembers to access the benefits they have
earned through their service as they transition
to veterans status, as well as a $61 million increase over the 2021 enacted level for the Federal
Citizen Services Fund at the General Services
Administration (GSA) to power shared products
and platforms that enable simple, seamless, and
secure services across the Federal Government.
As part of this request, GSA is investing an additional $35 million in the Public Experience
Portfolio to continue to evolve USA.gov to deliver
a seamless public experience when transacting
with the Government and provide the public an
optimal experience when seeking voting resources on https://Vote.gov.
Managing the Business of Government
The Federal Government influences and reshapes markets, supports key supply chains,
drives technological advances, and supports domestic manufacturing. This scale creates an opportunity to leverage Federal systems for managing the business of Government—the goods and
services the Government buys and the financial
assistance and resources it provides and oversees—to create and sustain good quality union
jobs, address persistent wealth and wage gaps,
and tackle other challenges. The Administration
has taken bold action to leverage Federal acquisition, financial assistance, and financial management systems to take on some of the Nation’s
most pressing challenges. That is why the Budget
supports improvements that would make continued progress and improvements in these systems.
The Budget supports this work and advances the
third PMA priority—managing the business of
Government—by:
Ensuring the Future is Made in America
by America’s Workers. The Administration
is working to ensure that Federal resources and
programs advance domestic jobs and industries.
Two recent examples of that work include the creation of a new review process to ensure Made in
America waivers are transparent and consistently applied and a change in the Buy American Act
rule for procurement to increase domestic content.  The Made in America Office within OMB
will continue its work with Federal agencies to
maximize the use of Federal procurement and
assistance on domestic goods and services that
provide good value while strengthening the U.S.
industrial base in critical sectors and creating
good-paying jobs and economic opportunities in
communities across the Nation.
Leveraging Federal Contracting as a
Catalyst to Drive Clean Energy Solutions,
Support American Jobs, and Advance
Equity. Federal agencies spent over $619 billion in 2021 through millions of contracts for
goods and services, providing an opportunity to
transform the marketplace in ways that mitigate
the effects of climate change, bolster American
manufacturing, and increase opportunities for
small disadvantaged businesses (SDBs) and
other small businesses in underserved communities. The Administration is leveraging Federal
procurement power to move toward a clean energy future, including 100 percent carbon pollution-free Federal electricity on a net annual basis by 2030, 100 percent zero-emission vehicle
acquisitions by 2035, and a net-zero emissions
in the Federal building portfolio by 2045. The
Administration is also using the Federal acquisition system to increase the procurement of
Made in America products to support domestic
manufacturing, including through greater transparency in agency acquisition plans so domestic
providers can help meet agency requirements,
and a new Government-wide acquisition regulation that establishes an aggressive schedule
to raise domestic content to 75 percent by 2029.
In addition, the Administration is taking steps
42 ENSURING AN EQUITABLE, EFFECTIVE, AND ACCOUNTABLE GOVERNMENT
through Federal acquisitions to better disclose
and mitigate the risks that climate change poses
in Federal contracting. Agencies are taking aggressive actions to increase contract awards to
SDBs and other underserved entrepreneurs to
advance the President’s commitment to break
down barriers and build generational wealth for
underserved communities through procurement
and contracting. This includes increasing contract awards for SDBs from just over 10 percent
to 15 percent of total Federal contract spend by
2025. Agencies will continue to apply category
management principles for common goods and
services to ensure strong stewardship of taxpayer
dollars, supported by increased use of business
intelligence and data analytics. The President
has directed the Administration to explore additional actions that strengthen the United States
as a buyer, improving the efficiency and effectiveness of the Federal procurement system, including, for example, by utilizing approaches such as
skills-based hiring, Registered Apprenticeship,
and work-based learning.
Supporting Ongoing Improvements
to Federal Government Capabilities
and Systems in Support of the PMA
The Budget also supports ongoing improvements to Federal Government capabilities that
support an equitable, effective, and accountable
Government by:
Modernizing Federal Information
Technology (IT) Systems and Strengthening
Federal Data Capabilities. The Administration
continues to prioritize the modernization of
Federal IT systems to better deliver agency mission and services to the American public in an
effective, efficient, and secure manner.  This includes continued efforts by Federal agencies to
leverage, utilize, and implement data as a resource and strategic asset, with focus on opening data, advancing equity through data collection, use, and management, and data sharing,
accountability, and transparency in support of
Administration priorities. The Budget supports
the interagency driving data sharing practices
project that promotes data sharing activities in
support of the Administration’s priorities on racial equity and climate. To support IT modernization efforts, the Budget also includes an additional $300 million for the Technology Modernization
Fund (TMF). In the first tranche of TMF awards
funded by the American Rescue Plan, the TMF
Board invested $187 million in Login.gov, a secure sign-on service used by over 30 million citizens and businesses that: supports easy access
to over 200 Government services spanning 27
agencies; reduces Government costs; prevents
fraud; and protects individual privacy. This first
tranche of TMF investments also is contributing
to protecting the data and privacy of 100 million students and borrowers, two million civilian Federal employees, and millions of users of
Government-wide shared services, as well as the
security of hundreds of Federal facilities.
Bolstering Federal Cybersecurity. The
Budget funds a strategic shift in the defense of
Federal infrastructure and service delivery, better positioning agencies to guard against sophisticated adversaries. The Budget provides for
investments across Federal agencies that align
them to foundational cybersecurity practices and
priorities as outlined in Executive Order 14028,
“Improving the Nation’s Cybersecurity.” This includes funding to facilitate the ongoing transition
to a “zero trust” approach, which would enable
agencies to more rapidly detect, isolate, and respond to cyber threats. To support these efforts, the
Budget provides $2.5 billion to the Cybersecurity
and Infrastructure Security Agency, a $486 million increase above 2021 enacted, to: maintain
critical cybersecurity capabilities implemented in
the American Rescue Plan; expand network protection throughout the Federal Executive Branch;
and bolster support capabilities, such as cloud
business applications, enhanced analytics, and
stakeholder engagement. The Budget also supports the Office of the National Cyber Director,
which would improve national coordination in the
face of escalating cyber attacks on Government
and critical infrastructure.
Promoting Evidence-Based Policymaking
and Decision Making in Federal Agencies.
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 43
The President has made clear that the
Administration will make decisions guided by
the best available science and data, which requires the Federal Government to foster and
strengthen a culture of evidence where generation and use is routine and integrated across all
agency functions. The Budget’s investments have
been informed by existing evidence of effectiveness. The Budget also includes investments to
build evidence in critical areas where it is lacking and invests in agency capacity to execute
priority studies, including those identified in
publicly posted Learning Agendas and Annual
Evaluation Plans required by the Foundations for
Evidence-Based Policymaking Act of 2018. The
Budget’s investments in statistical infrastructure recognize the importance of Federal statistics in strengthening the evidence base. New investments also support cross-agency evaluation
efforts aligned with Administration priorities,
where policy and programmatic solutions span
agencies and functions.

45
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Bolsters the Nation’s Frontline Defenses against Catastrophic Wildfires. Protecting
communities, ecosystems, and infrastructure from wildfire requires a resilient and reliable
Federal workforce. The Budget provides nearly $4.9 billion for Forest Service Wildland Fire
Management, including $2.2 billion for the Wildfire Suppression Operations Reserve Fund.
The Budget also upholds the President’s commitment that no Federal firefighter would
make less than $15 an hour, increases the size of the Federal firefighting workforce, and provides critical technological support for wildfire detection and response, including FireGuard
satellite imagery. The Budget also complements investments provided in the Bipartisan
Infrastructure Law to reduce the risk and severity of wildfires through smart investments in
Forest Service hazardous fuels management and ecosystem restoration.
• Builds a Fair and Resilient Food Supply Chain. The Budget strengthens market oversight through investments in the Agricultural Marketing Service and the Animal and Plant
Health Inspection Service, resulting in competitive meat and poultry product prices for
American families and increased protection against invasive pests and zoonotic diseases.
These programs build on the pandemic and supply chain assistance funding in the American
Rescue Plan Act of 2021 to address pandemic-related vulnerabilities in the food system and
create new market opportunities and good-paying jobs.
• Spurs Climate Research. To support the Administration’s whole-of-Government approach to
tackle the climate crisis, the Budget invests $24 million in USDA’s climate hubs, a multi-agency
The U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) is responsible for providing nutrition assistance
to low-income Americans and income support for the farm sector, and for conserving and
preserving the Nation’s forests and private agricultural lands. The President’s 2023 Budget for
USDA: invests in tackling the climate crisis while mitigating its ongoing impacts on communities;
strengthens the food supply chain and nutrition safety net; advances environmental justice;
creates new jobs and opportunities in rural communities; supports underserved farmers and
producers; and restores America’s advantage in agriculture.
The Budget requests $28.5 billion in discretionary funding for USDA, a $4.2 billion or 17.1-percent
increase from the 2021 enacted level, excluding Food for Peace Title II Grants, which is included
in the State and International Programs total. Resources provided through the 2023 Budget
complement investments in conservation, forest management, and broadband deployment
provided in the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Bipartisan Infrastructure Law).
46 Department of Agriculture
undertaking to leverage climate science and increase landowner awareness of—and engagement
in—efforts to combat climate change. The Budget also supports multi-agency efforts to integrate
science-based tools into conservation planning in order to measure, monitor, report, and verify
carbon sequestration, greenhouse gas reduction, wildlife stewardship, and other environmental services at the farm level and on Federal lands. In addition, the Budget increases funding for priority
climate research and for innovative mechanisms to incentivize the adoption of innovative agricultural practices and open new markets for climate-smart commodities at scale, while complementing
actions being undertaken by stakeholders and the private sector.
• Advances Equity and Environmental Justice. The Budget supports the Administration’s ongoing work to advance racial justice and provide more equitable program delivery. Certain USDA
programs and initiatives, such as High Cost Energy grants, Rural Energy for America grants
and loan guarantees, Private Lands Conservation Operations, Urban Agriculture, and Water and
Wastewater direct loans, would support the President’s Justice40 Initiative, which directs that
at least 40 percent of the overall benefits from climate and clean energy investments be directed
to historically disadvantaged communities. In addition, the Budget includes $39 million for the
Rural Partners Network, which would connect America’s rural communities to a broad range of
programs and resources throughout the Federal Government. The Budget also provides $31 million for USDA’s Office of Civil Rights, an increase of $9 million over the 2021 enacted level.
• Addresses Climate Change and Housing Insecurity in Rural Communities. The
Budget provides $1.8 billion for USDA multifamily housing programs, an increase of $259 million from the 2021 enacted level, including over twice the loan level as in 2021. This significant
investment would help address housing insecurity, rent burdens, and the impacts of climate
change in rural America, including through a new policy requiring construction practices to
improve energy or water efficiency, implement green features, or facilitate climate resilience.
• Helps Rural Communities Transition to Clean Energy. Rural communities are critical to achieving the goal of transitioning to 100 percent zero carbon electricity by 2035. The
Budget provides $300 million in new funding for grants, loans, and debt forgiveness for rural
electric providers as they transition to clean energy. The Budget also provides $6.5 billion in
loan authority for rural electric loans, an increase of $1 billion over the 2021 enacted level, to
support additional clean energy, energy storage, and transmission projects that would create
good-paying jobs and meet the ambitious climate progress that science demands. In addition,
the Budget includes $15 million in new funding to support the creation of the Rural Clean
Energy Initiative to help achieve the President’s decarbonation goals and ensure clean energy
funding is implemented effectively in rural areas.
• Restores America’s Advantage in Agriculture. American farmers must be able to leverage
new technologies to compete in world markets. The Budget provides $4 billion, $644 million
above the 2021 enacted level, for USDA’s research, education, and outreach programs, including $315 million targeted to under-served populations.
• Connects All Americans to High-Speed, Affordable, and Reliable Internet. The
President is committed to ensuring that every American has access to broadband. High-speed
internet strengthens rural economies, and the work of installing broadband creates high-paying union jobs. Building on the $2 billion for USDA broadband programs provided in the
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law, the Budget provides $600 million for the ReConnect program,
which provides grants and loans to deploy broadband to unserved areas, especially tribal areas.
The Budget also provides $25 million to help rural telecommunications cooperatives refinance
their Rural Utilities Service debt and upgrade their broadband facilities.
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 47
• Protects America’s Food Supply. The Budget provides $1.2 billion for the Food Safety and
Inspection Service (FSIS), an increase of $134 million from the 2021 enacted level. This funding would enable the hiring of more inspectors and Public Health Veterinarians, which would
increase the strength and flexibility of FSIS to provide inspection services so that meat and
poultry producers would be better able to respond to market demands and provide safe and
healthy food products. The Budget is providing targeted funds to support smaller producers
so that they may increase their production capacity, which in turn would create a more diverse
food supply chain.
• Invests in Tribal Communities. The Budget invests $62 million for agriculture research,
education, and extension grants to tribal institutions; $7 million to assist Native Americans
with home ownership through the Single-Family Housing Native American Community
Development Financial Institutions Re-lending Program, and $7 million to support Native
American farmers and ranchers through the Intertribal Assistance Network. In addition,
through the Tribal Forest Protection Act of 2004 and other authorities, the Forest Service
would make initial investments of at least $11 million in 2023 to increase equity and expand
tribal self-governance, allowing Tribes to participate in restoration activities under agreements and contracts.
• Supports a Strong Nutrition Safety Net. The Budget provides $6.8 billion for critical
nutrition programs, including $6 billion for the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for
Women, Infants, and Children, to help vulnerable families put healthy food on the table and
address racial disparities in maternal and child health outcomes.
• Supports Economically Distressed Farmers. USDA is committed to examining barriers
faced by all underserved borrowers, especially those in economic distress, beginning farmers,
and veterans. The Administration is interested in working with the Congress on legislative
changes that would ease the debt burden for economically distressed farm loan borrowers to
achieve a robust and competitive agriculture sector.
• The 2023 Farm Bill. The Administration looks forward to working this year with the Congress,
partners, stakeholders, and the public to identify shared priorities for the 2023 Farm Bill
that position USDA to live up to its moniker as “the People’s Department” and deliver on its
mission to serve all Americans by providing effective, innovative, science-based public policy
leadership in agriculture, food and nutrition, natural resource protection and management,
and rural development. The Administration also looks forward to working with the Congress
to address climate change through climate-smart agriculture and forestry and investments
in renewable energy that open new market opportunities and provide a competitive advantage for American producers of climate-smart commodities, including small and historically
underserved producers and early adopters, and through voluntary incentives to reduce climate risk. The 2023 Farm Bill is also a critical opportunity to ensure that the wealth created
in rural America stays there and to empower rural communities with the tools necessary to
advance their locally-led vision. In addition, USDA’s nutrition programs are among the most
far-reaching tools available to improve health and well-being and to ensure that all Americans
have access to healthy, affordable food. This is an important moment to reconsider barriers
to food assistance for vulnerable groups that are likely undermining their chances of success,
including low-income college students, individuals reentering society and seeking a second
chance, youth who have aged out of foster care, kinship families, and low-income individuals
in the U.S. Territories.

49
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Strengthens the Nation’s Supply Chains through Domestic Manufacturing. To help
ignite a resurgence of American manufacturing, the Budget provides $372 million, an increase of $206 million from the 2021 enacted level, for the National Institutes of Standards
and Technology’s (NIST) manufacturing programs. These resources would help launch two
additional Manufacturing Innovation Institutes in 2023 and continue support for two institutes funded in 2022 as part of the Administration’s growing Manufacturing USA network,
which brings together industry, academia, and Government to accelerate manufacturing innovation and commercialization. The Budget also expands the Manufacturing Extension
Partnership, providing an increase of $125 million to make America’s small and medium
manufacturers more competitive and to ensure that the future is made in all of America by
all of America’s workers. The Budget also provides $11 million to the International Trade
Administration (ITA) to build analytical capacity in meeting new requirements on supply
chain resilience across the manufacturing and services industries, as well as $5 million for
the Bureau of Economic Analysis (BEA) to develop new data tools to measure American competitiveness in global supply chains.
• Revitalizes Coal Communities and Other Economically Distressed Communities.
To foster investment and economic revitalization in communities impacted by the transition
from fossil fuel to a clean energy economy, the Budget provides more than $70 million in new
funding to the Economic Development Administration (EDA) to create jobs and drive growth
in economically distressed communities. This funding would allow EDA to more than double
its Assistance to Coal Communities initiative. The Budget also provides $50 million for
The Department of Commerce (Commerce) is responsible for: promoting job creation; supporting
and overseeing international trade; and providing economic, environmental, and scientific
information needed by businesses, citizens, and governments. The President’s 2023 Budget
for Commerce makes historic investments to strengthen domestic supply chains, help American
entrepreneurs bring their products to the market, support minority business development, tackle
the climate crisis, and promote opportunity and safety in space.
The Budget requests $11.7 billion in discretionary funding for Commerce, a $2.8 billion or
31.2-percent increase from the 2021 enacted level. Resources provided through the 2023
Budget complement major investments in broadband Internet access and climate resilience
through the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Bipartisan Infrastructure Law).
50 Department of Commerce
an EDA pilot program to address structural prime-age employment gaps and boost competitiveness in persistently distressed communities through innovative, flexible, and locally-led
grants.
• Supports Minority-Owned Business to Narrow Racial Wealth Gaps. The Budget elevates the stature and increases the capacity of the Minority Business Development Agency
by providing the full $110 million authorized in the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law. This funding would bolster services provided to minority-owned enterprises by expanding the Business
Center program, funding Rural Business Centers, opening new regional offices, and supporting innovative initiatives to foster economic resiliency.
• Creates New Markets for American Goods by Expanding Economic Engagement
Abroad. The Budget provides an additional $26 million from the 2021 enacted level to bolster commercial diplomacy and enhance export promotion through a targeted expansion of the
Foreign Commercial Service at the ITA. With this funding, Commerce would augment staff to
assist American businesses seeking to increase exports abroad, navigate new foreign markets,
or find market opportunities. These activities would focus on areas of high economic and geostrategic value, including the Indo-Pacific.
• Responds to the Impacts of Climate Change and Extreme Weather. The Budget invests
$6.9 billion in the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), an increase of
$1.4 billion from the 2021 enacted level, supporting programs that would catalyze wind energy,
restore habitats, protect the oceans and coasts, and improve NOAA’s ability to predict extreme
weather associated with climate change. This includes $45 million to support NOAA’s role in
deploying 30 gigawatts of offshore wind energy by 2030, and a $30 million increase in funding
for marine sanctuaries and other marine protected areas to assess and address climate change
impacts. The Budget also supports the Administration’s America the Beautiful initiative, and
$92 million for expanded climate competitive research grants. Through a bold investment of
$2.3 billion in the next generation of weather satellites, the Budget also provides a robust and
predictable long-term funding strategy to develop new weather detection capabilities to help
plan for extreme weather events.
• Safeguards America’s Burgeoning Space Industry. The Budget expands opportunities
for civil space situational awareness and supports the long-term sustainability of the space
environment by committing $88 million, a $78 million increase from the 2021 enacted level,
for the Office of Space Commerce in order to improve real-time tracking and reporting of space
objects and debris, helping the space industry safely navigate a congested space environment.
The Budget also provides $2 million for BEA to develop new data tools to measure the space
economy.
• Advances Key Emerging Technologies and U.S. Leadership in International
Standards Development. The Budget supports U.S. industry competing in the global communications market by providing $13 million for cutting-edge advanced communications research
and engineering at the National Telecommunications and Information Administration. The
Budget also includes a $187 million increase for research initiatives at NIST that would focus
on developing standards to accelerate adoption of critical and emerging technologies with a
focus on artificial intelligence, quantum science, and advanced biotechnologies. As part of this
investment, the Budget includes an $8 million increase to strengthen U.S. leadership in international standards development for critical and emerging technologies.
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 51
• Secures the American Economy and American’s Sensitive Data against Foreign
Threats. The Budget strengthens the Nation’s national and economic security by protecting the information and communications technology (ICT) supply chain and improving the
security of the commercial cyber ecosystem. This includes a $36 million increase to review
ICT transactions that pose an undue risk to the United States, and an enforcement program
to deter and mitigate foreign malicious cyber-enabled activities. The Budget also provides
the Bureau of Industry and Security (BIS) with a $30 million increase to advance national
security and secure trade by bolstering BIS’s ability to implement and enforce export controls.
In addition, BIS monitors industrial base and supply chain trends with regard to critical and
emerging technologies, such as microelectronics.
• Supports Evidence-Based Policymaking. The Budget supports evidence-based policy
making and strengthens the ability of the Census Bureau to deliver reliable, high-quality data
and innovative statistical products that improve understanding of the Nation’s people and
economy. The Budget includes $408 million to finalize and evaluate the Decennial Census
and lay the groundwork for a successful 2030 Census and $141 million for BEA to support the
production of vital economic indicators such as Gross Domestic Product. In 2023, BEA will
transition the prototype Annual National and Annual State Distribution of Personal Income
measures into regular production, providing policymakers and the public with crucial new
information about how families across the income distribution spectrum are faring.

53
DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Supports United States’ European Allies and Partners. The Budget supports Ukraine,
the United States’ strong partnerships with North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) allies, and other European partner states by bolstering funding to enhance the capabilities and
readiness of U.S. forces, NATO allies, and regional partners in the face of Russian aggression.
• Promotes Integrated Deterrence in the Indo-Pacific and Globally. The Budget proposes $773 billion for DOD. To sustain and strengthen deterrence, the Budget prioritizes China
as the Department’s pacing challenge. DOD’s 2023 Pacific Deterrence Initiative highlights
some of the key investments the Department is making that are focused on strengthening
deterrence in the Indo-Pacific region. DOD is building the concepts, capabilities, and posture
necessary to meet these challenges, working in concert with the interagency and U.S. allies
and partners to ensure U.S. deterrence is integrated across domains, theaters, and the spectrum of conflict.
• Counters Persistent Threats. While focused on maintaining robust deterrence against
China and Russia, the Budget also enables DOD to counter other persistent threats including those posed by North Korea, Iran, and violent extremist organizations.
• Modernizes the Nuclear Deterrent. The Budget maintains a strong, credible nuclear
deterrent, as a foundational aspect of integrated deterrence, for the security of the Nation
and U.S. allies. The Budget supports the U.S. nuclear triad and the necessary ongoing nuclear modernization programs, to include the nuclear command, control, and communication
networks.
The Department of Defense (DOD) is responsible for the military forces needed to safeguard
U.S. vital national interests. The President’s 2023 Budget for DOD provides the resources
necessary to sustain and strengthen U.S. deterrence, advancing our vital national interests
through integrated deterrence, campaigning, and investments that build enduring advantages.
The Budget: supports America’s servicemembers and their families; strengthens alliances and
partnerships; preserves America’s technological edge; bolsters economic competitiveness; and
combats 21st Century security threats.
The Budget requests $773 billion in discretionary funding for DOD, a $69 billion or 9.8-percent
increase from the 2021 enacted level. This two-year growth enables DOD to make the
investments necessary to execute the Administration’s Interim National Security Strategic
Guidance and forthcoming National Security Strategy and National Defense Strategy.
54 Department of Defense
• Advances U.S. Cybersecurity. The Budget invests in cybersecurity programs to protect the Nation from malicious cyber actors and cyber campaigns. These priorities include
strengthening cyber protection standards for the defense industrial base and investing in the
cybersecurity of DOD networks.
• Takes Care of Servicemembers and the DOD Civilian Workforce. The Budget invests
in America’s servicemembers and civilian workforce with robust 4.6 percent pay raises—the
largest in a generation—and addresses economic insecurity by funding a newly authorized
basic needs allowance. The Budget also continues to combat the COVID-19 pandemic.
• Fulfills America’s Commitment to Military Families. Military families are key to the
readiness and well-being of the All-Volunteer Force, and therefore are critical to national security. The Budget supports military families by prioritizing programs that directly support
military spouses, children, caregivers, survivors, and other dependents.
• Strengthens Programs to Prevent and Respond to Sexual Assault. The Budget fully
funds DOD’s implementation of the recommendations of the Independent Review Commission
on Sexual Assault in the Military to improve the Department’s ongoing work to enhance accountability, prevention, climate and culture, and victim care and support. Examples of these
efforts include the establishment of a violence prevention workforce and enabling servicemembers who experience sexual harassment to access services from a sexual assault victim
advocate. The Budget also supports the establishment of an independent Office of Special Trial
Counsel in each military department, as required under the National Defense Authorization
Act for Fiscal Year 2022, to carry out changes to the military justice process for handling
sexual assault, domestic violence, and other serious crimes.
• Promotes Climate Resilience and Energy Efficiency to Support Warfighting
Operations. It is vital to examine the security implications of climate-induced extreme
weather and to adapt DOD platforms and military installations to protect mission critical capabilities. The Budget supports efforts to plan for and mitigate the impacts of climate change
and improve the resilience of DOD facilities and operations. The Budget invests in power and
energy performance, which makes U.S. forces more agile, efficient, and survivable in this complex and changing environment.
• Enhances Biodefense and Pandemic Preparedness. The Budget provides robust funding for programs that support the Administration’s biodefense and pandemic preparedness
priorities as outlined in U.S. biodefense and pandemic preparedness strategies and plans,
including the Office of the Assistant Secretary for Health Affairs, Chemical and Biological
Defense Program, and Biological Threat Reduction Program. The Budget supports enhanced
investments in medical countermeasures, including vaccines, diagnostics, and therapeutics
research and manufacturing; clinical research and testing; early warning and real-time monitoring; biosafety and biosecurity; and threat reduction activities with global partners.
• Builds the Air Forces Needed for the 21st Century. The Budget procures a mix of highly
capable aircraft while continuing to make investments in the fighter, bomber, and training
aircraft of the future. Investing in this mix of aircraft provides an opportunity to reduce the
future fleet’s operational costs while increasing its resiliency and flexibility to meet future
threats.
• Optimizes U.S. Naval Shipbuilding. Maintaining U.S. naval power is critical to reassuring
allies and deterring potential adversaries. The Budget proposes executable and responsible
investments in the U.S. Navy fleet. In addition, the Budget continues the recapitalization of
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 55
the Nation’s strategic ballistic missile submarine fleet while also investing in the submarine
industrial base.
• Supports a Ready and Modern Army. The Budget maintains a ready Army capable of
responding globally as part of the Joint Force through investments in Army modernization
initiatives, force posture improvements, and deterrence capabilities.
• Invests in Long-Range Fire Capabilities. The safety and security of the Nation requires a
strong, sustainable, and responsive mix of long-range strike capabilities. The Budget invests
in the development and testing of hypersonic strike capabilities while enhancing existing longrange strike capabilities to bolster deterrence and improve survivability.
• Increases Space Resilience. Space is vital to U.S. national security and integral to modern
warfare. The Budget maintains America’s advantage by improving the resilience of U.S. space
architectures to bolster deterrence and increase survivability during hostilities.
• Ensures Readiness. The Budget continues to ensure that U.S. Soldiers, Sailors, Airmen,
Marines, and Guardians remain the best trained and equipped fighting force in the world. At
the same time, the Budget strengthens and empowers DOD’s civilian workforce as a critical
contributor to the Nation’s security.
• Optimizes Force Structure. In line with the forthcoming National Defense Strategy, the
Budget optimizes force structure to build a Joint Force that is lethal, resilient, sustainable,
survivable, agile, and responsive. The Budget supports DOD’s plan to responsibly upgrade
capabilities by redirecting resources to cutting edge technologies in high-priority platforms.
Some force structure is too costly to maintain and operate, and no longer provides the capabilities needed to address the current and future national security challenges. The Budget
enables DOD to reinvest savings associated with optimized force structure to higher priority
investments.
• Supports Defense Research and Development and the Defense Technology Industrial
Base. DOD plays a critical role in overall Federal research and development that spurs innovation, yields high-value technology, ensures American dominance over strategic competitors,
and creates good-paying jobs. The Budget prioritizes defense research, development, test,
and evaluation funding to invest in breakthrough technologies that drive innovation, support
capacity in the defense technology industrial base, ensure American technological leadership,
and underpin the development of next-generation defense capabilities.
• Strengthens the U.S. Supply Chain and Industrial Base. The Budget invests in key
technologies and sectors of the U.S. industrial base such as microelectronics, casting and forging, and critical materials.
• Empowers Small Disadvantaged Businesses and Underserved Communities. The
Budget advances equity and supports small disadvantaged businesses and underserved communities. DOD will continue to explore opportunities to serve the American people, with a
focus on these communities, through supplier and contracting operations.

57
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
The President’s 2023 Budget:
K-12 Education
• Makes Historic Investments in High-Poverty Schools. To advance the goal of providing a high-quality education to every student, the Budget provides $36.5 billion for Title I,
including $20.5 billion in discretionary funding and $16 billion in mandatory funding, which
more than doubles the program’s funding compared to the 2021 enacted level. Title I helps
schools provide students in low-income communities the learning opportunities and support
they need to succeed. This substantial new support for the program, which serves 25 million
students in nearly 90 percent of school districts across the Nation, would be a major step
toward fulfilling the President’s commitment to address long-standing funding disparities
between under-resourced schools—which disproportionately serve students of color—and
their wealthier counterparts.
• Prioritizes the Health and Well-Being of Students. Disruptions caused by the COVID-19
pandemic continue to take a toll on the physical and mental health of students, teachers, and
school staff. Recognizing the profound effect of physical and mental health on academic
achievement, the Budget includes a $1 billion investment to increase the number of counselors, nurses, school psychologists, social workers, and other health professionals in schools.
• Increases Support for Children with Disabilities. The President is committed to ensuring that children and youth with disabilities receive the services and support they need to
thrive in school and graduate ready for college or a career. The Budget provides an additional
$3.3 billion from the 2021 enacted level—the largest two-year increase ever—for Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) grants to States, with a total of $16.3 billion to support special education and related services for students in grades Pre-K through 12. The
The Department of Education assists States, school districts, and institutions of higher education
in providing a high-quality education to all students and addressing the inequitable barriers
underserved students face in education. The President’s 2023 Budget for the Department of
Education makes historic investments in the Nation’s future prosperity: increases aid for highpoverty schools; meets the needs of students with disabilities; and expands access to higher
education.
The Budget requests $88.3 billion in discretionary funding for the Department of Education, a
$15.3 billion or 20.9-percent increase from the 2021 enacted level.
58 Department of Education
Budget also doubles funding to $932 million for IDEA Part C grants, which support early
intervention services for infants and families with disabilities that have a proven record of improving academic and developmental outcomes. The increased funding would support States
in implementing critical reforms to expand their enrollment of underserved children, including children of color, children from low-income families, and children living in rural areas.
The increase also includes $200 million to expand and streamline enrollment of children at
risk of developing disabilities, such as children born with very low-birth weight or who have
been exposed to environmental toxins, which would help mitigate the need for more extensive
services later in childhood and further expand access to the program for underserved children. The Budget also more than doubles funding to $250 million for IDEA Part D Personnel
Preparation grants to support a pipeline of special educators at a time when the majority of
States are experiencing a shortage of special educators.
• Supports Full Service Community Schools. Community schools play a critical role in providing comprehensive wrap-around services to students and their families, from afterschool
to adult education opportunities, and health and nutrition services. The Budget includes
$468 million for this program, an increase of $438 million from the 2021 enacted level. The increase would also help school districts implement integrated student supports to meet student
and family mental health needs through partnerships with community-based organizations
and other entities.
• Invests in Education Recruitment and Retention. While the education sector has faced
shortages in critical staffing areas for decades, the COVID-19 pandemic and tight labor market has made shortages worse, which has negatively impacted students and fallen hardest on
students in underserved communities. The Budget includes $514 million for the Education
Innovation and Research program, $350 million of which the Department would target toward
identifying and scaling models that improve recruitment and retention of staff in education.
Such models include those that would improve support for educators and provide teacher access to leadership opportunities that improve teacher retention and maximize the impact of
great teachers beyond their classrooms.
• Supports Multi-Language Learners. Students learning English as a second language were
disproportionately impacted by the multiple transitions to and from remote learning during
the COVID-19 pandemic. The Budget would provide $1.1 billion for the English Language
Acquisition (ELA) program, an increase of $278 million, or 35 percent, from the 2021 enacted
level, including additional funding to provide technical assistance and build local capacity to
better support multilanguage learners and their teachers. The ELA program helps students
learning English attain English proficiency and achieve academic success.
• Fosters Diverse Schools. The segregation of students by race and income undermines the
promise that public schools provide an equal opportunity for all students to learn and succeed.
The Budget includes $100 million for a grant program to help communities develop and implement strategies to promote racial and socioeconomic diversity in their schools.
Education Beyond High School
• Makes Historic Investments in College Affordability and Completion. To help low- and
middle-income students overcome financial barriers to postsecondary education, the Budget
proposes to double the maximum Pell Grant by 2029. This begins with a historic $2,175
increase for the 2023-2024 school year compared to the 2021-2022 school year, thereby expanding access and reaching nearly 6.7 million students. The Budget would also support strategies
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 59
to improve the retention, transfer, and completion rates of students by investing in the Federal
TRIO Programs, Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs, and
new retention and completion grants.
• Increases Funding for Historically Black Colleges and Universities (HBCUs), Tribally
Controlled Colleges and Universities (TCCUs), Minority-Serving Institutions (MSIs),
and Community Colleges. The Budget would increase institutional capacity at HBCUs,
TCCUs, MSIs, and low-resourced institutions, including community colleges, by providing an
increase of $752 million from the 2021 enacted level. This funding includes $450 million for
four-year HBCUs, TCCUs, and MSIs to expand research and development infrastructure at
these institutions.
• Invests in Services for Student Borrowers. The Budget provides $2.7 billion to the
Department of Education’s Office of Federal Student Aid (FSA), an $800 million, or 43-percent,
increase compared to the 2021 enacted level. This additional funding is needed to provide
better support to student loan borrowers. Specifically, the increase allows FSA to implement
customer service improvements to student loan servicing and to ensure the successful transition from the current short-term loan servicing contracts into a more stable long-term contract
and servicing environment.
Office for Civil Rights
• Strengthens Civil Rights Enforcement. The Budget provides $161 million to the
Department of Education’s Office for Civil Rights, an 18-percent increase compared to the
2021 enacted level. This additional funding would ensure that the Department has the capacity to protect equal access to education through the enforcement of civil rights laws, such as
Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972.

61
DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Enables Progress toward Climate Goals. The Budget supports investments in research,
development, demonstration, and deployment, which are central to enabling achievement
of the Administration’s climate goals of a 50- to 52-percent reduction from 2005 levels in
economy-wide net greenhouse gas pollution in 2030 and zero emissions economy-wide by no
later than 2050.
• Creates Jobs through Support for Clean Energy Infrastructure. The Budget invests
$2.1 billion to support clean energy workforce and infrastructure projects across the Nation,
including: $502 million to weatherize and retrofit low-income homes; $150 million to electrify tribal homes and transition tribal colleges and universities to renewable energy; and
$90 million for a new Grid Deployment Office to build a grid that is more reliable and resilient and that integrates accelerating levels of renewable energy. In addition, the Budget
includes $58 million to launch the Net-Zero Labs Initiative, competitively selecting clean energy deployment projects across the national laboratories. These investments would create
good-paying jobs while driving progress toward the Administration’s climate goals, including
the President’s goal of carbon pollution-free electricity by 2035.
• Tackles the Climate Crisis through Clean Energy Innovation. To support U.S. preeminence in developing innovative technologies that accelerate the transition to a clean energy
economy, the Budget invests $9.2 billion in DOE clean energy research, development, and
demonstration, an increase of more than 33 percent from the 2021 enacted level. These
investments strengthen clean energy-enabling transmission and distribution systems, decarbonize transportation, advance carbon management technologies, improve energy efficiency
The Department of Energy (DOE) is responsible for supporting the Nation’s prosperity by
addressing its climate, energy, environmental, and nuclear security challenges through
transformative science and technology solutions. The President’s 2023 Budget for DOE: invests
in domestic clean energy manufacturing; advances environmental justice; tackles the climate
crisis; and modernizes and ensures the safety and security of the nuclear weapons stockpile.
The Budget requests $48.2 billion in discretionary funding for DOE, a $6.3 billion or 15.1-percent
increase from the 2021 enacted level. Resources provided through the 2023 Budget complement
major investments in clean energy demonstrations, advanced manufacturing, grid infrastructure,
and low-income home weatherization funded in the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act
(Bipartisan Infrastructure Law).
62 Department of Energy
in industry and buildings, and secure the availability of high-assay low-enriched uranium.
Funding would also leverage the tremendous innovation capacity of the national laboratories,
universities, and entrepreneurs to transform America’s power, transportation, buildings, and
industrial sectors to achieve a net-zero emissions economy by 2050.
• Strengthens Domestic Clean Energy Manufacturing. Meeting the challenge of climate
change will require a dramatic scale-up in domestic manufacturing of key climate and clean
energy equipment, providing opportunities for U.S. workers. Across the $11.3 billion in discretionary DOE clean energy investments described above, the Budget reflects the importance
of strategically supporting the U.S. domestic manufacturing base through innovation, technical assistance, and training. Specifically, the Budget includes $200 million for a new Solar
Manufacturing Accelerator that would help create a robust domestic manufacturing sector
capable of meeting the Administration’s solar deployment goals without relying on imported goods manufactured using unacceptable labor practices. The Budget also funds a new
ManufacturingUSA institute and increases support for Industrial Assessment Centers, giving
students valuable experience conducting energy audits for small and medium-sized manufacturers. In addition, the Budget also proposes a $1 billion mandatory investment to launch a
Global Clean Energy Manufacturing effort that would build resilient supply chains for climate
and clean energy equipment through engagement with allies, enabling an effective global response to the climate crisis while creating economic opportunities for the United States to
increase its share of the global clean technology market.
• Advances Environmental Justice and Equity. The Budget provides historic support
for underserved communities, including: $34 million for the Office of Economic Impact and
Diversity to play a critical role in implementing the Department’s Justice40 efforts and equity action plan; $40 million in new resources for capacity building assistance in areas of
persistent poverty around the Department’s cleanup sites; and $13 million for the Office of
Legacy Management to strengthen its environmental justice mission. New programs, including Funding for Accelerated, Inclusive Research, would train and support a diverse and
inclusive scientific workforce for the future. In addition, the newly established Office of State
and Community Programs would launch Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program
Advantage with a $100 million pilot to retrofit low-income homes with efficient electric appliances and systems; and the Office of Energy Efficiency and Renewable Energy would lead a
$31 million Equitable Clean Energy Transition initiative to build capacity and provide technical assistance to help energy and environmental justice communities navigate and benefit
from the transition to a clean energy economy. These investments would build healthy, culturally vibrant, sustainable, and resilient communities.
• Supports Energy Communities. The Budget provides $893 million for DOE’s Office of Fossil
Energy and Carbon Management to advance technologies that can provide economic revitalization opportunities in energy communities. This includes dedicated funding for the Interagency
Working Group on Coal and Power Plant Communities and Economic Revitalization to coordinate interagency efforts and stakeholder engagement across at least 10 Federal agencies.
This interagency effort would expand the delivery of Federal resources to those communities
affected by the energy transition.
• Advances Transformational Clean Energy and Climate Solutions. The Budget provides $700 million for the Advanced Research and Projects Agency – Energy (ARPA-E). This
investment in high-potential, high-impact research and development would help remove
the technological barriers to advance energy and environmental missions. The Budget also
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 63
proposes expanded authority for ARPA-E to more fully address innovation gaps around adaptation, mitigation, and resilience to the impacts of climate change.
• Invests in Research and Innovation. The Budget provides a historic investment of $7.8 billion for the Office of Science to support cutting-edge research at the national laboratories and
universities to: advance the Nation’s understanding of climate change; identify and accelerate
novel technologies for clean energy solutions; provide new computing insight through quantum
information science and artificial intelligence that would address scientific and environmental
challenges; leverage data, analytics, and computational infrastructure to strengthen pandemic
preparedness in support of U.S. biodefense and pandemic preparedness strategies and plans;
and support the Nation’s leading scientific user facilities. New programs would promote U.S.
leadership in the industries of the future, including biotechnology and biomanufacturing, and
support the Cancer Moonshot initiative.
• Reduces Health and Environmental Hazards for At-Risk Communities. The Budget
includes $7.6 billion for the Environmental Management program to support the cleanup of
communities used during the Manhattan Project and Cold War for nuclear weapons production. The Administration would ensure that investments in the remediation of legacy soil and
groundwater contamination provide benefits to disadvantaged communities.
• Strengthens the Nation’s Nuclear Security, Biological Security, and Cybersecurity.
The Budget supports a safe, secure, and effective nuclear stockpile by robustly funding investments in the recapitalization of the National Nuclear Security Administration’s physical
infrastructure and essential facilities to modernize the U.S. nuclear deterrent. The Budget
also increases funding for: key arms control and nuclear nonproliferation and counterterrorism programs; the Naval Nuclear Propulsion Program, which designs, builds, operates,
maintains, and manages the reactor systems of the naval nuclear fleet; and biosecurity innovation, as well as highly-skilled staff capacity to carry out these missions. The Budget also
invests in energy-sector cybersecurity through the Office of Cybersecurity, Energy Security,
and Emergency Response.

65
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Accelerates Innovation through the Advanced Research Projects Agency for Health
(ARPA-H). The Budget proposes a major investment of $5 billion for ARPA-H, significantly
increasing direct Federal research and development spending in health. With an initial focus
on cancer and other diseases such as diabetes and dementia, this major investment would
drive transformational innovation in health research and speed application and implementation of health breakthroughs. Funding for ARPA-H, along with additional funding for the
National Institutes of Health, total a $49 billion request to continue to support research that
enhances health, lengthens life, reduces illness and disability, and spurs new biotechnology
productions and innovation.
• Advances the Cancer Moonshot Initiative. The Budget proposes investments in ARPA-H,
the National Cancer Institute, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), and
the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) to accelerate the rate of progress against cancer by
working toward reducing the cancer death rate by at least 50 percent over the next 25 years
and improving the experience of people who are living with or who have survived cancer.
• Transforms Mental Healthcare. Mental health is essential to overall health, and the
United States faces a mental health crisis that has been exacerbated by the COVID-19 pandemic. To address this crisis, the Budget proposes reforms to health coverage and major
investments in the mental health workforce. For people with private health insurance, the
Budget requires all health plans to cover mental health benefits and ensures that plans
have an adequate network of behavioral health providers. For Medicare, TRICARE, the
The Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) is responsible for protecting the health
and well-being of Americans through its research, public health, and social services programs.
The President’s 2023 Budget for HHS invests in: mental healthcare and suicide prevention;
healthcare access and outcomes for vulnerable populations; health research and innovation;
public health systems and pandemic preparedness; ending the HIV/AIDS epidemic; social service
equity; access to child care and early learning programs; and support services for survivors of
domestic violence.
The Budget requests $127.3 billion in discretionary funding for HHS, a $26.9 billion or 26.8-
percent increase from the 2021 enacted level, excluding amounts requested for the Indian Health
Service (IHS), which the Budget proposes to shift from discretionary to mandatory funding. This
request includes appropriations for 21st Century Cures Act and program integrity activities.
66 Department of Health and Human Services
Department of Veterans Affairs healthcare system, health insurance issuers, group health
plans, and the Federal Health Employee Benefit Program, the Budget lowers patients’ costs
for mental health services. The Budget also requires parity in coverage between behavioral health and medical benefits, and expands coverage for behavioral health providers under
Medicare. The Budget invests in increasing the number of mental health providers serving
Medicaid beneficiaries, as well as in mental health workforce development and service expansion, including at primary care clinics and non-traditional sites. The Budget also provides
sustained and increased funding for community-based centers and clinics, including a State
option to receive enhanced Medicaid reimbursement on a permanent basis. In addition, the
Budget makes historic investments in youth mental health and suicide prevention programs
and in training, educational loan repayment, and scholarships that help address the shortage of behavioral health providers, especially in underserved communities. The Budget also
strengthens access to crisis services by building out the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline,
which will transition from a ten-digit number to 988 in July 2022.
• Commits to Ending the HIV/AIDS Epidemic. The National HIV/AIDS Strategy for the
United States 2022–2025 commits to a 75-percent reduction in HIV infection by 2025. To
meet this ambitious target and ultimately end the HIV/AIDS epidemic in the United States,
the Budget includes $850 million across HHS to aggressively reduce new HIV cases, increase
access to pre-exposure prophylaxis (also known as PrEP), and ensure equitable access to services and supports for those living with HIV. This includes increasing access to PrEP among
Medicaid beneficiaries, which is expected to improve health and lower Medicaid costs for HIV
treatment. The Budget also proposes a new mandatory program to guarantee PrEP at no
cost for all uninsured and underinsured individuals, provide essential wrap-around services
through States, IHS, tribal entities, and localities, and establish a network of community providers to reach underserved areas and populations.
• Guarantees Adequate and Stable Funding for IHS. As part of the Administration’s
commitment to honor the United States’ trust responsibility to tribal nations and strengthen
the Nation-to-Nation relationship, the Budget significantly increases IHS’s funding over time,
and shifts it from discretionary to mandatory funding. For the first year of the proposal, the
Budget includes $9.1 billion in mandatory funding, an increase of $2.9 billion from the 2021
enacted level. After the first year, IHS funding would automatically grow to keep pace with
healthcare costs and population growth and gradually close longstanding service and facility
shortfalls. By providing IHS stable and predictable funding, the proposal would improve access to high-quality healthcare, rectify historical underfunding of the Indian health system,
reduce existing facility backlogs such as the Healthcare Facilities Construction Priority List,
address health inequities, and modernize IHS’ electronic health record system. This proposal
has been informed by consultations with tribal nations on the issue of mandatory funding and
will be refined based on ongoing consultation.
• Prepares for Future Pandemics and Advances Health Security for Other Biological
Threats. While combatting the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, the United States must catalyze advances in science, technology, and core capabilities to prepare the Nation for the next
biological threat and strengthen U.S. and global health security. The Budget makes transformative investments in pandemic preparedness and biodefense across HHS public health
agencies—$81.7 billion available over five years—to enable an agile, coordinated, and comprehensive public health response to future threats, and to protect American lives, families
and the economy. The Budget provides $40 billion to the Office of the Assistant Secretary for
Preparedness and Response to invest in advanced development and manufacturing of vaccines,
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 67
therapeutics, and diagnostics for high priority threats. The Budget provides $28 billion for
CDC to enhance public health system infrastructure, domestic and global threat surveillance,
public health workforce development, public health laboratory capacity, and global health security. The Budget provides $12.1 billion to NIH for: research and development of vaccines,
diagnostics, and therapeutics against high priority biological threats; biosafety and biosecurity research and innovation to prevent biological incidents; and safe and secure laboratory
capacity and clinical trial infrastructure. The Budget also includes $1.6 billion for FDA to
expand and modernize regulatory capacity information technology and laboratory infrastructure to support the evaluation of medical countermeasures. Further, the Budget encourages
the development of innovative antimicrobial drugs through advance market commitments for
critical-need antimicrobial drugs.
• Builds Advanced Public Health Systems and Capacity. The Budget includes $9.9 billion
in discretionary funding to build capacity at CDC and at the State and local levels, an increase
of $2.8 billion over the 2021 enacted level. These resources would: improve the core immunization program; expand public health infrastructure in States and Territories and strengthen
the public health workforce; support efforts to modernize public health data collection; including at the Center for Forecasting and Outbreak Analytics; and conduct studies on long COVID
conditions to inform diagnosis and treatment options. In addition, to advance health equity,
the Budget invests in CDC programs related to viral hepatitis, youth mental health, and sickle
cell disease. To address gun violence as a public health epidemic, the Budget invests in community violence intervention and firearm safety research.
• Expands Access to Vaccines. The Budget establishes a new Vaccines for Adults (VFA) program, which would provide uninsured adults with access to all vaccines recommended by the
Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices at no cost. As a complement to the successful
Vaccines for Children (VFC) program, the VFA program would reduce disparities in vaccine
coverage and promote infrastructure for broad access to routine and outbreak vaccines. The
Budget would also expand the VFC program to include all children under age 19 enrolled in
the Children’s Health Insurance Program and consolidate vaccine coverage under Medicare
Part B, making more preventive vaccines available at no cost to Medicare beneficiaries.
• Advances Maternal Health and Health Equity. The United States has the highest maternal mortality rate among developed nations, and rates are disproportionately high for Black
and American Indian and Alaska Native women. The Budget includes $470 million to: reduce
maternal mortality and morbidity rates; expand maternal health initiatives in rural communities; implement implicit bias training for healthcare providers; create pregnancy medical
home demonstration projects; and address the highest rates of perinatal health disparities, including by supporting the perinatal health workforce. The Budget also extends and increases
funding for the Maternal, Infant, and Early Childhood Home Visiting program, which serves
approximately 71,000 families at risk for poor maternal and child health outcomes each year,
and is proven to reduce disparities in infant mortality. To address the lack of data on health
disparities and further improve access to care, the Budget strengthens collection and evaluation of health equity data. Recognizing that maternal mental health conditions are the most
common complications of pregnancy and childbirth, the Budget continues to support the maternal mental health hotline and the screening and treatment for maternal mental depression
and related behavioral disorders.
• Expands Access to Healthcare Services for Low-Income Women. The Budget provides
$400 million, an increase of nearly 40 percent from the 2021 enacted level, to the Title X
Family Planning program, which provides family planning and other healthcare to low-income
68 Department of Health and Human Services
communities. This increase in Title X funding would improve overall access to vital reproductive and preventive health services and advance gender and health equity.
• Expands Access to Affordable, High-Quality Early Child Care and Learning. The
Budget provides $20.2 billion for HHS’s early care and education programs, an increase of
$3.3 billion, or 19 percent, from the 2021 enacted level. This includes $7.6 billion for the Child
Care and Development Block Grant, an increase of $1.7 billion from the 2021 enacted level
to expand access to quality, affordable child care for families across the Nation. In addition,
the Budget helps young children enter kindergarten ready to learn by providing $12.2 billion
for Head Start, an increase of $1.5 billion from the 2021 enacted level. The Budget also helps
States identify and fill gaps in early education programs by funding the Preschool Development
Grants program at $450 million, an increase of $175 million from the 2021 enacted level.
• Advances Child and Family Well-Being in the Child Welfare System. The Budget proposes to expand and incentivize the use of evidence-based foster care prevention services to
keep families safely together and to reduce the number of children entering foster care. For
children who do need to be placed into foster care, the Budget provides States with support
and incentives to place more children with relatives or other adults who have an existing emotional bond with the children and fewer children in group homes and institutions, while also
providing additional funding to support youth who age out of care without a permanent caregiver. The Budget proposes to nearly double flexible funding for States through the Promoting
Safe and Stable Families program, and proposes new provisions to expand access to legal
representation for children and families in the child welfare system. The Budget also provides
$100 million in competitive grants for States and localities to advance reforms that would
reduce the overrepresentation of children and families of color in the child welfare system,
address the disparate experiences and outcomes of these families, and provide more families
with the support they need to remain safely together. Further, the Budget provides $215 million for States and community-based organizations to respond to and prevent child abuse.
• Supports Survivors of Domestic Violence and Other Forms of Gender BasedViolence. The Budget proposes significant increases to support and protect survivors of
gender-based violence, including $519 million for the Family Violence Prevention and Services
(FVPSA) program to support domestic violence survivors—more than double the 2021 enacted level. This amount continues funding availability for FVPSA-funded resource centers,
including those that support the Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, Queer, and Intersex
community. The Budget would provide additional funding for domestic violence hotlines and
cash assistance for survivors of domestic violence, as well as funding to support a demonstration project evaluating services for survivors at the intersection of housing instability,
substance use coercion, and child welfare. In addition, the Budget would provide over $66 million for victims of human trafficking and survivors of torture, an increase of nearly $21 million
from the 2021 enacted level.
• Supports America’s Promise to Refugees. The Budget provides $6.3 billion to the Office
of Refugee Resettlement (ORR). This funding would help rebuild the Nation’s refugee resettlement infrastructure and support the resettling of up to 125,000 refugees in 2023. The Budget
would also help ensure that unaccompanied immigrant children are unified with relatives
and sponsors as safely and quickly as possible and receive appropriate care and services while
they are in ORR’s custody. The Budget makes additional investments in services, including expanded access to counsel to help children navigate complex immigration court proceedings, and
enhanced case management and post-release services. The Budget also includes mandatory
investments in the Unaccompanied Children (UC) program, including a multiyear contingency
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 69
fund that would automatically provide additional resources when there are large increases in
UC referrals, and a proposal to scale up to universal UC legal representation. The Budget
redresses past wrongs by providing resources for critical reunification services—including
trauma-related and mental health services—to children and families unduly separated from
each other through policies of the previous administration.
• Supports Families Struggling with Home Energy and Water Bills. The Budget provides $4 billion, a $225 million increase from the 2021 enacted level, for the Low Income
Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP). LIHEAP helps families access home energy and
weatherization assistance, vital tools for protecting vulnerable families’ health in response to
extreme weather and climate change. As part of the Justice40 pilot, HHS plans to increase efforts to prevent energy shutoffs and increase support for households with young children and
older people, and high energy burdens. Since the Low Income Household Water Assistance
Program (LIHWAP) expires at the end of 2023, the Budget proposes to expand LIHEAP to
advance the goals of both LIHEAP and LIHWAP. Specifically, the Budget increases LIHEAP
funding and gives States the option to use a portion of their LIHEAP funds to provide water
bill assistance to low-income households.

71
DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY
 The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Bolsters Federal Cybersecurity and Critical Infrastructure Security. The Budget
provides $2.5 billion to the Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency (CISA), a
$486 million increase from the 2021 enacted level, to maintain critical cybersecurity capabilities implemented in the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, expand network protection
throughout the Federal Executive Branch, and bolster support capabilities, such as cloud
business applications, enhanced analytics, and stakeholder engagement. The Budget also
provides significant enhancements across DHS to modernize protection of systems, networks,
assets, and information, as required by Executive Order 14028, “Improving the Nation’s
Cybersecurity.” In addition to bolstering Federal cybersecurity, the Budget includes funding
to ensure safe and secure elections, build and maintain critical public-private partnerships,
enhance critical infrastructure protection, and prioritize and reinforce CISA’s role as the national risk manager.
• Enhances Natural Disaster Resilience. The Budget provides $3.5 billion for DHS’s climate resilience programs. This includes $507 million, a $93 million increase from the 2021
enacted level, for the Federal Emergency Management Agency’s (FEMA) flood hazard mapping program to incorporate climate science and future risks. The Budget also makes robust
investments in FEMA’s hazard mitigation grant programs, including the Building Resilient
Infrastructure and Communities grant program, which helps communities build resilience
against natural disasters, including disadvantaged communities who are disproportionately
at risk from climate crises.
The Department of Homeland Security (DHS) is responsible for safeguarding the American
people by: preventing terrorism and countering domestic violent extremism; securing and
managing U.S. borders; administering and enforcing U.S. immigration laws; defending and
securing Federal cyberspace and critical infrastructure; and ensuring disaster resilience,
response, and recovery. The President’s 2023 Budget for DHS advances key Administration
priorities by: investing in climate resilience; research and development; Federal cybersecurity;
maritime security; and secure and humane border management. The Budget also enhances
DHS’s capacity to prepare for and respond to pandemics and other biological threats.
The Budget requests $56.7 billion in discretionary funding for the Department of Homeland
Security, a $2.9 billion or 5.4-percent increase from the 2021 enacted level. Resources provided
through the 2023 Budget complement investments in cybersecurity, hazard mitigation, and others
areas provided in the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Bipartisan Infrastructure Law).
72 Department of Homeland Security
• Expands U.S. Coast Guard (USCG) Capabilities. The Budget provides $11.5 billion for
the USCG, a $564 million increase from the 2021 enacted level, to address emerging national
security concerns and goals. This includes expanding USCG cyber operations capacity to protect and respond to cyber threats in the maritime sector, as well as expanding its presence
in the Pacific, the Atlantic, and the Arctic—including procuring a commercially available icebreaker. These efforts would expand the capabilities of partners and deepen U.S. ties in each of
the above-mentioned regions in order to strengthen maritime security and governance, which
would protect economic activity and counter transnational criminal organizations.
• Upgrades Research Laboratory Infrastructure. The Budget makes historic investments
in research and development infrastructure, providing $89 million to improve and modernize
laboratories in the DHS Science and Technology Directorate (S&T). This funding would allow
S&T to replace and enhance mission-critical equipment, make necessary information technology improvements, and allow DHS to construct the Detection Sciences Testing and Applied
Research Center, which would enable DHS to more efficiently and effectively test and evaluate
threat screening devices and counter homemade explosives to further secure transportation
systems and other public venues.
• Modernizes Transportation Security Administration (TSA) Pay and Workforce
Policies. The Budget provides a total of $7.1 billion for TSA pay and benefits, an increase of
$1.6 billion from the 2021 enacted level, to compensate TSA employees at rates comparable
to their peers in the Federal workforce. By establishing salary parity with other Federal employees, the Budget addresses retention issues faced by the Transportation Security Officer
workforce, improving service delivery. The Budget also supports expanding TSA workforce
access to labor benefits such as collective bargaining and merit systems protection. These enhancements support the President’s commitment to fostering diversity, equity, and inclusion
in the Federal workforce.
• Ensures a Safe, Humane, and Efficient Immigration System. The Administration is
committed to ensuring the U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS) meets its mission administering the Nation’s lawful immigration system and safeguarding its integrity and
promise by efficiently and fairly adjudicating requests for immigration benefits. The Budget
provides $765 million in discretionary funding for USCIS to: efficiently process increasing
asylum caseloads; address the backlog of applications for work authorization, naturalization,
adjustment of status, and other immigration benefits; and improve refugee processing.
• Improves Border Processing and Management. The Budget provides $15.3 billion
for the U.S. Customs and Border Protection and $8.1 billion for the U.S. Immigration and
Customs Enforcement to enforce immigration law, further secure U.S. borders and ports of entry, and effectively manage irregular migration along the Southwest border, including through
$309 million in modern border security technology and $494 million for noncitizen processing
and care costs.
73
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
URBAN DEVELOPMENT
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Expands the Housing Choice Voucher Program and Enhances Household Mobility.
The Housing Choice Voucher program currently provides 2.3 million low-income families with
rental assistance to obtain housing in the private market. The Budget provides $32.1 billion,
an increase of $6.4 billion (including emergency funding) over the 2021 enacted level, to
maintain services for all currently assisted families and to expand assistance to an additional 200,000 households, particularly for those who are experiencing homelessness or fleeing,
or attempting to flee, domestic violence or other forms of gender-based violence. The Budget
also funds mobility-related supportive services to provide low-income families with greater
options to move to higher-opportunity neighborhoods.
• Increases Affordable Housing Supply. To address the critical shortage of affordable
housing in communities throughout the Nation, the Budget provides nearly $2 billion for
the HOME Investment Partnerships Program (HOME), an increase of $600 million over
the 2021 enacted level, to construct and rehabilitate affordable rental housing and provide
homeownership opportunities. If enacted, this would be the highest funding level for HOME
in nearly 15 years. In addition, the Budget provides $180 million to support 2,000 units of
new permanently affordable housing specifically for the elderly and persons with disabilities, supporting the Administration’s priority to maximize independent living for people with
disabilities. To complement these investments, the Budget contains a total of $50 billion in
mandatory funding and additional Low-Income Housing Tax Credits to increase affordable
housing development. Specifically, the Budget provides $35 billion in HUD funding for State
and local housing finance agencies and their partners to provide grants, revolving loan funds,
and other streamlined financing tools that reduce transactional costs and increase housing
The Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) is responsible for creating healthy,
safe, sustainable, inclusive communities and affordable homes for all. The President’s 2023
Budget for HUD: significantly expands rental assistance to low-income households; advances
efforts to end homelessness; increases affordable housing supply; expands homeownership
opportunities for underserved borrowers; improves affordable housing by increasing climate
resilience and energy efficiency; strengthens communities facing underinvestment; and prevents
and redresses housing-related discrimination.
The Budget requests $71.9 billion in discretionary funding for HUD, a $12.3 billion or 21-percent
increase from the 2021 enacted level.
74 Department of Housing and Urban Development
supply, as well as grants to advance State and local jurisdictions’ efforts to remove barriers to
affordable housing development.
• Advances Efforts to End Homelessness. To prevent and reduce homelessness, the Budget
provides $3.6 billion, an increase of $580 million over the 2021 enacted level, for Homeless
Assistance Grants to meet renewal needs and expand assistance to nearly 25,000 additional
households, including survivors of domestic violence and homeless youth.
• Promotes Equity by Preventing and Redressing Housing Discrimination. The Budget
provides $86 million in grants to support State and local fair housing enforcement organizations and to further education, outreach, and training on rights and responsibilities under
Federal fair housing laws. The Budget also invests in HUD staff and operations capacity to
deliver on the President’s housing priorities, including to lift barriers that restrict housing and
neighborhood choice, affirmatively further fair housing, and provide redress to those who have
experienced housing discrimination.
• Supports Access to Homeownership. The Budget supports access to homeownership for
underserved borrowers, including many first-time and minority homebuyers, through Federal
Housing Administration (FHA) and Ginnie Mae credit guarantees. The Budget, via FHA and
HOME, also provides $115 million for complementary loan and down payment assistance pilot
proposals to expand homeownership opportunities for first-generation and/or low-wealth firsttime homebuyers.
• Invests in Resilience and Energy Efficiency across HUD Multifamily Programs.
Multifamily properties with HUD rental assistance and Public Housing provide 2.3 million affordable homes to low-income families. The Budget not only fully funds operating costs across
this portfolio and provides critical Public Housing capital investments, but also provides about
$900 million in resources across HUD programs for modernization activities aimed at energy
efficiency and resilience to climate change impacts. These investments would help improve
the quality of public and HUD-assisted housing while creating good-paying jobs.
• Reduces Lead and Other Home Health Hazards for Vulnerable Families. The Budget
provides $400 million, an increase of $40 million above the 2021 enacted level, for States, local
governments, and nonprofits to reduce lead-based paint and other health hazards in the homes
of low-income families with young children. The Budget also includes $25 million to address
lead-based paint in Public Housing. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention identifies
the risk for lead exposure as greatest for children from racial and ethnic minority groups and
children in families living below the poverty level, and the Lead Hazard and Healthy Homes
grants complement additional Government-wide lead remediation investments included in
the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Bipartisan Infrastructure Law), and target interventions to these most at-risk communities. In addition, the Budget targets $60 million
specifically to prevent and mitigate housing-related health hazards, such as fire safety and
mold, in HUD-assisted housing.
• Supports Economic Development and Invests in Underserved Communities. The
Budget provides $3.8 billion for the Community Development Block Grant program to help
communities modernize infrastructure, invest in economic development, create parks and other public amenities, and provide social services. The Budget includes a targeted increase of
$195 million to spur equitable development and the removal of barriers to revitalization in 100
of the most underserved neighborhoods in the United States.
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 75
• Invests in Affordable Housing in Tribal Communities. Native Americans are seven
times more likely to live in overcrowded conditions and five times more likely to have inadequate plumbing, kitchen, or heating systems than all U.S. households. The Budget helps
address the poor housing conditions in tribal areas by providing $1 billion to fund tribal efforts
to expand affordable housing, improve housing conditions and infrastructure, and increase
economic opportunities for low-income families. Of this total, $150 million would prioritize
activities that advance resilience and energy efficiency in housing-related projects.

77
DEPARTMENT OF THE INTERIOR
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Strengthens Climate Resilience for Communities and Ecosystems. As steward for
20 percent of the Nation’s lands and waters and with a primary responsibility to uphold
the Nation’s commitments to American Indians and Alaska Natives, DOI plays an integral
role in addressing the climate crisis through strengthened conservation partnerships, including the Administration’s America the Beautiful Initiative, and science-based ecosystem
management. The Budget invests $5 billion in climate adaptation and resilience, including for several priorities listed below, to mitigate the impacts of climate change—such as
drought, wildfire and severe storms—on America’s communities, lands, waters, and wildlife.
The Budget also sustains funding for key conservation and ecosystem management initiatives, including the Civilian Climate Corps, alongside a historic $1.4 billion investment in the
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law for ecosystem restoration across America.
• Honors Trust and Treaty Responsibilities to Tribal Communities through Robust
Program Funding. The Budget makes the largest annual investment in tribal nations in
history, reflecting input received from the first Government-wide tribal consultation on the
development of the President’s Budget. With $4.5 billion for DOI’s tribal programs, more
than $1 billion above the 2021 enacted level, investments would support public safety and
justice, social services, climate resilience, and educational needs to uphold Federal trust
responsibilities and advance equity for Native communities. This includes a $156 million
The Department of the Interior (DOI) conserves and manages the Nation’s natural resources and
cultural heritage for the benefit and enjoyment of the American people. The President’s 2023
Budget for DOI invests in climate change mitigation and adaptation, honors commitments to
tribal nations, supports development in U.S. Territories and freely associated states, and funds
reclamation and resilience work that ensures healthy lands and waters and creates good-paying
jobs.
The Budget requests $17.5 billion in discretionary funding for DOI, a $2.8 billion or 19.3-percent
increase from the 2021 enacted level, excluding amounts requested for Contract Support Costs
and Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act of 1975 Section 105(l) leases,
which the Budget proposes to shift from discretionary to mandatory funding. Resources provided
through the 2023 Budget complement major investments in wildfire management, tribal programs,
methane emissions reduction, abandoned mine land reclamation, western water infrastructure,
and ecosystem restoration through the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Bipartisan
Infrastructure Law).
78 Department of the Interior
increase to support construction work at seven Bureau of Indian Education schools, providing
quality facilities for culturally-appropriate education with high academic standards, as well
as $7 million for the Indian Boarding School Initiative, which takes preliminary steps to address the injustices of past Federal Indian boarding school policy. The Budget also includes
$632 million in Tribal Public Safety and Justice funding at DOI, which collaborates closely
with the Department of Justice, including on continued efforts to address the crisis of Missing
and Murdered Indigenous Persons. The Budget also proposes to reclassify Contract Support
Costs and Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act of 1975 Section 105(l)
leases as mandatory spending, providing certainty for tribal communities in meeting these
ongoing needs through dedicated funding sources. The Budget further proposes to provide
mandatory funding to the Bureau of Reclamation for operation and maintenance of previously
enacted Indian Water Rights Settlements, and the Administration is interested in working
with the Congress on an approach to provide a mandatory funding source for future settlements. The Budget also complements Bipartisan Infrastructure Law investments to address
climate resilience needs in tribal communities.
• Advances Climate Science. The Budget invests $375 million at DOI to advance understanding of the impacts of climate change, unlock new opportunities to reduce climate risk
through innovative mitigation and adaptation research, measure and monitor greenhouse gas
emissions and sinks on Federal lands, and ensure that coastal, fire-prone, and other particularly vulnerable communities have accurate and accessible information to allow them to better
respond to the climate crisis. The Budget also supports the development of a Federal climate
data portal that would provide the public with accessible information on historical and projected climate impacts, inform decision-making, and strengthen community climate resilience.
• Mitigates the Risk of Catastrophic Wildfires. The Budget invests $325 million in
Hazardous Fuels Management and Burned Area Rehabilitation programs to help reduce the
risk and severity of wildfires, and restore lands that were devastated by catastrophic fire
over the last several years. This funding complements the $878 million for hazardous fuels
management and $325 million for burned area rehabilitation projects provided through the
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law.
• Invests in the Wildland Firefighting Workforce. Protecting communities, ecosystems, and
infrastructure from wildfire requires a resilient and reliable Federal workforce. The Budget
includes $477 million, an increase of $130 million over the 2021 enacted level, to ensure that
no Federal firefighter will make less than $15 an hour, to increase the Federal firefighting
workforce, and to support these men and women with competitive compensation. This funding
is further supported by $120 million made available in the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law to
address firefighting workforce needs.
• Increases Drought Resilience. The Budget helps to ensure that all communities across the
Nation have access to a resilient and reliable water supply by investing in water conservation,
development of desalination technologies, and water recycling and reuse projects. In addition,
nearly $1.7 billion provided through the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law for 2023, the Budget
invests over $675 million in Western water resource infrastructure and to provide potable water to rural areas, serving both tribal and non-tribal communities. The Budget also provides
funding to address the ongoing drought in the western United States, including funding to
implement the Drought Contingency Plans to conserve water in the Colorado River System,
which is at historically low levels.
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 79
• Promotes Racial Justice and Equity. The Budget supports DOI’s ongoing work to advance
racial justice and more equitably deliver services to all Americans with discrete investments
in each bureau. The Budget provides over $3 billion to programs covered under the Justice40
initiative, such as tribal housing improvements, wildlife conservation grants, and energy infrastructure development in insular communities, which ensures that at least 40 percent of
the overall benefits from certain Federal investments are delivered to disadvantaged communities. Moreover, the Budget includes a $48 million initiative to build a more equitable
National Park System (NPS). Through this initiative, DOI would expand operations at parks
that preserve and tell the story of historically underrepresented and marginalized groups,
further integrate tribal viewpoints into park management, address transportation barriers to
parks from underserved communities, and improve park accessibility for visitors and employees with disabilities.
• Accelerates Renewable Energy Development on Public Lands. The Budget includes
$254 million, an increase of $151 million from the 2021 enacted level, to accelerate and expand
activities that support economic development and the creation of thousands of good-paying
jobs through clean energy deployment on public lands and offshore waters. Funding would
support the leasing, planning, and permitting of solar, wind and geothermal energy projects,
and associated transmission infrastructure that would help mitigate climate change impacts
and meet the Administration’s goal of deploying 30 gigawatts of offshore wind capacity by
2030.
• Creates Jobs Remediating and Reclaiming Abandoned Wells and Mines. The Budget
provides over $321 million to remediate orphaned oil and gas wells and reclaim abandoned
mine lands on Federal and non-Federal lands. The funding complements the $16 billion provided in the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law for orphaned well remediation and abandoned
mine reclamation, and would help create good union jobs, mitigate climate change by reducing
greenhouse gas emissions, and ultimately allow for more productive land uses.
• Rebuilds Critical Capacity. The Budget rebuilds core functions and capabilities across
DOI, including science capacity at the U.S. Geological Survey, and land management operations of the NPS, Fish and Wildlife Service, and Bureau of Land Management.

81
DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Invests in Federal Law Enforcement to Combat Gun Crime and Other Violent Crime.
The Budget makes robust investments to bolster Federal law enforcement capacity. The
Budget includes $17.4 billion, an increase of $1.7 billion above the 2021 enacted level, for DOJ
law enforcement including a total of $1.7 billion for the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms,
and Explosives (ATF) to expand multijurisdictional gun trafficking strike forces with additional personnel, increase regulation of the firearms industry, enhance ATF’s National
Integrated Ballistic Information Network, and modernize the National Tracing Center. The
Budget includes $1.8 billion for the U.S. Marshals Service to support personnel dedicated
to fighting violent crime, including through fugitive apprehension and enforcement operations. The Budget also provides the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) with an additional
$69 million to address violent crime, including violent crimes against children and crime in
Indian Country. In addition, the Budget provides the U.S. Attorneys with $72.1 million to
prosecute violent crimes.
• Supports State and Local Law Enforcement and Community Violence Prevention
and Intervention Programs to Make Our Neighborhoods Safer. The Budget provides
$3.2 billion in discretionary resources for State and local grants and $30 billion in mandatory resources to support law enforcement, crime prevention, and community violence
intervention.
• Reinvigorates Federal Civil Rights Enforcement. In order to address longstanding inequities and strengthen civil rights protections, the Budget invests $367 million, an increase
of $101 million over the 2021 enacted level, in civil rights protection across DOJ. These resources would support police reform, the prosecution of hate crimes, enforcement of voting
rights, and efforts to provide equitable access to justice. Investments also provide mediation
The Department of Justice (DOJ) is responsible for defending the interests of the United States
and protecting all Americans as the chief enforcer of Federal laws. The President’s 2023 Budget
for DOJ invests in: combating gun crime and other violent crime, terrorism, violence against
women, and cyber threats; protecting civil rights; implementing Federal, State, and local criminal
justice reforms; improving the immigration court system; bolstering antitrust enforcement; and
advancing environmental justice.
The Budget requests $37.7 billion in discretionary funding for DOJ, a $4.2 billion or nearly
13-percent increase from the 2021 enacted level.
82 Department of Justice
and conciliation services through the Community Relations Service. The Budget also continues investments in civil rights enforcement at the FBI by providing $18 million to expand
civil rights investigations across the Nation, $8 million to the U.S. Attorneys to expand prosecutions of violations of civil rights, and nearly $1 million to the Criminal Division to expand
investigations of election-related crimes, including voter suppression.
• Reforms the Federal Criminal Justice System. The Budget leverages the capacity of
the Federal justice system to advance innovative criminal justice reform initiatives and serve
as a model for reform that is not only comprehensive in scope, but evidence-informed and
high-impact. The Budget supports key investments in First Step Act (FSA) implementation,
including $100 million for a historic collaboration between the Bureau of Prisons (BOP) and
the Department of Labor (DOL) for a national initiative to provide comprehensive workforce
development services to people in the Federal prison system, both during their time in BOP
facilities and after they are transferred to community placement. Thousands of incarcerated
people would have access to a wide variety of evidence-informed models and practices, and in
service of continuing to build the evidence base, DOL and BOP would oversee a ground-breaking, large-scale evaluation that assesses the impact of these programs on recidivism, labor
market outcomes, and other key metrics. To support rehabilitative programming, improve
conditions of confinement, and address augmentation in BOP facilities, the Budget proposes
$151 million to hire additional staff, including $72 million for FSA-dedicated programmatic
staff and $79 million for front-line correctional officers. In support of Federal law enforcement
reform and oversight, the Budget also proposes $106 million to support the deployment of
body-worn cameras (BWC) to DOJ’s law enforcement officers, as well as an impact evaluation
to assess the role of BWC in advancing criminal justice reform.
• Reforms the Juvenile Justice System and Supports Existing Criminal Justice Reform
Programs. The Budget proposes $760 million for juvenile justice programs, an increase of
$414 million over the 2021 enacted level, to bolster diversionary juvenile justice strategies.
In addition to these resources, funding is provided to support existing reform programs such
as the Second Chance Act of 2007, research and innovation programs, and alternative court
systems.
• Addresses Terrorism. The Budget invests resources to address the threats of both foreign
and domestic terrorism while respecting civil rights and civil liberties. The FBI is provided an
increase of $33 million for domestic terrorism investigations.
• Prioritizes Efforts to End Gender-Based Violence. The Budget proposes a historic investment of $1 billion to support Violence Against Women Act of 1994 (VAWA) programs, a
$487 million or 95-percent increase over the 2021 enacted level. The Budget supports substantial increases for longstanding VAWA programs, including key investments in legal assistance
for victims, transitional housing, and sexual assault services. Resources are also provided for
new programs to support transgender survivors, build community-based organizational capacity, combat online harassment and abuse, support community-based restorative practices,
and address emerging issues in gender-based violence, including a new financial assistance
program for survivors. The Budget strongly supports underserved and tribal communities
by providing $35 million for culturally-specific services, $10 million for underserved populations, $5.5 million to assist enforcement of tribal special domestic violence jurisdiction, and
$3 million to support tribal Special Assistant U.S. Attorneys. In addition, the Budget provides
$120 million, an increase of $72 million above the 2021 enacted level, to the Office of Justice
Programs for the Sexual Assault Kit Initiative to address the rape kit backlog, and for a new
Regional Sexual Assault Investigative Training Academies Program.
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 83
• Counters Cyber Threats. The Budget expands DOJ’s ability to pursue cyber threats through
investments that support a multiyear effort to build cyber investigative capabilities at FBI field
divisions nationwide. These investments include an additional $52 million for more agents,
enhanced response capabilities, and strengthened intelligence collection and analysis capabilities. These investments are in line with the Administration’s counter-ransomware strategy
that emphasizes disruptive activity and combatting the misuse of cryptocurrency.
• Improves Immigration Courts. The Budget invests $1.4 billion, an increase of $621 million above the 2021 enacted level, in the Executive Office for Immigration Review (EOIR) to
continue addressing the backlog of over 1.5 million cases that are currently pending in the
immigration courts. This funding supports 100 new immigration judges, including the support personnel required to create maximum efficiencies in the court systems, as well as an
expansion of EOIR’s virtual court initiative. The Budget would also invest new resources in
legal access programming, including $150 million in discretionary resources to provide access
to representation for adults and families in the immigration proceedings. Complementing this
new program is a proposal for $4.5 billion in mandatory resources to expand these efforts over
a ten-year period. Providing resources to support legal representation in the immigration system would create greater efficiencies in processing cases while making the system fairer and
more equitable.
• Bolsters Antitrust Enforcement. The Budget reflects the Administration’s commitment to
vigorous marketplace competition through robust enforcement of antitrust law by including a
historic increase of $88 million over the 2021 enacted level for the Antitrust Division.
• Supports Environmental Justice. The Budget expands DOJ’s work in environmental
justice, providing $1.4 million to launch an Office for Environmental Justice. An additional
$6.5 million funds the Environment and Natural Resources Division’s work in securing environmental justice and combatting the climate crisis. These resources would be central to the
Division and DOJ’s execution of a comprehensive environmental justice strategy in support
of the President’s Executive Order 14008, “Tackling the Climate Crisis at Home and Abroad.”

85
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Empowers and Protects Workers. To ensure workers are treated with dignity and respect in the workplace, the Budget invests $2.2 billion, an increase of $397 million above the
2021 enacted level, in the Department’s worker protection agencies. Between 2016 and 2020,
DOL worker protection agencies lost approximately 14 percent of their staff, limiting their
ability to perform inspections and conduct investigations. The Budget would enable DOL to
conduct the enforcement and regulatory work needed to ensure workers’ wages and benefits
are protected, address the misclassification of workers as independent contractors, and improve workplace health and safety. The Budget also ensures fair treatment for millions of
workers by restoring resources to oversee and enforce the equal employment obligations of
Federal contractors, including protections against discrimination based on race, gender, disability, gender identity, and sexual orientation.
• Equips Workers with Skills They Need to Obtain High-Quality Jobs. The Budget
invests in effective, evidence-based training models to equip workers with the skills they
need to obtain high-quality jobs. Community colleges play a critical role in providing accessible, low-cost, and high-quality training, and the Budget invests $100 million to build their
capacity to work with the public workforce development system and employers to design and
deliver high-quality workforce programs. The Budget also provides $100 million for a new
Sectoral Employment through Career Training for Occupational Readiness program, which
would support training programs focused on growing industries, enabling underserved and
underrepresented workers to access good jobs and creating the skilled workforce the economy
needs to thrive.
• Expands Access to Registered Apprenticeships (RA). RA is a proven earn-and-learn
model that raises participants’ wages and places them on a reliable path to the middle class.
The Department of Labor (DOL) is responsible for protecting the health, safety, wages, and
income security of workers and retirees. The President’s 2023 Budget for DOL invests in:
building the skills of America’s workers; protecting workers’ rights, health and safety, and wages;
strengthening the integrity and accessibility of the Unemployment Insurance (UI) program; and
creating good, middle-class jobs that are safe, equitable, pay fair wages and benefits, empower
workers, and offer opportunities for advancement.
The Budget requests $14.6 billion in discretionary funding for DOL, a $2.2 billion or 18-percent
increase from the 2021 enacted level.
86 Department of Labor
The Budget invests $303 million, a $118 million increase above the 2021 enacted level, to
expand RA opportunities in high-growth fields, such as technology, advanced manufacturing, healthcare, and transportation, while increasing access for historically underrepresented
groups, including people of color and women, and diversifying the industry sectors involved.
To improve access to RAs for women, the Budget doubles DOL’s investment in its Women in
Apprenticeship and Nontraditional Occupations grants, which provide pre-apprenticeship opportunities to boost women’s participation in RA.
• Provides Training and Employment Pathways for Youth. The Budget invests in
programs that provide youth with equitable access to high-quality training and career opportunities. The Budget invests $75 million for a new National Youth Employment Program,
which would create high-quality summer and year-round job opportunities for underserved
youth. The Budget also provides $145 million for YouthBuild, $48 million above the 2021
enacted level, to enable more at-risk youth to gain both the education and occupational skills
they need to obtain good jobs. To further advance equity and inclusion, the Budget provides
$15 million to test new ways to enable low-income youth with disabilities, including youth who
are in foster care, involved in the justice system, or who are experiencing homelessness, to successfully transition to employment.
• Supports Legacy Energy Communities. In order to address changes in the energy economy,
the Budget continues to invest in strategic planning, partnership development, and training and reemployment activities for displaced workers. The Budget provides $100 million to
support DOL’s role in the multi-agency POWER+ Initiative, which aims to assist displaced
workers and transform local economies and communities transitioning away from fossil fuel
production to new, sustainable industries. The Budget also includes $35 million, administered
in partnership with the Appalachian Regional Commission and the Delta Regional Authority,
to help Appalachian and Delta communities develop local and regional workforce development
strategies that promote long-term economic stability and opportunities for workers, especially
those connected to the energy industry. Further, the Budget provides $20 million for DOL to
partner with AmeriCorps and other agencies to establish a Civilian Climate Corps program to
help communities address the climate crisis by creating service opportunities and job training
programs in emerging industries.
• Modernizes, Protects, and Strengthens the UI Safety Net. The UI program has helped
millions of Americans through periods of unemployment during the COVID-19 pandemic. The
Budget invests $3.4 billion, an increase of $769 million above the 2021 enacted level, to modernize, protect, and strengthen this critical program. This includes several investments aimed
at tackling fraud in the UI program, including funding to support more robust identity verification for UI applicants, help States develop and test fraud-prevention tools and strategies,
and allow the DOL Office of Inspector General to increase its investigations into fraud rings
targeting the UI program. To allow States to serve claimants more quickly and effectively
while strengthening program integrity, the Budget also updates the formula for determining the amount States receive to administer UI, the first comprehensive update in decades.
The Budget also proposes principles to guide future efforts to reform the UI system, including improving benefit levels and access, scaling UI benefits automatically during recessions,
expanding eligibility to reflect the modern labor force, improving State and Federal solvency
through more equitable and progressive financing, expanding reemployment services, and
safeguarding the program from fraud.
• Strengthens Mental Health Parity Protections.  The Budget requires all health plans
to cover mental health benefits, ensures that plans have an adequate network of behavioral
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 87
health providers, and improves DOL’s ability to enforce the law. In addition, the Budget includes $275 million over 10 years to increase the Department’s capacity to ensure that large
group market health plans and issuers comply with mental health and substance use disorder
requirements, and expand the Agency’s capacity to take action against plans and issuers that
do not comply.

89
DEPARTMENT OF STATE AND OTHER
INTERNATIONAL PROGRAMS
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Advances the President’s Historic Climate Finance Pledge. The Budget includes over
$11 billion in international climate finance, meeting the President’s pledge to quadruple
international climate finance, a year early. This includes $5.3 billion in appropriations, including a $1.6 billion contribution to the Green Climate Fund, a critical multilateral tool for
financing climate adaptation and mitigation projects in developing countries. The Budget
also supports a $3.2 billion loan to the Clean Technology Fund to finance clean energy projects
in developing countries. U.S. international climate assistance and financing would: accelerate the global energy transition to net zero emissions by 2050; help developing countries
build resilience to the growing impacts of climate change, including through the President’s
Emergency Plan for Adaptation and Resilience (PREPARE) and other programs; and support the implementation of the President’s Plan to Conserve Global Forests: Critical Carbon
Sinks–while increasing energy independence by decreasing reliance on producers of nonrenewable resources.
• Advances American Leadership in Global Health, Including Global Health Security
and Pandemic Preparedness. The Budget includes $10.6 billion to bolster U.S. leadership
The Department of State (State), U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID), and other
international programs advance the interests and security of the American people by using
diplomatic and development tools to address global challenges and advance a free, peaceful,
and prosperous world. The President’s 2023 Budget for State, USAID, and other international
programs strengthens American power and influence by working with allies and partners to
solve global challenges including through the launch of the President’s Build Back Better World
Initiative. These investments would position the United States to compete with China, and any
other nation, from a position of strength.
The Budget requests $67.6 billion in discretionary funding for the Department of State and
other international programs, a $10.2 billion or 18-percent increase from the 2021 enacted
level, excluding emergency funding. Within this total, the Budget includes $60.4 billion for
the Department of State and USAID, an increase of $7.4 billion or 14 percent above the 2021
enacted levels. This Budget also includes $4.4 billion for the international programs at the
Department of the Treasury, an increase of $2.5 billion or 131 percent above the 2021 enacted
level.
90 Department of State and Other International Programs
in addressing global health and health security challenges, a $1.4 billion increase above the
2021 enacted level. Within this total, the Budget demonstrates U.S. leadership by supporting a $2 billion contribution for the Global Fund’s seventh replenishment, for an intended
pledge of $6 billion over three years, to save lives and continue the fight against HIV/AIDS,
tuberculosis, and malaria, and to support the Global Fund’s expanded response to COVID-19
and global health strengthening. This total also includes $1 billion to prevent, prepare for, and
respond to infectious disease outbreaks, including the continued expansion of Global Health
Security Agenda capacity-building programs and a multilateral financial intermediary fund
for health security and pandemic preparedness. The Budget also invests in the global health
workforce and systems to enhance countries’ abilities to provide core health services, improve
health systems resiliency, and respond to crises while mitigating the impacts of crises on routine health services. In addition, the Budget includes $6.5 billion in mandatory funding for
State and USAID over five years to make transformative investments in pandemic and other
biological threat preparedness globally in support of U.S. biodefense and pandemic preparedness strategies and plans. The pandemic preparedness funding would strengthen the global
health workforce, support pandemic preparedness research and development (R&D), advance
global R&D capacity, and support health security capacity and financing to strengthen global
capacity to prevent, detect, and respond to future COVID-19 variants and other infectious
disease outbreaks.
• Revitalizes Alliances and Partnerships in the Indo-Pacific and Europe. To strengthen
and modernize America’s alliances and partnerships in vital global regions and assert U.S.
leadership in strategic competition, the Budget includes nearly $1.8 billion to support a free
and open, connected, secure, and resilient Indo-Pacific Region and the Indo-Pacific Strategy,
and $400 million for the Countering the People’s Republic of China Malign Influence Fund.
In addition, the Budget provides $682 million for Ukraine, an increase of $219 million above
the 2021 enacted level, to continue to counter Russian malign influence and to meet emerging
needs related to security, energy, cyber security issues, disinformation, macroeconomic stabilization, and civil society resilience.
• Champions an Open and Secure Digital and Technological Ecosystem. The Budget
invests more than $350 million to expand reliable and affordable internet access through the
development and deployment of secure digital and technological infrastructure. The Budget
would improve international cybersecurity practices and promote the adoption of policies that
support an open, interoperable, secure, and reliable internet. These resources would further
development programming across sectors in line with the State’s cyberspace and emerging
technology diplomacy and USAID’s digital development strategy. State and USAID will also
seek to close the digital gender gap in low- and middle-income countries by increasing women
and girls’ access to information communication technologies and addressing online harassment and abuse globally.
• Renews America’s Leadership in International Institutions. The Budget continues the
Administration’s efforts to lead through international organizations by meeting the Nation’s
commitments to fully fund U.S. contributions and to pay United Nations peacekeeping dues on
time and in full. Strengthening the Nation’s international partnerships is critical to meeting
the Sustainable Development Goals, including global education, ending hunger and malnutrition, building more sustainable, equitable, and resilient food systems and addressing other
global challenges.
• Supports Democracy Globally. In response to political fragility and increasing authoritarianism around the world, the Budget provides more than $3.2 billion to support global
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 91
democracy, human rights, anti-corruption, and good governance programming, consistent with
the commitments made during the President’s Summit for Democracy. The Budget advances
the Presidential Memorandum on Advancing the Human Rights of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual,
Transgender, Queer, and Intersex Persons Around the World, the U.S. Strategy on Countering
Corruption, and the Presidential Initiative on Democratic Renewal.
• Restores U.S. Leadership in International Development. The Budget provides $1.4 billion for the World Bank’s International Development Association (IDA). This investment
restores the United States’ historical role as the largest World Bank donor to support the
development of low- and middle-income countries, which benefits the American people by increasing global stability, mitigating climate and health risks, and developing new markets for
U.S exports. The U.S. contribution would also support the United States’ $3.5 billion pledge
to the next replenishment of the IDA, a critical component of the global response to the devastating impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic on developing countries. The Budget also funds
bilateral partner capacity building efforts in key areas such as judicial sector strengthening,
countering and preventing terrorism, and provision of basic services.
• Continues Collaborative U.S. Leadership in Central America and Haiti. As part of
a comprehensive strategy to advance systemic reform while addressing the root causes of
irregular migration from Central America to the United States, the Budget invests $987 million in the region to continue meeting the President’s four-year commitment of $4  billion.
Further, in response to deteriorating conditions and widespread violence in Haiti, the Budget
invests $275 million to strengthen Haiti’s recovery from political and economic shocks, such as
strengthening the capacity of the Haitian National Police, combating corruption, strengthening the capacity of civil society, and supporting services for marginalized populations. These
investments would ensure that the United States is able to revitalize partnerships that build
economic resilience, democratic stability, and citizen security in the region.
• Supports America’s Allies in the Middle East. The Budget fully supports the U.S.-Israel
Memorandum of Understanding, provides $1.4 billion in economic and security assistance for
Jordan, and includes $1.4 billion to support the U.S. diplomatic and security partnership with
Egypt. As part of the Administration’s commitment to advancing security, prosperity, and
freedom for both Israelis and Palestinians, the Budget also provides $219 million for critical
assistance to the Palestinian people in the West Bank and Gaza, as well as across the region,
in support of a two-state solution with Israel.
• Strengthens African Engagement. The Budget includes more than $7.7 billion for subSaharan Africa, including more than $250 million to support the second United States-Africa
Leaders’ Summit to strengthen ties with African partners based on principles of mutual respect and shared interests and values. These investments would strengthen collaboration,
trade and investment, electrification, ecosystems for mutual growth and prosperity, and the
promotion of digital transformation in Africa.
• Strengthens U.S. Leadership on Refugee and Humanitarian Issues. The Budget provides more than $10 billion to respond to the unprecedented need arising from conflict and
natural disasters around the world to serve over 70 countries and approximately 240 million
people. The Budget continues rebuilding the Nation’s refugee admissions program and supports up to 125,000 admissions in 2023.
• Advances Equity and Equality Globally. The Budget provides $2.6 billion to advance
gender equity and equality across a broad range of sectors, more than doubling the gender
attributions of the policies of this Administration. This includes $200 million for the Gender
92 Department of State and Other International Programs
Equity and Equality Action Fund to advance the economic security of women and girls. This
total also includes funding to strengthen the participation of women in conflict prevention,
resolution, and recovery through the implementation of the Women, Peace, and Security Act
of 2017. To further implement the President’s Executive Order 13985, “Advancing Racial
Equity and Support for Underserved Communities,” the Budget would better integrate equity
through more inclusive policies, strategies, and practice including enhancing the ability of potential non-traditional partners to pursue Federal opportunities and address the barriers they
face in the Federal award process, and new efforts to identify spaces to support and advance
underserved population appropriate to the country context.
• Addresses Food Insecurity and Fosters Inclusive and Sustainable Agriculture-led
Economic Growth. The Budget supports the President’s pledge to alleviate global food insecurity by providing over $1 billion in bilateral agriculture and food security programming, and
continuing robust support for the International Fund for Agricultural Development. These
investments are key to increasing communities’ access to nutritious food, strengthening their
resilience to shocks and stresses, and lifting them from entrenched poverty.
• Revitalizes and Expands the Diplomatic and Development Workforce.  Strengthening
American diplomacy and development requires rebuilding and modernizing the State and
USAID workforce.  The 2023 Budget provides $7.6 billion to recruit, retain, and develop the
diverse, highly capable workforce needed to support efforts around the world and manage
increasingly complex national security issues, particularly in the Indo-Pacific region. The
Budget also increases investments to diversify the workforce of foreign affairs agencies to
reflect and draw on the richness and diversity of the United States, including through paid
internships and targeted fellowship programs, and strengthening partnerships with Minority
Serving Institutions, and expanded professional development opportunities.
93
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
UNITED STATES OF AMERICA
D
E
PARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIO
N
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Modernizes and Upgrades Roads and Bridges. To modernize, repair, and improve
the safety and efficiency of the Nation’s network of roads and bridges, the Budget provides
$68.9 billion for the Federal-aid Highway program, a $19.8 billion increase from the 2021
enacted level. This includes $9.4 billion provided by the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law for
2023 and which also supports: $8 billion for new competitive and formula grant programs to
rebuild the Nation’s bridges; $1.4 billion to deploy a nationwide, publicly-accessible network
of electric vehicle chargers and other alternative fueling infrastructure; $1.3 billion for a new
carbon reduction grant program; and $1.7 billion for a new resiliency grant program to enhance the resilience of surface transportation infrastructure to hazards and climate change.
• Improves Highway Safety. The Budget provides more than $2.5 billion for the Federal
Motor Carrier Safety Administration and the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration
(NHTSA), an $857 million increase above the 2021 enacted level. The Budget also provides
critical resources to support NHTSA’s rulemaking efforts including those to address climate
change and emerging technologies. This builds on the Agency’s National Roadway Safety
Strategy, which uses a safe system approach to address the crisis of roadway fatalities.
• Provides High-Quality Transit Options to More Americans. To strengthen the Nation’s
transit systems, reduce emissions, and improve transportation access for people with disabilities and historically disadvantaged communities, the Budget provides the Federal Transit
Administration with $21.1 billion, an $8.2 billion increase over the 2021 enacted level. This
The Department of Transportation (DOT) is responsible for ensuring that the United States
has the safest, most equitable, reliable, and modern transportation system in the world. The
President’s 2023 Budget for DOT supports the historic investments in surface transportation,
aviation, and maritime made by the Infrastructure and Investment Jobs Act (Bipartisan
Infrastructure Law), which will strengthen the Nation’s transportation system while tackling
climate change and protecting environmental resources, addressing inequities and advancing
environmental justice, and promoting good-paying jobs and economic vitality.
The Budget requests $26.8 billion in discretionary budget authority for 2023, a $1.5 billion or
six-percent increase from the 2021 enacted level. Consistent with the Bipartisan Infrastructure
Law, the Budget also includes $78.4 billion in mandatory funds, including contract authority and
obligation limitations, and $36.8 billion in emergency-designated advance budget authority, for
transportation infrastructure investments in 2023.
94 Department of Transportation
includes $3.2 billion in additional funding on top of the $4.3 billion already provided by the
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law for 2023. The Budget includes $4.5  billion for the Capital
Investment Grant program, which would advance the construction of new, high-quality transit
corridors to reduce travel time and increase economic development.
• Invests in Reliable Passenger and Freight Rail. To ensure the safety and performance of
the rail industry today and deliver the passenger rail network of the future, the Budget provides the Federal Railroad Administration a historic investment of $17.9 billion, a $15 billion
increase over the 2021 enacted level. This includes $4.7 billion in additional funding on top of
$13.2 billion already provided by the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law for 2023. These resources
would provide $7.4 billion to significantly improve Amtrak’s rolling stock and facilities and
$10.1 billion for existing and new competitive grant programs to support passenger rail modernization and expansion, address critical safety needs, and support the vitality of the freight
rail network.
• Reduces Bottlenecks and Commute Times through Investments in Competitive
Programs. The Budget provides robust support for transportation projects that reduce commute times, improve safety, reduce freight bottlenecks, better connect communities, and reduce
transportation-related greenhouse gas emissions. Investments include $4 billion, $3 billion
above the 2021 enacted level, for National Infrastructure Investments grant programs to support transportation projects with significant benefits across multiple modes, and $1.64 billion,
a $640 million increase above the 2021 enacted level for the Infrastructure for Rebuilding
America grants program which focuses on reducing freight and highway bottlenecks.
• Advances Racial Equity and Supports Underserved Communities. The Budget requests an additional $20 million above the 2021 enacted level for the Office of the Secretary to
lead DOT’s efforts to promote equity and inclusion.  With these resources, DOT would better
ensure that historic investments under the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law deliver resources
and benefits equitably, including communities that have been historically underserved and
adversely affected by persistent poverty or income inequality. DOT actions include workforce development, disadvantaged business enterprise procurement, data collection, reporting,
public participation, and assistance measures mitigating or negating the effects of structural
obstacles to building wealth.
• Prioritizes Aviation Safety and Infrastructure. The Budget provides $15.2 billion in
discretionary budget authority for the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) to improve aviation safety, transform the Nation’s aviation infrastructure, and improve cybersecurity. These
investments also promote environmental justice and climate change mitigation by prioritizing
sustainable design and construction, and enhancing equity through more inclusive contracting and workforce development. The resources provided through the Budget complement the
$5 billion already provided by the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law for 2023 to upgrade the
FAA’s air traffic control facilities and to improve the safety, capacity, accessibility, and efficiency of the Nation’s airports.
• Accelerates Efforts to Move More Goods Faster through the Nation’s Ports and
Waterways. The Budget continues support for the historic levels of Federal investment
to modernize America’s port and waterway infrastructure initiated under the Bipartisan
Infrastructure Law. The Budget includes $230 million for the Port Infrastructure Development
Program to strengthen maritime freight capacity. In addition to keeping the Nation’s supply
chain moving by improving efficiency, DOT would prioritize projects that also lower emissions—reducing environmental impact in and around the Nation’s ports.
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 95
• Supports Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety. The Budget improves pipeline and
hazardous material transportation safety through new investments to hire additional safety inspectors and engineers, and for robust data collection to inform safety standards. The
Budget would help reduce methane emissions and preserve the climate, with investments in
new safety standards for pipelines and continued safety checks on underground natural gas
storage facilities. The Budget also increases hazardous materials staffing for accident investigations and additional outreach and training to improve compliance with safety requirements.

97
DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Improves Taxpayer Experience and Supports a Fair and Equitable Tax System.
Last year, the IRS delivered more than $600 billion in direct economic relief to American
households and businesses through Economic Impact Payments, monthly advance child tax
credit payments, and more. Yet the agency’s funding and staffing levels have not kept pace
with its expanding scope. To ensure that taxpayers receive the highest quality customer service and that all Americans are treated fairly by the U.S. tax system, the Budget provides a
total of $14.1 billion for the Internal Revenue Service (IRS), $2.2 billion, or 18 percent, above
the 2021 enacted level. This includes an increase of $798 million to improve the taxpayer
experience and expand customer service outreach to underserved communities and the taxpaying public at large. The Budget also provides $310 million for IRS Business Systems
Modernization, which is 39 percent above the 2021 enacted level, to accelerate the development of new digital tools to enable better communication between taxpayers and the IRS.
Increased funding for the IRS would also facilitate more effective oversight of high-income
and corporate tax returns. In addition to these resources, the Administration continues
to support multiyear investments in IRS tax enforcement to increase tax compliance and
revenues that the President has previously proposed. This investment reflects decades of
analysis demonstrating that program integrity investments to enforce existing tax laws increase revenues in a progressive way by closing the tax gap—the difference between taxes
owed and taxes paid.
• Expands Lending in Disadvantaged Communities and Increases Affordable
Housing Supply. The Budget provides $331 million for the Community Development
Financial Institutions (CDFI) Fund, an increase of $61 million, or 23 percent, above the
The Department of the Treasury (Treasury) is responsible for maintaining a strong economy,
promoting conditions that enable economic growth and stability, protecting the integrity of the
financial system, combating global financial crime and corruption, and managing the U.S.
Government’s finances and resources effectively. The President’s 2023 Budget for Treasury
invests in: a fair and robust tax system; enforcing the tax code and ensuring compliance
by the wealthy and corporations; improving the taxpayer experience and customer service;
providing resources to expand job-creating investments and access to credit in disadvantaged
communities; and enhancing cybersecurity.
The Budget requests $16.2 billion in discretionary funding for Treasury, a $2.7 billion or
20-percent increase from the 2021 enacted level.
98 Department of the Treasury
2021 enacted level. To address the critical shortage of affordable housing in communities, the
Budget also proposes $5 billion in long-term mandatory funding for CDFI financing of new
construction and substantial rehabilitation that creates net new units of affordable rental and
for sale housing. CDFIs provide historically underserved and often low-income communities
access to credit, capital, and financial support to grow businesses, increase affordable housing,
and reinforce healthy neighborhood development.
• Increases Corporate Transparency and Safeguards the Financial System. Treasury
plays a leading role in monitoring and disrupting corruption, money laundering, terrorist financing, and the use of the financial system by malicious actors domestically and abroad.
Investment in Treasury staff and technical capabilities is critical to these efforts, including closing financial reporting loopholes that allow illicit actors to evade scrutiny, mask their dealings,
and undermine corporate accountability. The Budget provides $210 million for the Financial
Crimes Enforcement Network, $83 million above the 2021 enacted level, to increase oversight
of the financial sector, strengthen corporate accountability, and provide adequate support to
law enforcement and investigative entities. In addition, the Budget provides $212 million to
the Office of Terrorism and Financial Intelligence, $37 million above the 2021 enacted level, to
modernize and update the sanctions process consistent with the findings of the Treasury 2021
Sanctions Review.
• Strengthens Enterprise Cybersecurity. The Budget provides $215 million, an increase of
$197 million above the 2021 enacted level, to protect and defend sensitive agency systems and
information, including those designated as high-value assets. The Budget increases centralized funding to strengthen Treasury’s overall cybersecurity efforts and establish a Zero Trust
Architecture. These investments would protect Treasury systems from future attacks and accelerate Treasury’s response to the SolarWinds incident and Log4j vulnerabilities.
• Restores Critical Agency Capacity. The Budget provides $293 million for Treasury’s
Departmental Offices, a 26-percent increase over the 2021 enacted level, to rebuild institutional capacity and strengthen the role of Treasury policy offices. Additional funding for Treasury’s
Climate Hub would support a sustainable economic recovery and advance climate goals both
domestically and internationally, including domestic coal transition and engagement with
international financial institutions. Increased staffing would also support assessments of
climate-related financial risk arising from private insurance coverage gaps in regions of the
Nation particularly vulnerable to climate change impacts. The Budget also builds institutional capacity to expand engagement with historically underrepresented and underserved groups
and develop actionable goals to advance equity across all Treasury programs.
99
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Prioritizes VA Medical Care. The Budget provides $119 billion—a historic 32-percent increase above the 2021 enacted level for VA. In addition to fully funding inpatient, outpatient,
mental health, and long-term care services, the Budget supports programs that improve VA
healthcare quality and delivery, including investments in training programs for clinicians,
health professionals, and medical students. The Budget also further supports VA’s preparedness for regional and national public health emergencies.
• Prioritizes Veteran Suicide Prevention. The Budget provides $497 million to support
the Administration’s veteran suicide prevention initiatives, including implementation of: the
Veterans Crisis Line’s 988 expansion initiative; the suicide prevention 2.0 program to grow
public health efforts in communities; a lethal means safety campaign in partnership with
other agencies; and the Staff Sergeant Parker Gordon Fox Suicide Prevention Grant Program
to enhance community-based prevention strategies.
• Improves Veterans’ Mental Healthcare Services. The Budget provides $13.9 billion for
VA mental healthcare, which offers a system of comprehensive treatments and services to
meet the needs of each veteran and the family members involved in the veteran’s care. The
Budget focuses on increasing access to quality mental healthcare and lowering the cost of
mental health services for veterans, with the goal of helping veterans take charge of their
treatment and live full and meaningful lives.
The Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) is responsible for providing military veterans and VA
survivors with the benefits, care, and support they have earned through sacrifice and service to
the Nation. The President’s 2023 Budget for VA honors the Nation’s sacred obligation to veterans
by investing in: world-class healthcare, including mental health, and enhancing veterans’ general
well-being; benefits delivery, including disability claims processing; education; employment
training; and insurance, burial, and other benefits to enhance veterans’ prosperity. The Budget
ensures that all veterans, including women veterans, veterans of color, and Lesbian, Gay,
Bisexual, Transgender, Queer, and Intersex veterans receive the care they have earned, and
prioritizes addressing veteran homelessness, suicide prevention, and caregiver support.
The Budget requests $135 billion in discretionary funding for VA, a $31 billion or 29-percent
increase, from the 2021 enacted level. The Budget also includes $128 billion in advance
appropriations for VA medical care programs in 2024.
100 Department of Veterans Affairs
• Supports Women Veterans’ Healthcare. The Budget invests $9.8 billion for all of women
veterans’ healthcare, including $767 million toward women’s gender specific care. More women are choosing VA healthcare than ever before, with women accounting for over 30 percent of
the increase in veterans enrolled over the past five years. Investments support comprehensive
specialty medical and surgical services for women veterans at a VA facility or through referrals to the community. The Budget proposes to increase access to infertility counseling and
assisted reproductive technology and to eliminate copayments for contraceptive coverage. The
Budget also improves the safety of women veterans seeking healthcare at VA facilities by supporting implementation of the zero-tolerance policy for sexual harassment and assault.
• Bolsters Efforts to End Veteran Homelessness. The Budget increases resources for veterans’ homelessness programs to $2.7 billion, with the goal of ensuring every veteran has
permanent, sustainable housing with access to healthcare and other supportive services to
prevent and end veteran homelessness.
• Invests in Caregivers Support Program. The Budget recognizes the important role of family caregivers in supporting the health and wellness of veterans. The Budget provides funding
for the Program of General Caregivers Support Services. The Budget also provides $1.8 billion
for the Program of Comprehensive Assistance for Family Caregivers, which includes stipend
payments and support services to help empower family caregivers of eligible veterans.
• Invests in Overdose Prevention and Treatment Programs. The Budget provides
$663 million toward opioid use disorder prevention and treatment programs, including programs authorized in the Jason Simcakoski Memorial and Promise Act.
• Supports Research Critical to Veterans’ Health Needs. VA conducts thousands of studies at VA medical centers, outpatient clinics, and nursing homes each year. This research has
significantly contributed to advancements in healthcare for veterans and other Americans
from every walk of life. The Budget provides $916 million to continue the development of
VA’s research enterprise, including research in support of American Pandemic Preparedness:
Transforming Our Capabilities plan goals.
• Addresses Environmental Exposures. The Budget increases resources for new presumptive disability compensation claims related to environmental exposures from military service.
The Budget also invests $51 million within VA research programs and $63 million within
the VA medical care program for Health Outcomes Military Exposures to increase scientific
understanding of and clinical support for veterans and healthcare providers regarding the
potential adverse impacts from environmental exposures during military service.
• Supports Cancer Moonshot and Precision Oncology. The Budget invests $81 million
within VA research programs, together with $167 million within the VA medical care program,
for precision oncology to provide access to the best possible cancer care for veterans. Funds
support research and programs that address cancer care, rare cancers, and cancers in women,
as well as genetic counseling and consultation that advance tele-oncology and precision oncology care.
• Provides Claims Processing Automation. The Budget provides $120 million for VA to
support automating the disability compensation claims process from submission to authorization. Investments in automation would increase VA’s ability to deliver faster and more
accurate claim decisions for veterans.
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 101
• Supports VA Home Loan Programs. The Budget provides $284 million for VA housing
program administration to ensure that all eligible veterans receive maximum benefits and
protections as new or existing homeowners, and enable VA to manage record growth in its
home loan guaranty volume, which exceeded $860 billion in outstanding principal in 2021.
In addition, in accordance with the President’s Executive Order 14030, “Climate-Related
Financial Risk,” the VA housing program is working with the Departments of Agriculture and
Housing and Urban Development to consider approaches to better integrate climate-related
financial risk into Federal credit programs. Efforts to date include contracting for additional
expert analytical support, identifying and sharing initial risk assessments in working groups
comprised of credit representatives of these agencies, and exploring the financial sensitivity of
proposed 2023 activity to adverse movements in default and recovery performance that could
be related to climate-change risks.
• Modernizes VA Information Technology. The Budget includes $5.8 billion for VA’s Office
of Information Technology to prioritize cybersecurity, financial management business transformation, claims automation, and the Infrastructure Readiness program, with the mission to
ensure a seamless customer experience for veterans. The Budget also provides $1.8 billion to
continue modernizing VA’s Electronic Health Record to ensure veterans receive world-class
healthcare well into the future.
• Invests in New and Replacement Medical and Cemetery Facilities. The Budget includes $3 billion for construction and expansion of critical infrastructure and facilities. This
funding supports seven major investments in new and replacement medical facilities and new
or expanded cemeteries in three locations. In addition, VA would make improvements and alterations to existing medical facilities, further expanding healthcare capacities. These capital
investments enable the delivery of high-quality healthcare, benefits, and services for veterans.
• Honors the Memory of All Veterans. The Budget includes $430 million to ensure veterans and their families have access to exceptional memorial benefits including two new and
replacement national cemeteries. These funds maintain national shrine standards at the 158
VA managed cemeteries and provide the initial operational investment required to open new
cemeteries.

103
CORPS OF ENGINEERS—CIVIL WORKS
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Restores Aquatic Ecosystems. The Budget invests in the restoration of some of the
Nation’s most unique aquatic ecosystems, such as the Chesapeake Bay, Great Lakes, Upper
Mississippi, and Columbia River. For Florida’s Everglades restoration project, the Budget
invests $407 million—building on the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law’s single largest investment in history for Everglades restorations. This iconic American landscape provides
drinking water supply for more than 8 million Floridians, supports the State’s $90 billion
tourism economy, and is home to dozens of endangered or threatened species.
• Increases Resilience to Climate Change. The Budget invests in programs and projects
that would reduce the risk of damages from floods and storms and restore the Nation’s aquatic ecosystems. The Budget also invests in helping local communities identify and address
their risks associated with climate change and improve resilience of Corps’ infrastructure to
climate change, including taking climate resilience into account in developing options and
selecting projects.
• Facilitates Safe, Reliable, and Sustainable Commercial Navigation. The Budget includes $1.7 billion for the Harbor Maintenance Trust Fund to facilitate safe, reliable, and
environmentally sustainable navigation at the Nation’s coastal ports.
• Advances Equity and Environmental Justice. The Budget invests in technical assistance, studies, and the construction of projects to address water resources challenges in
disadvantaged and tribal communities in line with the President’s Justice40 Initiative. For
example, the Budget includes funding for remedial clean-up of the Bradford Island site on
The Army Corps of Engineers—Civil Works program (Corps) is responsible for: developing,
managing, restoring, and protecting water resources primarily through the construction, operation
and maintenance, and study of water-related infrastructure projects; regulating development
in waters of the United States; and working with other Federal agencies to help communities
respond to and recover from floods and other natural disasters. The President’s 2023 Budget for
the Corps invests in modernizing the Nation’s water infrastructure, including U.S. coastal ports,
increasing climate resilience, and advancing environmental justice.
The Budget requests $6.6 billion in discretionary funding for the Corps. Resources provided
through the 2023 Budget complement historic investments in modernizing the Nation’s ports and
waterways and improving resilience of water resources infrastructure to climate change through
the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Bipartisan Infrastructure Law).
104 Corps of Engineers—Civil Works
the Columbia River to address decades of contamination, including in important tribal fishing
areas.
• Invests in High Return Projects. The Budget invests in projects that would provide a high
economic or environmental return or address a significant risk to public safety. For example,
the Budget prioritizes funding to address the highest dam safety risks the Corps has identified
at its dams, and to facilitate safe and efficient navigation on the highest use inland waterways.
105
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Tackles the Climate Crisis with Urgency. To help address greenhouse gas emissions and
make the Nation’s infrastructure more resilient, the Budget invests $100 million in grants
to States and Tribes that would support the implementation of on-the-ground efforts in communities across the Nation, such as reducing methane emissions. The Budget proposes an
additional $35 million over the 2021 enacted level to implement the recently enacted American
Innovation and Manufacturing Act to continue phasing out potent greenhouse gases known
as hydrofluorocarbons (HFCs). The Budget also invests an additional $13 million over the
2021 enacted level in wildfire prevention and readiness to bolster EPA’s abilities to forecast
where smoke will harm people and better communicate where smoke events are occurring.
• Restores Critical Capacity to Carry Out EPA’s Core Mission. Staffing reductions
under the previous administration continue to impact the Agency’s ability to carry out its
mission to protect human health and the environment. The Budget adds more than 1,900
Full Time Equivalents (FTEs) relative to 2021 levels, for a total of more than 16,200 FTEs,
to help rebuild the Agency’s capacity. Restoring staffing capacity across the Agency would
allow EPA to help cut air, water, and climate pollution, and advance environmental justice.
Staffing resources would also fund a significant expansion of EPA’s paid student internship
program to develop a pipeline of qualified staff.
• Advances Environmental Justice. The Administration continues to prioritize efforts to
deliver environmental justice in communities across the United States, including meeting
the President’s Justice40 commitment to ensure at least 40 percent of the benefits of Federal
investments in climate and clean energy reach disadvantaged communities. The Budget bolsters these efforts by investing nearly $1.5 billion across numerous programs that would help
The Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) is responsible for protecting human health and the
environment. The President’s 2023 Budget for EPA: restores the Agency’s capacity to carry out
its mission; implements the President’s historic Justice40 commitment; and funds a broad suite of
recently authorized programs to improve the Nation’s water infrastructure.
The Budget requests $11.9 billion in discretionary funding for EPA, a $2.6 billion or 29-percent
increase from the 2021 enacted level. Resources provided through the 2023 Budget complement
investments in water infrastructure, including lead pipe replacements, and in the remediation of
contaminated and idle land provided in the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Bipartisan
Infrastructure Law).
106 Environmental Protection Agency
create good-paying jobs, clean up pollution, implement Justice40, advance racial equity, and
secure environmental justice for communities that too often have been left behind, including
rural and tribal communities. This funding includes $100 million for support of a new community air quality monitoring and notification program and additional investments in protection
for fenceline communities, civil rights compliance, and environmental permitting.
• Upgrades Drinking Water and Wastewater Infrastructure Nationwide. The Budget
provides roughly $4 billion for water infrastructure, an increase of $1 billion over the 2021 enacted level. These resources would advance efforts to upgrade drinking water and wastewater
infrastructure nationwide, with a focus on underserved communities that have historically
been overlooked. The Budget funds all of the authorizations in the original Drinking Water
and Wastewater Infrastructure Act of 2021, including the creation of 20 new targeted water
grant programs and an increase of over $160 million above 2021 enacted levels for the Reducing
Lead in Drinking Water grant program. The Budget also maintains funding for EPA’s State
Revolving Funds (SRF) at 2021 enacted levels, which would complement the $23.4 billion provided for the traditional SRF programs in the Bipartisan Infrastructure Law.
• Protects Communities from Hazardous Waste and Environmental Damage. Preventing
and cleaning up environmental damage that harms communities and poses a risk to public
health and safety continues to be a top priority for the Administration. The Budget provides
nearly $1.2 billion for the Superfund program for EPA to continue cleaning up some of the
Nation’s most contaminated land and respond to environmental emergencies and natural disasters, and begins to adjust for revenue from the Superfund tax. The Budget also provides
$215 million for EPA’s Brownfields program to enable EPA to provide technical assistance and
grants to communities, including disadvantaged communities, so they can safely clean up and
reuse contaminated properties. These funds complement Brownfields funding provided in the
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law. These programs also support presidential priorities such as
the Cancer Moonshot initiative, by addressing contaminants that lead to greater cancer risk.
• Strengthens the Administration’s Commitment to Successfully Implement the
Toxic Substances Control Act (TSCA) and Transform the Science of New Chemical
Reviews. The Budget provides $124 million and 449 FTE for TSCA efforts to deliver on the
promises made to the American people by the Frank R. Lautenberg Chemical Safety for the
21st Century Act. These resources would provide resources to complete EPA-initiated chemical risk evaluations, issue protective regulations in accordance with statutory timelines and
establish a pipeline of prioritized chemicals for risk evaluation.
• Tackles Per- and Polyfluoroalkyl Substances (PFAS) Pollution. PFAS are a set
of man-made chemicals that threaten the health and safety of communities across the
Nation, disproportionately impacting historically disadvantaged communities. As part of
the President’s commitment to tackling PFAS pollution, the Budget provides approximately
$126 million, $57 million over the 2021 enacted level, for EPA to: increase the understanding
of PFAS impacts to human health, as well as its ecological effects; restrict use to prevent PFAS
from entering the air, land, and water; and remediate PFAS that have been released into the
environment.
• Enforces and Assures Compliance with the Nation’s Environmental Laws. The
Budget provides $213 million for civil enforcement efforts, which includes funding to increase
enforcement efforts in communities with high pollution exposure and to prevent the illegal
importations and use of HFCs in the United States. The Budget also includes: $7 million to operate a coal combustion residuals compliance program; $148 million for compliance monitoring
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 107
efforts, including funds to conduct inspections in underserved and overburdened communities;
and $69 million for criminal enforcement efforts, which includes funding to increase outreach
to victims of environmental crimes and to develop a specialized criminal enforcement task
force to address environmental justice issues in partnership with the Department of Justice.

109
NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND
SPACE ADMINISTRATION
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Enhances U.S. Human Spaceflight Leadership. The Budget provides $7.5 billion,
$1.1 billion above the 2021 enacted level, for Artemis lunar exploration. Artemis would return American astronauts to the Moon as early as 2025, land the first woman and person of
color on the Moon, deepen the Nation’s scientific understanding of the Moon, and test technologies that would allow humans to safely and sustainably explore Mars. Lunar landing
missions would also include astronauts from international partners.
• Addresses the Climate Crisis. The Budget invests $2.4 billion in Earth-observing satellites and related research to improve the Nation’s understanding of climate change. The
new satellite missions would form an Earth System Observatory that would provide a threedimensional, holistic view of Earth that is needed to better understand natural hazards and
climate change. In addition, NASA would collaborate with other agencies to enhance greenhouse gas monitoring and make greenhouse gas data more accessible to a broad range of
users. The Budget also provides more than $500 million to reduce the climate impacts of the
aviation industry as part of a $972 million request for NASA’s Aeronautics program. This
includes the Sustainable Flight National Partnership, through which NASA and U.S. companies would develop and fly a highly-efficient, next-generation airliner prototype as early as
2026.
• Supports the Development of Commercial Space Stations. The Budget supports operations of the International Space Station, paving the way for its continued operation through
2030, and allocates $224 million to support the development of commercial space stations
The National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) inspires the Nation by sending
astronauts and robotic missions to explore the solar system, advances the Nation’s
understanding of the Earth and space, and develops new technologies and approaches to
improve aviation and space activities. The President’s 2023 Budget for NASA invests in: human
and robotic exploration of the Moon; new technologies to improve the Nation’s space capabilities;
and addressing the climate crisis through cutting-edge research satellites and green aviation
research.
The Budget requests $26 billion in discretionary funding for NASA, a $2.7 billion or 11.6-percent
increase from the 2021 enacted level.
110 National Aeronautics and Space Administration
that NASA, other Government agencies, the Nation’s international partners, and the private
sector can use after the International Space Station is retired.
• Advances Robotic Exploration of the Moon and Mars. The Budget invests over $480 million in lunar robotic missions, including a rover to investigate ice deposits that could provide
future astronauts with fuel and oxygen and the Commercial Lunar Payload Services initiative
that supports low-cost deliveries to the Moon. The Budget also provides $822 million for the
Mars Sample Return mission, which would return Martian rock and soil samples to Earth.
• Spurs Research and Development. The Budget increases funding for NASA’s Space
Technology research and development portfolio to more than $1.4 billion, a $338 million increase above the 2021 enacted level. This investment would support new technologies to help
the commercial space industry grow, enhance mission capabilities, and reduce costs. NASA
has a key role in better understanding the worsening orbital debris environment and supporting the development of innovative approaches to help protect the Nation’s satellites and
reduce the risk posed by space debris. The Budget provides over $30 million for orbital debris
research, early-stage technology, and measurement technologies.
• Broadens Participation in Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics
(STEM). The Budget provides $150 million, $23 million above the 2021 enacted level, for
NASA’s Office of STEM Engagement in order to attract diverse groups of students to STEM
through learning opportunities that spark interest and provide connections to NASA’s mission
and work. This effort includes targeted engagement of underserved populations, including
underserved students and people of color.
111
NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Spurs Climate Research and Development. The Budget provides $1.6 billion for research and development, an increase of more than $500 million above the 2021 enacted level,
to better understand and prepare for the adverse impacts of climate change. This robust
investment would support research in atmospheric composition, water and carbon cycles,
modeling climate systems, renewable energy technologies, materials sciences, plant genomics, climate resilience technologies for communities heavily affected by climate change, and
social, behavioral, and economic research on human responses to climate change.
• Strengthens U.S. Leadership in Emerging Technologies. The Budget provides
$880 million for the Directorate for Technology, Innovation, and Partnerships within NSF to
help translate research into practical applications. The Directorate will work with programs
across the Agency and with other Federal and non-Federal entities to expedite technology
development in emerging areas that are crucial for U.S. technological leadership, including trustworthy artificial intelligence, high performance computing, disaster response and
resilience, quantum information systems, robotics, advanced communications technologies,
biotechnology, cybersecurity, advanced energy technologies, and materials science. The
Budget provides an additional $10 million to build and strengthen the national cybersecurity
workforce pipeline through education, K-12 programs, and funding to universities and colleges. These investments would help improve U.S. competitiveness in emerging technologies.
• Advances Racial Equity in Science and Engineering. The Budget provides $393 million,
an increase of $172 million or 78 percent above the 2021 enacted level, for programs to increase
the participation of historically underrepresented communities in science and engineering
fields. Funding would support: curriculum design; research on successful recruitment and
retention methods; development of outreach or mentorship programs; fellowships; and building science and engineering research and education capacity at Historically Black Colleges
The National Science Foundation (NSF) is responsible for promoting the progress of science
and for science education. The President’s 2023 Budget for NSF invests in combatting the
climate crisis, strengthening U.S. leadership in emerging technologies, boosting research and
development, and advancing equity.
The Budget requests $10.5 billion in discretionary funding for NSF, a $2 billion or 24-percent
increase from the 2021 enacted level.
112 National Science Foundation
and Universities and other Minority-Serving Institutions. These investments would help ensure the U.S. science and technology workforce reflects the Nation as a whole.
• Fosters Scientific and Technological Advances. The Budget provides $2 billion for research infrastructure at NSF, an increase of $65 million above the 2021 enacted level. Funding
would support the construction and procurement of research facilities and instrumentation
across the Nation to enable scientific and technological advances. The Budget also supports
major NSF research facilities, including long-term upgrades of NSF’s major Antarctic infrastructure, construction of the Vera C. Rubin Observatory to support astronomy research, and
upgrades to the Large Hadron Collider, the world’s largest particle accelerator.
113
SMALL BUSINESS ADMINISTRATION
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Supports Underserved Entrepreneurs. The Budget provides a $31 million increase over
the 2021 enacted level to support women, people of color, veterans, and other underserved entrepreneurs through SBA’s Entrepreneurial Development programs. This bold commitment
ensures entrepreneurs have access to counseling, training, and mentoring services. Access
to these services is essential to addressing inequities, expanding economic opportunity, and
ensuring small businesses have the tools to succeed.
• Expands Access to Capital for Small Businesses. The Budget addresses the need for
greater access to affordable capital, particularly in underserved communities. The Budget
increases the authorized lending levels in SBA’s flagship 7(a) loan guarantee program, the
504 loan program for fixed assets, Small Business Investment Companies, and the Secondary
Market Guarantee program by a total of $9.5 billion. Increasing these lending levels would
drive economic growth by significantly expanding the availability of working capital, fixed
capital, and venture capital funding for small businesses.
• Strengthens Domestic Manufacturing. Investing in Growth Accelerators, Regional
Innovation Clusters, as well as the Federal and State Technology Partnership Program is key
to ensuring entrepreneurs have access to the tools, networks, and services they need to bring
cutting-edge innovation to the market. The Budget provides $30 million, an $18 million
increase over the 2021 enacted level, to build and strengthen these innovation ecosystems.
The Budget also provides $4 million for the creation of a Manufacturing Hub to expand SBA’s
capacity to support domestic manufacturing by helping small businesses connect with service providers to commercialize innovation, automate processes, enter new markets, expand
capacity, and strengthen their resiliency.
The Small Business Administration (SBA) helps to ensure that small businesses and
entrepreneurs have access to the information and resources they need to start, grow, or recover
their business. The President’s 2023 Budget for SBA makes historic investments in counseling
and training programs, expanding access to capital, supporting domestic manufacturing and
innovation, and promoting access to Government contracting opportunities.
The Budget requests $914 million in discretionary funding for SBA, a $159 million or 21-percent
increase from the 2021 enacted level.
114 Small Business Administration
• Implements a Government-Wide Certification Program for Veterans. The Budget
provides $20 million for a uniform certification process to enable veteran and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses to access business opportunities across the Federal
Government.
• Engages Small Businesses in Combatting Climate Change. The Budget provides
$10 million to facilitate access to capital for investments to help small businesses become more
resilient to climate change or support the clean energy economy.
115
SOCIAL SECURITY ADMINISTRATION
The President’s 2023 Budget:
• Improves Service Delivery. Each year, SSA processes more than six million retirement,
survivors, and Medicare claims, as well as more than two million disability and Supplemental
Security Income claims. The Budget provides an increase of $1.6 billion, or 14 percent over
the 2021 enacted level, to improve services at SSA’s field offices, State disability determination services, and teleservice centers for retirees, individuals with disabilities, and their
families who rely on the Agency. The Budget also improves access to SSA’s services by adding
staff to speed disability claims processing and reduce wait times.
• Advances Equity and Accessibility. SSA remains committed to breaking down barriers
to access experienced by people who rely on its services, including individuals experiencing
homelessness, children with disabilities, and people with mental and intellectual disabilities. The Budget makes investments to decrease customer wait times, simplify application
processes, and increase outreach to people who are difficult to reach. SSA will also continue
to modernize its information technology systems to make more services available online and
improve 800 Number access.
• Promotes Program Integrity. The Budget includes $1.8 billion, $224 million above the
2021 enacted level, for dedicated program integrity activities to promote responsible spending
of Social Security funds and ensure that the Agency is providing the correct benefit amounts
only to those who qualify. These funds also support actions to investigate and help prosecute
fraud.
The Social Security Administration (SSA) provides essential benefits to retirees, survivors,
individuals with disabilities, and older Americans with limited income and resources. The
President’s 2023 Budget for SSA invests in improving service delivery, advancing equity, and
promoting program integrity.
The Budget requests $14.8 billion in discretionary funding for SSA, a $1.8 billion or 14-percent
increase from the 2021 enacted level, including funding for program integrity activities.

117
Summary Tables

BUDG
ET OF TH
E U. S. GOV
ERNM
ENT FOR FISCAL Y
EAR 2023 119
Table S–1. Budget Totals 1
(In billions of dollars and as a percent of GDP)
2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–
2027
2023–
2032
Budget totals in billions of dollars:
Receipts ....................................................... 4,047 4,437 4,638 4,874 5,076 5,406 5,696 5,969 6,227 6,500 6,795 7,083 25,690 58,264
Outlays ........................................................ 6,822 5,852 5,792 6,075 6,406 6,734 7,048 7,502 7,670 8,114 8,477 8,867 32,055 72,685
Deficit 2 ..................................................... 2,775 1,415 1,154 1,201 1,330 1,328 1,352 1,533 1,443 1,614 1,682 1,784 6,364 14,421
Debt held by the public ............................... 22,284 24,836 26,033 27,271 28,644 29,988 31,368 32,923 34,388 36,022 37,727 39,542
Debt held by the public net of financial
assets ....................................................... 20,673 22,085 23,238 24,439 25,769 27,097 28,449 29,982 31,425 33,045 34,732 36,516
Gross domestic product (GDP) ....................... 22,358 24,256 25,567 26,694 27,787 28,912 30,080 31,307 32,615 34,018 35,498 37,041
Budget totals as a percent of GDP:
Receipts ....................................................... 18.1% 18.3% 18.1% 18.3% 18.3% 18.7% 18.9% 19.1% 19.1% 19.1% 19.1% 19.1% 18.5% 18.8%
Outlays ........................................................ 30.5% 24.1% 22.7% 22.8% 23.1% 23.3% 23.4% 24.0% 23.5% 23.9% 23.9% 23.9% 23.0% 23.4%
Deficit ....................................................... 12.4% 5.8% 4.5% 4.5% 4.8% 4.6% 4.5% 4.9% 4.4% 4.7% 4.7% 4.8% 4.6% 4.7%
Debt held by the public ............................... 99.7% 102.4% 101.8% 102.2% 103.1% 103.7% 104.3% 105.2% 105.4% 105.9% 106.3% 106.7%
Debt held by the public net of financial
assets ....................................................... 92.5% 91.0% 90.9% 91.6% 92.7% 93.7% 94.6% 95.8% 96.4% 97.1% 97.8% 98.6%
Memorandum, real net interest:
Real net interest in billions of dollars ........ –291 –514 –146 –48 20 73 129 181 221 254 298 337 29 1,319
Real net interest as a percent of GDP ........ –1.3% –2.1% –0.6% –0.2% 0.1% 0.3% 0.4% 0.6% 0.7% 0.7% 0.8% 0.9% 0.0% 0.4%
1 The Budget includes a reserve for legislation that reduces costs, expands productive capacity, and reforms the tax system. While the President is committed to reducing the deficit
with this legislation, this allowance is shown as deficit neutral to be conservative for purposes of the budget totals. Because discussions with Congress continue, the Budget does
not break down the reserve among specific policies or between revenues and outlays.
2 The estimated deficit for 2022 is based on partial year actual data and generally incorporates actuals through February. At the time the 2023 Budget was prepared, 2022
appropriations remained incomplete. The baseline reflects annualized continuing appropriations for 2022.
120
Summary Tabl
e
s
2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–
2027
2023–
2032
Projected deficits in the baseline1 .................... 2,775 1,421 1,176 1,279 1,422 1,399 1,419 1,630 1,562 1,748 1,818 2,014 6,694 15,466
Percent of GDP ..................................................... 12.4% 5.9% 4.6% 4.8% 5.1% 4.8% 4.7% 5.2% 4.8% 5.1% 5.1% 5.4%
Proposals in the 2023 Budget:
Reserve for legislation that reduces costs,
expands productive capacity, and reforms the
tax system2 ....................................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Invest in K–12 education and college
affordability ...................................................... ......... ......... 3 22 28 33 38 44 50 54 55 56 125 383
Improve public health by investing in
preparedness, mental health, tribal health,
and other areas ................................................ ......... ......... 22 44 38 36 37 37 35 37 39 41 177 365
Increase affordable housing supply .................... ......... ......... 1 3 6 7 8 8 6 4 3 2 25 48
Combat and prevent crime .................................. ......... ......... 1 2 3 4 5 4 3 2 2 2 15 28
Minimum tax on billionaires ............................... ......... ......... ......... –36 –40 –43 –43 –43 –43 –38 –36 –38 –163 –361
Additional investments and reforms ................... ......... –6 –50 –112 –124 –103 –104 –137 –158 –176 –180 –269 –493 –1,413
Debt service and other interest effects ............... ......... –* –* –1 –3 –5 –7 –9 –12 –15 –19 –24 –16 –95
Total proposals in the 2023 Budget 3 ................ ......... –6 –22 –78 –93 –70 –67 –97 –119 –133 –136 –229 –330 –1,045
Resulting deficits in the 2023 Budget .............. 2,775 1,415 1,154 1,201 1,330 1,328 1,352 1,533 1,443 1,614 1,682 1,784 6,364 14,421
Percent of GDP ..................................................... 12.4% 5.8% 4.5% 4.5% 4.8% 4.6% 4.5% 4.9% 4.4% 4.7% 4.7% 4.8%
*$500 million or less
1 At the time the 2023 Budget was prepared, 2022 appropriations remained incomplete. The baseline reflects annualized continuing appropriations for 2022.
2 The Budget includes a reserve for legislation that reduces costs, expands productive capacity, and reforms the tax system. While the President is committed to reducing the deficit
with this legislation, this allowance is shown as deficit neutral to be conservative for purposes of the budget totals. Because discussions with Congress continue, the Budget does
not break down the reserve among specific policies or between revenues and outlays.
3 Reflects budget deficit reduction compared to a baseline that does not include the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2022 (Public Law 117–103), which was enacted after the baseline
was finalized. Deficit reduction relative to a baseline that incorporated that legislation would be significantly greater.
Table S–2. Effect of Budget Proposals on Projected Deficits
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in billions of dollars)
BUDG
ET OF TH
E U. S. GOV
ERNM
ENT FOR FISCAL Y
EAR 2023 121
Table S–3. Baseline by Category1
(In billions of dollars)
2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–
2027
2023–
2032
Outlays:
Discretionary programs:
Defense .................................................... 742 766 766 784 802 815 828 847 866 886 906 927 3,995 8,426
Non-defense ............................................. 895 928 873 949 931 935 952 974 994 1,013 1,033 1,055 4,641 9,710
Subtotal, discretionary programs ....... 1,636 1,694 1,639 1,733 1,733 1,750 1,781 1,822 1,860 1,899 1,939 1,981 8,636 18,137
Mandatory programs:
Social Security ......................................... 1,129 1,214 1,313 1,398 1,482 1,571 1,663 1,760 1,858 1,958 2,061 2,167 7,427 17,231
Medicare .................................................. 689 753 847 853 972 1,071 1,158 1,311 1,261 1,420 1,492 1,645 4,901 12,031
Medicaid .................................................. 521 562 536 566 595 627 661 703 749 796 844 896 2,984 6,972
Other mandatory programs .................... 2,495 1,272 954 852 854 870 862 929 915 962 989 1,035 4,393 9,222
Subtotal, mandatory programs .......... 4,834 3,800 3,650 3,670 3,904 4,138 4,344 4,703 4,783 5,136 5,386 5,743 19,705 45,456
Net interest ................................................. 352 357 396 477 567 653 736 818 891 963 1,038 1,116 2,829 7,655
Total outlays ............................................ 6,822 5,852 5,685 5,880 6,204 6,540 6,861 7,342 7,534 7,998 8,363 8,840 31,171 71,248
Receipts:
Individual income taxes .............................. 2,044 2,257 2,305 2,319 2,431 2,727 2,926 3,074 3,241 3,420 3,610 3,789 12,708 29,843
Corporation income taxes ........................... 372 383 412 447 454 437 445 468 465 457 454 455 2,196 4,495
Social insurance and retirement receipts:
Social Security payroll taxes .................. 952 1,047 1,101 1,158 1,208 1,264 1,315 1,381 1,439 1,505 1,575 1,644 6,046 13,590
Medicare payroll taxes ............................ 295 329 343 361 376 393 409 430 448 469 491 514 1,883 4,233
Unemployment insurance ....................... 57 58 55 55 55 55 56 56 60 62 62 64 275 580
Other retirement ..................................... 10 12 12 13 13 14 15 15 16 16 17 18 67 149
Excise taxes ................................................. 75 84 90 95 95 96 96 96 98 100 101 103 473 971
Estate and gift taxes ................................... 27 26 25 25 26 27 41 42 44 47 50 53 144 380
Customs duties ............................................ 80 93 54 46 47 49 51 53 55 58 60 53 247 526
Deposits of earnings, Federal Reserve
System ..................................................... 100 108 76 43 34 35 39 45 50 57 65 73 227 516
Other miscellaneous receipts ..................... 34 35 36 39 42 45 49 52 56 58 60 62 211 499
Total receipts ........................................... 4,047 4,431 4,509 4,601 4,782 5,142 5,442 5,712 5,972 6,250 6,545 6,826 24,476 55,781
Deficit ............................................................. 2,775 1,421 1,176 1,279 1,422 1,399 1,419 1,630 1,562 1,748 1,818 2,014 6,694 15,466
Net interest ................................................. 352 357 396 477 567 653 736 818 891 963 1,038 1,116 2,829 7,655
Primary deficit ............................................ 2,423 1,064 780 801 855 746 683 813 672 784 780 898 3,865 7,812
On-budget deficit ......................................... 2,724 1,381 1,090 1,164 1,277 1,224 1,220 1,406 1,300 1,456 1,495 1,656 5,976 13,289
Off-budget deficit/surplus (–) ...................... 52 41 86 115 145 174 198 225 262 292 323 357 718 2,178
1 Baseline estimates are on the basis of the economic assumptions shown in Table S–9, which incorporate the effects of the Administration’s fiscal policies and incorporate certain
adjustments described in the “Current Services” chapter of the Analytical Perspectives volume. At the time the 2023 Budget was prepared, 2022 appropriations remained
incomplete. The baseline reflects annualized continuing appropriations for 2022. See Tables S–7 and S–8 for more information about discretionary funding levels.
122
Summary Tabl
e
s
Table S–4. Proposed Budget by Category 1
(In billions of dollars)
2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–
2027
2023–
2032
Outlays:
Discretionary programs:
Defense .................................................... 742 766 795 822 837 843 853 864 872 879 885 891 4,150 8,541
Non-defense ............................................. 895 928 915 1,022 1,012 1,019 1,026 1,030 1,039 1,051 1,065 1,083 4,993 10,261
Subtotal, discretionary programs ....... 1,636 1,694 1,709 1,844 1,848 1,862 1,879 1,894 1,911 1,930 1,950 1,974 9,142 18,802
Mandatory programs:
Social Security ......................................... 1,129 1,214 1,313 1,398 1,482 1,570 1,662 1,759 1,857 1,957 2,059 2,165 7,425 17,222
Medicare .................................................. 689 753 846 853 971 1,070 1,157 1,310 1,260 1,420 1,513 1,612 4,898 12,013
Medicaid .................................................. 521 562 536 567 599 631 666 706 752 799 847 898 2,999 7,001
Other mandatory programs .................... 2,495 1,272 993 937 942 953 954 1,024 1,012 1,060 1,088 1,126 4,778 10,089
Subtotal, mandatory programs .......... 4,834 3,800 3,687 3,755 3,994 4,224 4,439 4,800 4,880 5,236 5,508 5,801 20,099 46,324
Net interest ................................................. 352 357 396 476 564 648 729 808 879 948 1,019 1,092 2,813 7,559
Total outlays ............................................ 6,822 5,852 5,792 6,075 6,406 6,734 7,048 7,502 7,670 8,114 8,477 8,867 32,055 72,685
Receipts:
Individual income taxes .............................. 2,044 2,263 2,345 2,427 2,549 2,819 3,007 3,156 3,324 3,502 3,692 3,876 13,147 30,698
Corporation income taxes ........................... 372 383 501 616 633 612 620 644 638 627 623 625 2,982 6,139
Social insurance and retirement receipts:
Social Security payroll taxes .................. 952 1,047 1,101 1,158 1,208 1,264 1,315 1,381 1,439 1,505 1,575 1,644 6,046 13,590
Medicare payroll taxes ............................ 295 329 342 360 375 392 408 428 446 467 489 512 1,876 4,218
Unemployment insurance ....................... 57 58 55 55 55 55 56 56 60 62 62 64 275 579
Other retirement ..................................... 10 12 12 13 13 14 15 15 16 16 17 18 67 149
Excise taxes ................................................. 75 84 91 96 95 96 97 96 99 101 101 103 474 974
Estate and gift taxes ................................... 27 26 25 23 25 25 40 42 45 47 51 54 138 376
Customs duties ............................................ 80 93 54 46 47 49 51 53 55 58 60 53 247 526
Deposits of earnings, Federal Reserve
System ..................................................... 100 108 76 43 34 35 39 45 50 57 65 73 227 516
Other miscellaneous receipts ..................... 34 35 36 39 42 45 49 52 56 58 60 62 211 499
Total receipts ........................................... 4,047 4,437 4,638 4,874 5,076 5,406 5,696 5,969 6,227 6,500 6,795 7,083 25,690 58,264
Deficit ............................................................. 2,775 1,415 1,154 1,201 1,330 1,328 1,352 1,533 1,443 1,614 1,682 1,784 6,364 14,421
Net interest ................................................. 352 357 396 476 564 648 729 808 879 948 1,019 1,092 2,813 7,559
Primary deficit ............................................ 2,423 1,058 758 724 766 680 622 725 565 667 663 692 3,551 6,862
On-budget deficit ......................................... 2,724 1,374 1,068 1,085 1,184 1,153 1,153 1,308 1,181 1,323 1,360 1,428 5,643 12,243
Off-budget deficit/surplus (–) ...................... 52 41 86 116 146 175 199 225 262 292 322 356 721 2,178
1 The Budget includes a reserve for legislation that reduces costs, expands productive capacity, and reforms the tax system. While the President is committed to reducing the deficit
with this legislation, this allowance is shown as deficit neutral to be conservative for purposes of the budget totals. Because discussions with Congress continue, the Budget does
not break down the reserve among specific policies or between revenues and outlays.
BUDG
ET OF TH
E U. S. GOV
ERNM
ENT FOR FISCAL Y
EAR 2023 123
Table S–5. Proposed Budget by Category as a Percent of GDP1
(As a percent of GDP)
2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Averages
2023–
2027
2023–
2032
Outlays:
Discretionary programs:
Defense .................................................... 3.3 3.2 3.1 3.1 3.0 2.9 2.8 2.8 2.7 2.6 2.5 2.4 3.0 2.8
Non-defense ............................................. 4.0 3.8 3.6 3.8 3.6 3.5 3.4 3.3 3.2 3.1 3.0 2.9 3.6 3.3
Subtotal, discretionary programs ....... 7.3 7.0 6.7 6.9 6.7 6.4 6.2 6.0 5.9 5.7 5.5 5.3 6.6 6.1
Mandatory programs:
Social Security ......................................... 5.0 5.0 5.1 5.2 5.3 5.4 5.5 5.6 5.7 5.8 5.8 5.8 5.3 5.5
Medicare .................................................. 3.1 3.1 3.3 3.2 3.5 3.7 3.8 4.2 3.9 4.2 4.3 4.4 3.5 3.8
Medicaid .................................................. 2.3 2.3 2.1 2.1 2.2 2.2 2.2 2.3 2.3 2.3 2.4 2.4 2.2 2.2
Other mandatory programs .................... 11.2 5.2 3.9 3.5 3.4 3.3 3.2 3.3 3.1 3.1 3.1 3.0 3.5 3.3
Subtotal, mandatory programs .......... 21.6 15.7 14.4 14.1 14.4 14.6 14.8 15.3 15.0 15.4 15.5 15.7 14.4 14.9
Net interest ................................................. 1.6 1.5 1.5 1.8 2.0 2.2 2.4 2.6 2.7 2.8 2.9 2.9 2.0 2.4
Total outlays ............................................ 30.5 24.1 22.7 22.8 23.1 23.3 23.4 24.0 23.5 23.9 23.9 23.9 23.0 23.4
Receipts:
Individual income taxes .............................. 9.1 9.3 9.2 9.1 9.2 9.8 10.0 10.1 10.2 10.3 10.4 10.5 9.4 9.9
Corporation income taxes ........................... 1.7 1.6 2.0 2.3 2.3 2.1 2.1 2.1 2.0 1.8 1.8 1.7 2.1 2.0
Social insurance and retirement receipts:
Social Security payroll taxes .................. 4.3 4.3 4.3 4.3 4.3 4.4 4.4 4.4 4.4 4.4 4.4 4.4 4.3 4.4
Medicare payroll taxes ............................ 1.3 1.4 1.3 1.3 1.3 1.4 1.4 1.4 1.4 1.4 1.4 1.4 1.3 1.4
Unemployment insurance ....................... 0.3 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2
Other retirement ..................................... * * * * * * * * * * * * * *
Excise taxes ................................................. 0.3 0.3 0.4 0.4 0.3 0.3 0.3 0.3 0.3 0.3 0.3 0.3 0.3 0.3
Estate and gift taxes ................................... 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.1
Customs duties ............................................ 0.4 0.4 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.1 0.2 0.2
Deposits of earnings, Federal Reserve
System ..................................................... 0.4 0.4 0.3 0.2 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2
Other miscellaneous receipts ..................... 0.2 0.1 0.1 0.1 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2 0.2
Total receipts ........................................... 18.1 18.3 18.1 18.3 18.3 18.7 18.9 19.1 19.1 19.1 19.1 19.1 18.5 18.8
Deficit ............................................................. 12.4 5.8 4.5 4.5 4.8 4.6 4.5 4.9 4.4 4.7 4.7 4.8 4.6 4.7
Net interest ................................................. 1.6 1.5 1.5 1.8 2.0 2.2 2.4 2.6 2.7 2.8 2.9 2.9 2.0 2.4
Primary deficit ............................................ 10.8 4.4 3.0 2.7 2.8 2.4 2.1 2.3 1.7 2.0 1.9 1.9 2.6 2.3
On-budget deficit ......................................... 12.2 5.7 4.2 4.1 4.3 4.0 3.8 4.2 3.6 3.9 3.8 3.9 4.1 4.0
Off-budget deficit/surplus (–) ...................... 0.2 0.2 0.3 0.4 0.5 0.6 0.7 0.7 0.8 0.9 0.9 1.0 0.5 0.7
*0.05 percent of GDP or less
1 The Budget includes a reserve for legislation that reduces costs, expands productive capacity, and reforms the tax system. While the President is committed to reducing the deficit
with this legislation, this allowance is shown as deficit neutral to be conservative for purposes of the budget totals. Because discussions with Congress continue, the Budget does
not break down the reserve among specific policies or between revenues and outlays.
124
Summary Tabl
e
s
Table S–6. Mandatory and Receipt Proposals
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in millions of dollars)
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–2027 2023–2032
Mandatory initiatives and savings:
Multi-agency proposals:
Reserve for legislation that reduces costs, expands
productive capacity, and reforms the tax system ..... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Transform mental health & substance use disorder
coverage and infrastructure:
Department of Health and Human Services:
Invest in behavioral health workforce and
delivery .............................................................. ......... 750 750 750 750 750 750 750 750 750 750 3,750 7,500
Expand and convert Medicaid demonstration
programs to improve community behavioral
health services into a permanent program ...... ......... 45 1,430 1,960 2,430 2,560 2,750 2,930 3,120 3,320 3,520 8,425 24,065
Establish Medicaid provider capacity grants
for mental health & substance use disorder
treatment ........................................................... ......... 40 170 1,640 2,340 2,600 710 ......... ......... ......... ......... 6,790 7,500
Utilize clinically appropriate criteria for
Medicaid behavioral health services ................ ......... 190 200 210 220 230 240 250 270 280 290 1,050 2,380
Establish performance bonus fund to improve
behavioral health in Medicaid .......................... ......... 500 500 500 500 500 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... 2,500 2,500
Apply the Mental Health Parity and Addiction
Equity Act (MHPAEA) to Medicare ................. ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Eliminate the 190-day lifetime limit on
psychiatric hospital services ............................. ......... 30 90 110 110 120 120 130 140 140 150 460 1,140
Revise criteria for psychiatric hospital
terminations from Medicare ............................. ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Modernize Medicare mental health benefits 1 ...... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Require Medicare to cover three behavioral
health visits without cost-sharing .................... ......... ......... 100 130 140 150 160 150 170 170 180 520 1,350
Increase access to consumer protections in selfinsured non-federal governmental plans ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Provide mandatory funding for state
enforcement of mental health parity
requirements ..................................................... ......... 10 40 25 25 25 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... 125 125
Permanently extend funding for Community
Mental Health Centers (CMHCs) .................... ......... 124 289 372 413 413 413 413 413 413 413 1,611 3,676
Department of Labor:
Authorize the Department of Labor (DOL) to
pursue parity violations by entities that
provide administrative services to Employee
Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA)
group health plans ............................................ ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Amend ERISA to allow participants and
beneficiaries to recover losses due to parity
violations ........................................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Authorize DOL to impose civil monetary
penalties for MHPAEA noncompliance ............ ......... ......... –3 –4 –4 –4 –4 –4 –4 –4 –4 –15 –35
BUDG
ET OF TH
E U. S. GOV
ERNM
ENT FOR FISCAL Y
EAR 2023 125
Table S–6. Mandatory and Receipt Proposals—Continued
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in millions of dollars)
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–2027 2023–2032
Provide mandatory funding for DOL to perform
additional Non-Quantitative Treatment
Limitations (NQTL) audits ............................... ......... 2 5 25 25 34 35 36 37 38 38 91 275
Cross-Cutting proposals:
Improve access to behavioral healthcare in the
private insurance market 2 ............................... ......... 1,881 2,664 2,842 2,933 3,052 3,184 3,354 3,503 3,661 3,847 13,371 30,920
Require coverage of three behavioral health
visits and three primary care visits without
cost-sharing 2 ...................................................... ......... 1,202 1,740 1,823 1,937 2,025 2,117 2,229 2,316 2,388 2,506 8,728 20,284
Subtotal, transform mental health & substance
use disorder coverage and infrastructure ........ ......... 4,774 7,975 10,383 11,819 12,455 10,475 10,238 10,715 11,156 11,690 47,406 101,680
Increase affordable housing supply:
Department of Housing and Urban Development:
Fund affordable housing production grants ........ ......... 500 2,000 3,500 4,500 5,000 4,500 3,000 1,500 500 ......... 15,500 25,000
Reduce affordable housing barriers ..................... ......... 200 800 1,400 1,800 2,000 1,800 1,200 600 200 ......... 6,200 10,000
Department of the Treasury:
Establish Community Development Financial
Institutions Affordable Housing Supply Fund .... ......... 500 500 500 500 500 500 500 500 500 500 2,500 5,000
Allow selective basis boosts for bond-financed
Low-Income Housing Credit projects 2 ............. ......... 2 29 140 354 617 895 1,148 1,359 1,561 1,769 1,142 7,874
Subtotal, increase affordable housing supply ..... ......... 1,202 3,329 5,540 7,154 8,117 7,695 5,848 3,959 2,761 2,269 25,342 47,874
Protect our elections and the right to vote:
Election Assistance Commission:
Fund election grants to increase access and
security .............................................................. ......... 2,040 810 830 840 860 880 900 920 950 970 5,380 10,000
Postal Service:
Expand affordability and reliability of electionrelated mail service ........................................... ......... 500 500 500 500 500 500 500 500 500 500 2,500 5,000
Subtotal, protect our elections and the right to
vote ..................................................................... ......... 2,540 1,310 1,330 1,340 1,360 1,380 1,400 1,420 1,450 1,470 7,880 15,000
Expand legal representation for asylum seekers:
Department of Health and Human Services:
Provide unaccompanied children with legal
representation ................................................... ......... 120 302 470 644 892 1,063 1,121 1,161 1,194 1,223 2,428 8,190
Department of Justice:
Provide representation in the immigration court
system ................................................................ ......... 68 248 428 450 450 450 450 450 450 450 1,644 3,894
Subtotal, expand legal representation for asylum
seekers ............................................................... ......... 188 550 898 1,094 1,342 1,513 1,571 1,611 1,644 1,673 4,072 12,084
Advance child welfare:
Department of Health and Human Services:
126
Summary Tabl
e
s
Table S–6. Mandatory and Receipt Proposals—Continued
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in millions of dollars)
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–2027 2023–2032
Create new flexibilities and support in the
Chafee program for youth who experienced
foster care .......................................................... ......... 100 100 100 100 100 100 100 100 100 100 500 1,000
Prevent and combat religious, sexual orientation,
gender identity, gender expression, or sex
discrimination in the child welfare system ..... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Expand and encourage participation in the
title IV-E Prevention Services and Kinship
Navigator programs .......................................... 161 280 318 376 445 389 457 539 628 701 767 1,808 4,900
Reauthorize, increase funding for, and amend the
Promoting Safe and Stable Families program .... ......... 78 250 292 295 300 300 300 300 300 300 1,215 2,715
Increase support for foster care placements with
kin caregivers .................................................... ......... 91 100 108 116 126 136 145 155 162 169 541 1,308
Reduce reimbursement rates for foster care
congregate care placements .............................. ......... –27 –24 –21 –18 –17 –16 –15 –14 –14 –14 –107 –180
Department of the Treasury:
Make the adoption tax credit refundable and
allow certain guardianship arrangements to
qualify 2 .............................................................. ......... 11 2,037 1,244 1,015 1,038 1,009 1,016 1,031 1,043 1,050 5,345 10,494
Subtotal, advance child welfare ........................... 161 533 2,781 2,099 1,953 1,936 1,986 2,085 2,200 2,292 2,372 9,302 20,237
Ensure future pandemic and public health
preparedness:
Department of Health and Human Services:
Invest in development of medical
countermeasures, surge capacity, and public
health systems .................................................. ......... 13,509 28,734 17,183 10,354 6,627 4,449 723 120 ......... ......... 76,407 81,699
Establish the Vaccines for Adults program .......... ......... 1,712 2,155 2,238 2,326 2,416 2,511 2,608 2,711 2,816 2,926 10,847 24,419
Expand Vaccines for Children (VFC) program
to all Children’s Health Insurance Program
(CHIP) children and make program
improvements .................................................... ......... 20 30 30 30 20 40 30 30 20 30 130 280
Authorize coverage for drugs and devices
authorized for emergency use 1 ......................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Encourage development of innovative
antimicrobial drugs 1 ......................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Consolidate all vaccine coverage under Medicare
Part B ................................................................. ......... ......... 400 460 450 440 420 400 370 350 290 1,750 3,580
Ensure consistency and clarity of data reporting
requirements for Medicare providers,
suppliers, and contractors during public
health emergencies ........................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Enable the Secretary to temporarily modify or
waive the application of specific requirements
of the Clinical Laboratory Improvement
Amendments of 1988 (CLIA) Act 1 .................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Department of State and United States Agency for
International Development (USAID)
BUDG
ET OF TH
E U. S. GOV
ERNM
ENT FOR FISCAL Y
EAR 2023 127
Table S–6. Mandatory and Receipt Proposals—Continued
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in millions of dollars)
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–2027 2023–2032
Strengthen the global health workforce, advance
research and development capacity, and
increase health security financing ................... ......... 2,275 1,950 1,625 325 325 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... 6,500 6,500
Subtotal, ensure future pandemic and public
health preparedness ......................................... ......... 17,516 33,269 21,536 13,485 9,828 7,420 3,761 3,231 3,186 3,246 95,634 116,478
Reclassifications:
Shift the Indian Health Service from discretionary
to mandatory funding
Technical Reclassification:
Reduction in discretionary spending (non-add) ... ......... –7,398 –8,977 –9,498 –9,716 –9,939 –10,170 –10,402 –10,641 –10,886 –11,136 –45,528 –98,763
Shift to mandatory spending ........................... ......... 7,398 8,977 9,498 9,716 9,939 10,170 10,402 10,641 10,886 11,136 45,528 98,763
Provide adequate funding and close service gaps ......... ......... 2,721 6,272 10,022 13,986 18,178 20,207 21,762 23,421 25,191 33,001 141,760
Total IHS Request (Budget authority) (non-add) .. ......... 9,121 12,731 16,535 20,545 24,777 29,246 30,956 32,771 34,697 36,741 83,709 248,120
End Deficit Reduction Contributions from
Passenger Security Fee ......................................... ......... 1,520 1,560 1,600 1,640 1,680 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... 8,000 8,000
Discretionary effects (non-add) ............................. ......... –1,520 –1,560 –1,600 –1,640 –1,680 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... –8,000 –8,000
Provide mandatory funding for previously enacted
Tribal Water Settlements Operations and
Maintenance .......................................................... ......... 20 34 34 34 34 34 34 34 34 34 156 326
Discretionary effects (non-add) ............................. ......... –20 –34 –34 –34 –34 –34 –34 –34 –34 –34 –156 –326
Reclassify Tribal Lease Payments ............................ ......... 55 56 57 58 60 61 62 63 64 66 286 602
Discretionary effects (non-add) ............................. ......... –55 –56 –57 –58 –60 –61 –62 –63 –64 –66 –286 –602
Reclassify Contract Support Costs ........................... ......... 237 397 410 422 434 447 456 466 474 484 1,900 4,227
Discretionary effects (non-add) ............................. ......... –237 –397 –410 –422 –434 –447 –456 –466 –474 –484 –1,900 –4,227
Subtotal, reclassifications ..................................... ......... 9,230 13,745 17,871 21,892 26,133 28,890 31,161 32,966 34,879 36,911 88,871 253,678
Program integrity proposals:
Capture savings to Medicare and Medicaid from
Health Care Fraud and Abuse Control (HCFAC)
allocation adjustment ........................................... ......... –1,119 –1,181 –1,246 –1,315 –1,354 –1,393 –1,435 –1,479 –1,523 –1,569 –6,215 –13,614
Implement HCFAC allocation adjustment,
discretionary outlays (non-add) ........................ ......... 576 593 611 629 648 667 687 708 729 751 3,057 6,599
Net effect of HCFAC allocation adjustment (nonadd) .................................................................... ......... –543 –588 –635 –686 –706 –726 –748 –771 –794 –818 –3,158 –7,015
Capture savings to Unemployment Insurance (UI)
from Reemployment Services and Eligibility
Assessments (RESEA) allocation adjustment 2 ... –290 –474 –684 –701 –630 –618 –597 –583 –574 –851 –911 –3,107 –6,623
Implement RESEA allocation adjustment,
discretionary outlays (non-add) ........................ 79 249 424 528 605 631 648 661 677 692 709 2,437 5,824
Net effect of RESEA allocation adjustment (nonadd) .................................................................... –211 –225 –260 –173 –25 13 51 78 103 –159 –202 –670 –799
Capture savings from the Social Security
Administration (SSA) allocation adjustments 3 ... ......... –112 –1,776 –3,142 –3,992 –4,885 –6,021 –6,289 –7,440 –8,242 –8,981 –13,907 –50,880
Implement SSA allocation adjustments,
discretionary outlays (non-add) ........................ ......... 1,516 1,579 1,405 1,502 1,577 1,626 1,683 1,765 1,801 1,834 7,579 16,288
128
Summary Tabl
e
s
Table S–6. Mandatory and Receipt Proposals—Continued
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in millions of dollars)
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–2027 2023–2032
Net effect of SSA allocation adjustments (nonadd) .................................................................... ......... 1,404 –197 –1,737 –2,490 –3,308 –4,395 –4,606 –5,675 –6,441 –7,147 –6,328 –34,592
Subtotal, program integrity proposals ................. –290 –1,705 –3,641 –5,089 –5,937 –6,857 –8,011 –8,307 –9,493 –10,616 –11,461 –23,229 –71,117
Increase Afghan Special Immigrant Visas ................... ......... 52 81 80 72 66 64 58 52 53 54 351 632
Smooth and extend BBEDCA Section 251A
sequestration .............................................................. ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... 1,730 22,450 –36,537 ......... –12,357
Proposals by Agency:
Department of Defense--Military Programs:
Extend authority to provide increased voluntary
separation incentive pay for civilian employees of
the Department of Defense ................................... ......... 1 1 1 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... 3 3
Authorize mandatory collection of Survivor
Benefit Plan premiums from Veterans Disability
Compensation ........................................................ ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Expand the current Medicare Eligible Retiree
Health Care Fund to include all uniformed
services retiree health care costs ......................... ......... ......... 464 462 406 351 209 52 –99 –235 –355 1,683 1,255
Establish reserve component duty status reform ..... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Department of Education
Double the maximum Pell Grant by 2029 ............... ......... 2,847 8,442 12,710 16,988 21,428 26,563 32,148 35,348 36,010 36,671 62,415 229,155
Increase the Pell Grant discretionary award (effect
on mandatory costs) .............................................. ......... ......... 54 125 125 126 135 148 148 149 150 430 1,160
Shift mandatory funds to support Pell award
increase .................................................................. ......... ......... –54 –125 –125 –126 –135 –148 –148 –149 –150 –430 –1,160
Increase Title I funding ............................................ ......... 640 13,455 15,205 16,354 17,050 17,442 17,844 18,252 18,674 19,102 62,704 154,018
Title I Mandatory Request (Budget authority)
(non-add) ........................................................... ......... 16,000 16,368 16,745 17,130 17,523 17,927 18,338 18,761 19,192 19,634 83,766 177,618
Department of Energy:
Strengthen clean energy manufacturing ................. ......... 40 100 160 180 190 160 100 40 20 10 670 1,000
Department of Health and Human Services:
Fund the Administration’s HIV/AIDS strategy:
Eliminate barriers to pre-exposure prophylaxis
(PrEP) under Medicaid ..................................... ......... –290 –310 –340 –370 –390 –430 –460 –500 –530 –580 –1,700 –4,200
Establish PrEP Delivery Program to end the
HIV epidemic ..................................................... ......... 213 371 526 687 853 1,027 1,206 1,394 1,587 1,789 2,650 9,653
Extend and expand the Maternal Infant Early
Childhood Home Visiting (MIECHV) program ... ......... 19 142 415 532 611 646 502 116 22 ......... 1,719 3,005
Provide CMS Program Management
Implementation Funding ...................................... ......... 50 150 100 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... 300 300
Standardize data collection to improve quality and
promote equitable care ......................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Add Medicare coverage of services furnished by
community health workers 1 ................................. ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Establish a Contingency Fund for the
Unaccompanied Children Program ...................... ......... 696 1,315 1,439 789 201 108 62 31 ......... ......... 4,440 4,641
BUDG
ET OF TH
E U. S. GOV
ERNM
ENT FOR FISCAL Y
EAR 2023 129
Table S–6. Mandatory and Receipt Proposals—Continued
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in millions of dollars)
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–2027 2023–2032
Treat certain populations as refugees for public
benefit purposes .................................................... ......... 111 122 127 132 138 133 11 4 4 4 630 786
Prohibit unsolicited Medicare beneficiary contacts 1 ... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Expand tools to identify and investigate fraud in
the Medicare Advantage program1 ...................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Hold long-term care facility owners accountable for
noncompliant closures and substandard care ..... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Increase transparency by disclosing accreditation
surveys ................................................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Remove restrictions on the certification of new
entities as Organ Procurement Organizations
and increase enforcement flexibility .................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Enhance the physician fee schedule conversion
factor update in CY 2025 ...................................... ......... ......... ......... 250 380 410 430 460 480 500 540 1,040 3,450
Modify the Medicaid Drug Rebate Program in the
Territories .............................................................. ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Enhance Medicaid managed care enforcement ....... ......... –100 –200 –200 –200 –200 –200 –200 –200 –300 –300 –900 –2,100
Medicaid interactions ............................................... ......... ......... ......... 60 100 100 30 ......... ......... ......... ......... 260 290
Department of Homeland Security:
Establish Electronic Visa Update System user fee 2 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Extend expiring Customs and Border Protection
(CBP) user fees ...................................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... –5,939 ......... –5,939
Establish an affordability program for the National
Flood Insurance Program ..................................... ......... 43 328 375 427 480 534 580 630 676 720 1,653 4,793
Department of Justice:
Combat and prevent crime ....................................... ......... 1,064 2,055 3,289 4,157 4,535 3,551 2,875 2,249 1,992 1,892 15,100 27,662
Department of Labor:
Shift timing of Pension Benefit Guarantee
Corporation’s Single Employer premiums ........... ......... ......... ......... 3,314 –3,314 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Expand Foreign Labor Certification Fees ................ ......... 4 5 –40 –2 4 4 5 6 6 7 –29 –1
Department of the Treasury:
Reduce paperwork burden by permanently
authorizing current home to work transportation
for the IRS Commissioner .................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Amend the Bank Merger Act to allow for the
transition of Treasury-sponsored debit cards
accounts ................................................................. ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Fund the Federal Payment Levy Program via
collections 2 ............................................................. ......... 22 22 22 22 22 22 22 22 22 22 110 220
Department of Veterans Affairs:
Modernize records management program ............... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Extend authority for the Specially Adapted
Housing Assistive Technology Grant Program .... ......... 1 1 1 1 1 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... 5 5
Extend authority for Specially Adapted Housing
Temporary Residence Adaptation grant .............. ......... 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 5 10
130
Summary Tabl
e
s
Table S–6. Mandatory and Receipt Proposals—Continued
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in millions of dollars)
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–2027 2023–2032
Environmental Protection Agency:
Expand use of pesticide licensing user fees ............. ......... 2 2 2 2 1 1 1 ......... ......... ......... 9 11
General Services Administration:
Establish and capitalize the Federal Capital
Revolving Fund4 .................................................... ......... 966 2,264 1,132 133 –133 83 –183 33 –47 –123 4,362 4,125
Expand the Disposal Fund authorities .................... ......... 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 5 10
International Assistance Programs:
Fund renegotiated Compacts of Free Association1 ... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
National Aeronautics and Space Administration:
Distribute the Science, Space, and Technology
Education Trust Fund ........................................... ......... 16 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... 16 16
Office of Personnel Management:
Amend Administration of Tribal Federal Employees
Health Benefits Program (FEHBP) Enrollment
System ................................................................... ......... 2 2 2 2 2 2 2 2 2 2 10 20
Expand Family Member Eligibility under the
Federal Employees Dental and Vision Insurance
Program (FEDVIP) ............................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Expand FEDVIP to Tribal Employers ..................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Expand FEHBP to Tribal Colleges and Universities ... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Small Business Administration:
Support SBA COVID programs’ oversight and
servicing ................................................................. ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Consumer Product Safety Commission:
Strengthen mandatory recall authorities ................ ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Total, mandatory initiatives and savings ............... –129 40,679 88,132 93,662 90,280 100,036 101,729 102,844 106,201 127,660 65,151 412,789 916,374
Tax proposals:
Reform business and international taxation:
Raise the corporate income tax rate to 28 percent ....... ......... –83,500 –138,893 –136,355 –134,942 –137,761 –139,987 –137,573 –135,244 –134,857 –135,448 –631,451 –1,314,560
Adopt the Undertaxed Profits Rule ............................... ......... ......... –20,427 –33,464 –29,329 –26,655 –26,170 –25,638 –25,109 –25,665 –27,006 –109,875 –239,463
Provide tax incentives for locating jobs and business
activity in the United States and remove tax
deductions for shipping jobs overseas:
Provide tax credit for inshoring jobs to the United
States ..................................................................... ......... 8 13 14 14 15 16 16 17 18 18 64 149
Remove tax deductions for shipping jobs overseas . ......... –8 –13 –14 –14 –15 –16 –16 –17 –18 –18 –64 –149
 Subtotal, provide tax incentives for locating jobs
and business activity in the United States
and remove tax deductions for shipping jobs
overseas ............................................................. ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Prevent basis shifting by related parties through
partnerships ............................................................... ......... –3,320 –5,676 –5,912 –6,153 –6,401 –6,621 –6,785 –6,887 –6,959 –7,025 –27,462 –61,739
BUDG
ET OF TH
E U. S. GOV
ERNM
ENT FOR FISCAL Y
EAR 2023 131
Table S–6. Mandatory and Receipt Proposals—Continued
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in millions of dollars)
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–2027 2023–2032
Conform definition of “control” with corporate
affiliation test ............................................................. ......... –761 –1,104 –1,125 –1,143 –1,158 –1,170 –1,179 –1,182 –1,182 –1,176 –5,291 –11,180
Expand access to retroactive qualified electing fund
elections ...................................................................... ......... ......... –1 –2 –2 –3 –4 –5 –6 –7 –9 –8 –39
Expand the definition of foreign business entity to
include taxable units .................................................. ......... –300 –324 –290 –193 –89 –96 –103 –112 –120 –130 –1,196 –1,757
 Subtotal, reform business and international
taxation .............................................................. ......... –87,881 –166,425 –177,148 –171,762 –172,067 –174,048 –171,283 –168,540 –168,790 –170,794 –775,283 –1,628,738
Support housing and urban development:
Make permanent the New Markets Tax Credit ........... ......... ......... ......... ......... 97 278 483 716 990 1,290 1,602 375 5,456
Subtotal, support housing and urban development .... ......... ......... ......... ......... 97 278 483 716 990 1,290 1,602 375 5,456
Modify fossil fuel taxation:
Eliminate fossil fuel tax preferences:
Repeal the enhanced oil recovery credit .................. ......... ......... ......... –31 –80 –130 –186 –237 –271 –301 –330 –241 –1,566
Repeal the deduction for costs paid or incurred for
any tertiary injectant used as part of tertiary
recovery method5 .................................................. ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Repeal credit for oil and gas produced from
marginal wells ....................................................... ......... ......... –3 –52 –144 –219 –265 –288 –301 –317 –333 –418 –1,922
Repeal expensing of intangible drilling costs .......... ......... –1,508 –2,231 –1,806 –1,401 –847 –600 –597 –601 –590 –561 –7,793 –10,742
Repeal exception to passive loss limitation provided
to working interests in oil and natural gas
properties ............................................................... ......... –10 –9 –9 –9 –8 –8 –8 –8 –7 –7 –45 –83
Repeal the use of percentage depletion with respect
to oil and natural gas wells .................................. ......... –925 –1,037 –1,085 –1,178 –1,267 –1,351 –1,433 –1,510 –1,579 –1,649 –5,492 –13,014
Increase geological and geophysical amortization
period for independent producers ........................ ......... –631 –831 –930 –1,008 –1,045 –1,086 –1,128 –1,158 –1,193 –1,218 –4,445 –10,228
Repeal expensing of mine exploration and
development costs ................................................ ......... –131 –194 –156 –122 –74 –52 –52 –52 –50 –49 –677 –932
Repeal percentage depletion for hard mineral fossil
fuels ........................................................................ ......... –163 –183 –191 –208 –224 –239 –253 –267 –279 –291 –969 –2,298
Repeal capital gains treatment for royalties ........... ......... –27 –52 –54 –57 –62 –64 –66 –69 –71 –73 –252 –595
Repeal the exemption from the corporate income
tax for fossil fuel publicly traded partnerships ... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... –90 –176 –216 –253 –288 ......... –1,023
Eliminate the Oil Spill Liability Trust Fund
(OSLTF) excise tax exemption for crude oil
derived from bitumen and kerogen-rich rock ...... ......... –29 –38 –39 –40 –41 –41 –42 –43 –45 –46 –187 –404
Repeal accelerated amortization of air pollution
control equipment ................................................. ......... –14 –34 –54 –71 –88 –103 –117 –115 –103 –92 –261 –791
Subtotal, eliminate fossil fuel tax preferences .... ......... –3,438 –4,612 –4,407 –4,318 –4,005 –4,085 –4,397 –4,611 –4,788 –4,937 –20,780 –43,598
Modify OSLTF financing and Superfund excise taxes:
Eliminate the tax exemption for crude oil from
bitumen and kerogen-rich rock for the Superfund ... ......... –64 –85 –87 –88 –88 –89 –90 –92 –95 –95 –412 –873
Eliminate drawback for the OSLTF ......................... ......... –53 –70 –71 –72 –72 –72 –72 –72 –72 –72 –338 –698
Subtotal, modify OSLTF financing and
Superfund excise taxes ..................................... ......... –117 –155 –158 –160 –160 –161 –162 –164 –167 –167 –750 –1,571
 Subtotal, modify fossil fuel taxation ....................... ......... –3,555 –4,767 –4,565 –4,478 –4,165 –4,246 –4,559 –4,775 –4,955 –5,104 –21,530 –45,169
132
Summary Tabl
e
s
Table S–6. Mandatory and Receipt Proposals—Continued
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in millions of dollars)
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–2027 2023–2032
Strengthen taxation of high-income taxpayers:
Increase the top marginal income tax rate for high
earners ........................................................................ –5,861 –23,895 –39,877 –46,351 –19,648 –7,909 –8,573 –9,153 –9,796 –10,451 –11,156 –137,680 –186,809
Reform the taxation of capital income .......................... –263 –5,464 –15,229 –17,487 –17,979 –17,969 –18,452 –19,224 –20,025 –20,885 –21,774 –74,128 –174,488
Impose a minimum income tax on the wealthiest
taxpayers .................................................................... ......... ......... –36,115 –40,478 –42,662 –43,395 –43,053 –42,591 –38,087 –36,047 –38,415 –162,650 –360,843
Subtotal, strengthen taxation of high-income
taxpayers ............................................................... –6,124 –29,359 –91,221 –104,316 –80,289 –69,273 –70,078 –70,968 –67,908 –67,383 –71,345 –374,458 –722,140
Support families and students:
Provide income exclusion for student debt relief 6 ....... ......... ......... ......... ......... 2 17 41 266 292 320 351 19 1,289
Subtotal, support families and students .................. ......... ......... ......... ......... 2 17 41 266 292 320 351 19 1,289
Modify estate and gift taxation:
Modify income, estate, and gift tax rules for certain
grantor trusts ............................................................. ......... –452 –1,699 –2,405 –2,349 –3,950 –4,949 –5,504 –6,049 –6,912 –7,261 –10,855 –41,530
Require consistent valuation of promissory notes ....... ......... –342 –716 –747 –697 –695 –658 –649 –637 –619 –601 –3,197 –6,361
Improve tax administration for trusts and decedents’
estates ......................................................................... ......... 15 23 24 25 30 34 38 43 45 49 117 326
Limit duration of generation-skipping transfer tax
exemption ................................................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Subtotal, modify estate and gift taxation ................ ......... –779 –2,392 –3,128 –3,021 –4,615 –5,573 –6,115 –6,643 –7,486 –7,813 –13,935 –47,565
Close loopholes:
Tax carried (profits) interests as ordinary income ....... ......... –406 –677 –675 –674 –672 –679 –692 –706 –720 –735 –3,104 –6,636
Repeal deferral of gain from like-kind exchanges ........ ......... –676 –1,857 –1,914 –1,971 –2,030 –2,091 –2,154 –2,218 –2,285 –2,354 –8,448 –19,550
Require 100 percent recapture of depreciation
deductions as ordinary income for certain
depreciable real property ........................................... ......... –35 –113 –233 –364 –505 –657 –821 –1,000 –1,192 –1,400 –1,250 –6,320
Limit a partner’s deduction in certain syndicated
conservation easement transactions ......................... ......... –925 –4,689 –2,739 –2,114 –1,488 –1,261 –1,299 –1,337 –1,377 –1,419 –11,955 –18,648
Limit use of donor advised funds to avoid private
foundation payout requirement ................................ ......... –16 –15 –10 –6 –3 –2 –3 –3 –3 –3 –50 –64
Extend the period for assessment of tax for certain
Qualified Opportunity Fund investors ...................... ......... –4 –13 –15 –15 –13 –10 –9 –8 –6 –2 –60 –95
Establish an untaxed income account regime for
certain small insurance companies ........................... ......... –908 –2,241 –1,017 –865 –795 –764 –757 –748 –739 –730 –5,826 –9,564
Expand pro rata interest expense disallowance for
business-owned life insurance ................................... ......... –530 –540 –582 –619 –665 –704 –739 –774 –812 –850 –2,936 –6,815
Correct drafting errors in the taxation of insurance
companies under the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 .... ......... –86 –112 –116 –100 –75 –70 –63 –59 –55 –51 –489 –787
Define the term “ultimate purchaser” for purposes of
diesel fuel exportation ............................................... ......... –4 –6 –9 –10 –13 –14 –17 –20 –22 –24 –42 –139
Subtotal, close loopholes ........................................... ......... –3,590 –10,263 –7,310 –6,738 –6,259 –6,252 –6,554 –6,873 –7,211 –7,568 –34,160 –68,618
Improve tax administration and compliance:
Enhance accuracy of tax information:
BUDG
ET OF TH
E U. S. GOV
ERNM
ENT FOR FISCAL Y
EAR 2023 133
Table S–6. Mandatory and Receipt Proposals—Continued
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in millions of dollars)
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–2027 2023–2032
Expand the Secretary’s authority to require
electroning filing for forms and returns ............... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Improve information reporting for reportable
payments subject to backup withholding ............ ......... –38 –87 –148 –202 –211 –221 –231 –241 –252 –276 –686 –1,907
Subtotal, enhance accuracy of tax information ... ......... –38 –87 –148 –202 –211 –221 –231 –241 –252 –276 –686 –1,907
Address taxpayer noncompliance with listed
transactions:
Extend statute of limitations for listed transactions ......... –23 –51 –64 –78 –76 –74 –73 –72 –70 –69 –292 –650
Impose liability on shareholders to collect unpaid
income taxes of applicable corporations .......... ......... –430 –448 –466 –485 –505 –525 –548 –571 –596 –622 –2,334 –5,196
Subtotal, address taxpayer noncompliance ..... ......... –453 –499 –530 –563 –581 –599 –621 –643 –666 –691 –2,626 –5,846
Amend the centralized partnership audit regime to
permit the carryover of a reduction in tax that
exceeds a partner’s tax liability ................................. ......... 5 5 5 5 6 6 7 7 7 7 26 60
Incorporate Chapters 2/2A in centralized partnership
audit regime proceedings ........................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Authorize limited sharing of business tax return
information to measure the economy more
accurately ................................................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Require employers to withhold tax on failed
nonqualified deferred compensation plans ............... ......... –555 –580 –605 –631 –658 –687 –718 –752 –787 –824 –3,029 –6,797
Impose an affirmative requirement to disclose a
position contrary to a regulation ............................... ......... –5 –7 –11 –11 –12 –12 –14 –14 –15 –15 –46 –116
Extend to six years the statute of limitations for
certain tax assessments ............................................. ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Expand and increase penalties for noncompliant
return preparation and e-filing and authorize IRS
oversight of paid preparers:
Expand and increase penalties for noncompliant
return preparation and e-filing 6 .......................... ......... –14 –31 –38 –45 –51 –53 –55 –58 –60 –63 –179 –468
Grant authority to IRS for oversight of all paid
preparers 6 ............................................................. ......... –25 –34 –45 –51 –50 –54 –58 –64 –70 –76 –205 –527
Subtotal, expand and increase penalties for
noncompliant return preparation and e-filing
and authorize IRS oversight of paid preparers ......... –39 –65 –83 –96 –101 –107 –113 –122 –130 –139 –384 –995
Address compliance in connection with tax
responsibilities of expatriates .............................. ......... ......... –1 –1 –1 –1 –1 –2 –2 –2 –2 –4 –13
Simplify foreign exchange gain or loss rules and
exchange rate rules for individuals ...................... ......... 1 2 2 2 3 3 3 3 3 3 10 25
Increase threshold for simplified foreign tax credit
rules and reporting ............................................... ......... 14 25 27 29 31 31 32 32 32 34 126 287
Subtotal, improve tax administration and
compliance ......................................................... ......... –1,070 –1,207 –1,344 –1,468 –1,524 –1,587 –1,657 –1,732 –1,810 –1,903 –6,613 –15,302
134
Summary Tabl
e
s
Table S–6. Mandatory and Receipt Proposals—Continued
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in millions of dollars)
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–2027 2023–2032
Modernize rules, including those for digital assets:
Modernize rules treating loans of securities as taxfree to include other asset classes and address
income inclusion ......................................................... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Provide for information reporting by certain financial
institutions and digital asset brokers for purposes
of exchange of information ........................................ ......... –48 –95 –179 –209 –222 –237 –251 –267 –287 –303 –753 –2,098
Require reporting by certain taxpayers of foreign
digital asset accounts ................................................. ......... –50 –100 –188 –220 –234 –250 –264 –282 –302 –319 –792 –2,209
Amend the mark-to-market rules to include digital
assets .......................................................................... ......... –4,846 –133 –146 –161 –177 –194 –214 –235 –259 –284 –5,463 –6,649
 Subtotal, modernize rules, including those for
digital assets .......................................................... ......... –4,944 –328 –513 –590 –633 –681 –729 –784 –848 –906 –7,008 –10,956
Improve benefits tax administration:
Clarify tax treatment of fixed indemnity health
policies ........................................................................ ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Clarify tax treatment of on-demand pay
arrangements ............................................................. ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Rationalize funding for post-retirement medical and
life insurance benefits ................................................ ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
 Subtotal, improve benefits tax administration ....... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Total, receipt proposals ..................................................... –6,124 –131,178 –276,603 –298,324 –268,247 –258,241 –261,941 –260,883 –255,973 –256,873 –263,480 –1,232,593 –2,531,743
Grand total, mandatory and receipt proposals ........... –6,253 –90,499 –188,471 –204,662 –177,967 –158,205 –160,212 –158,039 –149,772 –129,213 –198,329 –819,804 –1,615,369
1 Estimates were not available at the time of Budget publication.
2 The estimates for this proposal include effects on receipts. The receipt effects included in the totals above are as follows:
Improve access to behavioral healthcare in the
private insurance market .......................................... ......... 1,435 1,991 2,089 2,305 2,449 2,564 2,683 2,812 2,948 3,093 10,269 24,369
Require coverage of three primary care visits and three
behavioral health visits without cost-sharing ............. ......... 916 1,271 1,335 1,490 1,585 1,657 1,738 1,822 1,909 2,005 6,597 15,728
Allow selective basis boosts for bond-financed LowIncome Housing Credit projects ................................ ......... 2 29 140 354 617 895 1,148 1,359 1,561 1,769 1,142 7,874
Make adoption tax credit refundable and allow
certain guardianship arrangements to qualify ........ ......... 11 42 42 42 42 42 42 42 42 42 179 389
Capture savings to UI from RESEA allocation
adjustment .................................................................. ......... ......... 24 62 115 158 195 225 250 –12 –54 359 963
Establish user fee for Electronic Visa Update System ......... –47 –52 –58 –64 –72 –79 –88 –108 –118 –130 –293 –816
Fund the Federal Payment Levy Program via collections ......... 22 22 22 22 22 22 22 22 22 22 110 220
Total, receipt effects of mandatory proposals .......... ......... 2,339 3,327 3,632 4,264 4,801 5,296 5,770 6,199 6,352 6,747 18,363 48,727
3 Represents the savings associated with continuing to provide dedicated funding, through a discretionary allocation adjustment, for program integrity activities to confirm program
participants remain eligible to receive benefits.
4 This proposal includes an intragovernmental transfer between the Federal Capital Revolving Fund (FCRF) and the Federal Building Fund (FBF). The collections and spending in
the FBF, the receiving account, are not counted for PAYGO purposes because the proposal expects the PAYGO cost to be recorded in the FCRF. The intragovernmental transfers net
to zero and are as follows:
BUDG
ET OF TH
E U. S. GOV
ERNM
ENT FOR FISCAL Y
EAR 2023 135
Table S–6. Mandatory and Receipt Proposals—Continued
(Deficit increases (+) or decreases (–) in millions of dollars)
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Totals
2023–2027 2023–2032
Establish and capitalize the Federal Capital
Revolving Fund ......................................................... ......... –1,004 104 217 321 259 103 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
5 Effects are included in the estimate of “Repeal the enhanced oil recovery credit.”
6 The estimates for this proposal includes effects on outlays. The outlay effects included in the totals above are as follows:
Provide income exclusion for student debt relief ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... 1 1 21 24 27 29 1 103
Expand and increase penalties for noncompliant
return preparation and e-filing ................................. ......... ......... –6 –6 –6 –7 –7 –7 –8 –8 –8 –25 –63
Grant authority to IRS for oversight of all paid
preparers .................................................................... ......... –12 –14 –21 –23 –19 –20 –21 –23 –25 –27 –89 –205
Total, outlay effects of receipt proposals .................. ......... –12 –20 –27 –29 –25 –26 –7 –7 –6 –6 –113 –165
136
Summary Tabl
e
s
Table S–7. Funding Levels for Appropriated (“Discretionary”) Programs by Category
(Budget authority in billions of dollars)
Actual 1 CR2 CAA3 Request Outyears Totals
2021 2022 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
2023-
2027
2023-
2032
Base Discretionary Funding Allocation ....... 1,374 1,393 1,473 1,582 1,643 1,670 1,703 1,728 1,754 1,780 1,807 1,834 1,862 8,326 17,362
Non-Defense Shifts to Mandatory4 ................ ......... ......... ......... –10 –10 –10 –10 –10 –11 –11 –11 –11 –12 –50 –106
Bureau of Indian Affairs ................................... ......... ......... ......... –* –* –* –* –1 –1 –1 –1 –1 –1 –2 –5
Indian Health Service ....................................... ......... ......... ......... –9 –9 –10 –10 –10 –10 –10 –11 –11 –11 –48 –101
Non-Base Discretionary Funding (not included above): 5
Emergency and COVID–19 Supplemental
Funding ......................................................... 198 45 58 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Program Integrity ............................................. 2 2 2 2 3 3 3 3 3 3 3 3 3 13 29
Disaster Relief ................................................... 17 17 19 20 11 11 11 11 11 11 11 11 11 64 119
Wildfire Suppression ......................................... 2 2 2 3 3 3 3 3 3 3 3 3 3 13 26
21st Century Cures Appropriations ................. * * 1 1 * * * ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... 2 2
Total, Non-Base Funding ................................. 220 67 82 26 17 16 17 16 17 17 17 17 17 92 175
Grand Total, Discretionary Budget
Authority ......................................................... 1,594 1,461 1,555 1,598 1,650 1,676 1,709 1,734 1,759 1,786 1,812 1,839 1,867 8,367 17,431
Memorandum: Presentation of base discretionary by defense and non-defense 6
Defense Allocation7 ............................................ 741 746 782 813 843 851 865 871 877 883 889 895 902 4,242 8,688
Non-Defense Allocation ..................................... 544 551 594 650 665 680 696 712 728 745 762 780 797 3,402 7,215
Veterans Affairs Medical Care Program ......... 90 96 97 119 136 139 142 145 149 152 156 159 163 681 1,459
Memorandum: Presentation of base discretionary by security and nonsecurity 6
Security Allocation ............................................ 850 855 894 936 968 979 996 1,005 1,016 1,026 1,035 1,045 1,055 4,884 10,062
Nonsecurity Allocation ...................................... 434 442 482 527 540 552 565 578 589 602 616 630 644 2,761 5,841
Veterans Affairs Medical Care Program ......... 90 96 97 119 136 139 142 145 149 152 156 159 163 681 1,459
Memorandum: Discretionary appropriations provided in the
Infrastructure, Investment, and Jobs Act 8 ....... ......... 174 N/A 69 69 68 66 2 2 2 2 2 2 273 283
* Less than $500 million.
1 The 2021 actual level includes changes that occur after appropriations are enacted that are part of budget execution such as transfers, reestimates, and the rebasing as mandatory
any changes in mandatory programs (CHIMPs) enacted in appropriations bills. The 2021 levels are adjusted to add back OMB’s scoring of CHIMPs enacted in 2021 appropriations
Acts for a better illustrative comparison with the 2023 request.
2 At the time the 2023 Budget was prepared, 2022 appropriations remained incomplete and the 2022 column reflects at the account level annualized continuing appropriations
provided under the Continuing Appropriations Act, 2022 (division A of Public Law 117-43, as amended by division A of Public Law 117-70, division A of Public Law 117-86, and
Public Law 117-95; CR). The 2022 column also reflects enacted full-year emergency appropriations enacted in the Disaster Relief Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2022, the
Afghanistan Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2022, and the Additional Afghanistan Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2022 (divisions B and C of Public Law 117-43 and division
B of Public Law 117-70, respectively).
3 The 2023 Budget was finalized before 2022 appropriations were completed. To allow a high-level comparison of the 2023 Budget with enacted appropriations, this column provides
a preliminary summary of 2022 enacted appropriations in the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2022 (Public Law 117-103; CAA), using the Congressional Budget Office (CBO)
estimate of the legislation (see CBO estimate for H.R. 2471, the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2022 on CBO’s website). CBO estimates of IIJA appropriations are not included
since OMB includes its own estimate for 2022.
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 137 4 The 2023 Budget proposes to shift the Indian Health Service (IHS) in HHS as well as contract support costs and 105(l) leases within the Bureau of Indian Programs (BIA) in the Department of the Interior to the mandatory side of the Budget starting in 2023. See the “Budget Process” chapter of the Analytical Perspectives volume of the Budget for more information on these proposals. 5 The 2023 Budget presents funding for anomalous or above-base activities such as emergency requirements, program integrity, disaster relief, wildfire suppression, and 21st Century Cures appropriations outside of base allocations, which is largely consistent with allocation adjustments in the FY 2022 Congressional Budget Resolution (H.Con.Res. 14). 6 The section presents base discretionary funding by both defense and non-defense and by security and nonsecurity allocations. The definition of security and nonsecurity is the same as the definition specified in the Budget Control Act of 2011 with security including the Departments of Defense, Homeland Security, Veterans Affairs, the National Nuclear Security Administration, the International Budget Function (150), and the Intelligence Community Management Account and with all other discretionary programs in the nonsecurity category. This presentation of discretionary excludes the proposed shifts to mandatory. 7 The amounts in the 2023 Budget are based on the forthcoming National Security and National Defense strategies and the Department of Defense Future Years Defense Program, which includes a five-year appropriations plan and estimated expenditures necessary to support the programs, projects, and activities of the Department of Defense. After 2027, the Budget mechanically extrapolates the growth rate from the final year of the five-year appropriations plan. 8 Section 905(c) of division J of the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Public Law 117-58; IIJA) specified that amounts provided in division J and certain rescissions in section 90007 of IIJA should be considered as emergency discretionary appropriations. The amounts provided as discretionary appropriations in IIJA are summarized here, however, these amounts are kept separate from other discretionary amounts included above that are considered during the regular appropriations process. Table S–7. Funding Levels for Appropriated (“Discretionary”) Programs by Category—Continued (Budget authority in billions of dollars)
138
Summary Tabl
e
s
Table S–8. 2023 Discretionary Request by Major Agency
(Budget authority in billions of dollars)
2021 2022 2023
2023 Request Less
2021 Enacted
Actual 1 CR2 Request Dollar Percent
Base Discretionary Funding:
Cabinet Departments:
Agriculture 3 ............................................................................................................................................. 24.4 23.7 28.5 +4.2 +17.1%
Commerce ................................................................................................................................................ 8.9 8.9 11.7 +2.8 +31.2%
Defense .................................................................................................................................................... 703.7 709.2 773.0 +69.3 +9.8%
Education ................................................................................................................................................. 73.0 73.0 88.3 +15.3 +20.9%
Energy (DOE) 4 ........................................................................................................................................ 41.9 41.8 48.2 +6.3 +15.1%
Health and Human Services (HHS) 5 ..................................................................................................... 108.6 110.4 138.0 +29.4 +27.1%
Proposed IHS Shift to Mandatory (non-add) 6 ................................................................................... (6.5) (6.6) (9.1) (+2.6) N/A
HHS, BA excluding IHS (non-add) .................................................................................................... (102.0) (103.9) (128.9) (+26.9) (+26.3%)
Homeland Security (DHS) ...................................................................................................................... 53.8 52.7 56.7 +2.9 +5.4%
Housing and Urban Development (HUD):
HUD program level ............................................................................................................................. 59.6 60.3 71.9 +12.3 +20.5%
HUD receipts ....................................................................................................................................... –16.1 –13.1 –11.1 +5.0 N/A
Interior (DOI) .......................................................................................................................................... 14.9 15.1 17.9 +3.0 +20.5%
Proposed BIA Shift to Mandatory (non-add) 6 ................................................................................... (0.2) (0.4) (0.5) (+0.2) N/A
DOI, BA excluding BIA (non-add) ...................................................................................................... (14.6) (14.7) (17.5) (+2.8) (+19.3%)
Justice ...................................................................................................................................................... 33.5 33.6 37.7 +4.2 +12.5%
Labor ........................................................................................................................................................ 12.5 12.5 14.6 +2.2 +17.6%
State and International Programs 3, 7 ..................................................................................................... 57.5 57.9 67.6 +10.2 +17.7%
Transportation (DOT) ............................................................................................................................. 25.3 25.5 26.8 +1.5 +6.0%
Treasury 7 ................................................................................................................................................. 13.5 13.5 16.2 +2.7 +19.9%
Veterans Affairs ....................................................................................................................................... 104.5 111.1 135.2 +30.7 +29.4%
Major Agencies:
Corps of Engineers (Corps) ..................................................................................................................... 7.8 7.8 6.6 –1.2 –15.3%
Environmental Protection Agency ......................................................................................................... 9.2 9.2 11.9 +2.6 +28.6%
General Services Administration ........................................................................................................... –0.9 –1.3 1.3 +2.2 N/A
National Aeronautics and Space Administration .................................................................................. 23.3 23.3 26.0 +2.7 +11.6%
National Science Foundation .................................................................................................................. 8.5 8.5 10.5 +2.0 +23.6%
Small Business Administration .............................................................................................................. 0.8 0.8 0.9 +0.2 +21.0%
Social Security Administration5 ............................................................................................................. 9.0 8.9 10.1 +1.1 +12.8%
Other Agencies ........................................................................................................................................ 23.3 23.3 28.1 +4.8 +20.7%
Changes in mandatory program offsets 8 ............................................................................................... –26.0 –23.3 –34.7 –8.7 +33.5%
Subtotal, Base Discretionary Budget Authority (BA) ..................................................................... 1,374.2 1,393.5 1,582.0 +207.8 +15.1%
Subtotal, BA excluding programs shifted to mandatory ........................................................................... 1,367.5 1,386.5 1,572.4 +205.0 +15.0%
BUDG
ET OF TH
E U. S. GOV
ERNM
ENT FOR FISCAL Y
EAR 2023 139
Table S–8. 2023 Discretionary Request by Major Agency—Continued
(Budget authority in billions of dollars)
2021 2022 2023
2023 Request Less
2021 Enacted
Actual 1 CR2 Request Dollar Percent
Non-Base Discretionary Funding:
Emergency Requirements and COVID–19 Supplemental Funding:
Agriculture .......................................................................................................................................... 1.0 11.6 ......... –1.0 N/A
Commerce ............................................................................................................................................ 0.3 0.4 ......... –0.3 N/A
Defense ................................................................................................................................................ 1.0 7.4 ......... –1.0 N/A
Education ............................................................................................................................................. 81.6 ......... ......... –81.6 N/A
Energy ................................................................................................................................................. –2.3 0.0 ......... +2.3 N/A
Health and Human Services .............................................................................................................. 73.8 5.5 ......... –73.8 N/A
Homeland Security ............................................................................................................................. 2.8 1.0 ......... –2.8 N/A
Housing and Urban Development ...................................................................................................... 0.7 5.0 ......... –0.7 N/A
Interior ................................................................................................................................................. 0.4 0.6 ......... –0.4 N/A
Justice .................................................................................................................................................. 0.6 0.1 ......... –0.6 N/A
Labor .................................................................................................................................................... 1.5 ......... ......... –1.5 N/A
State and International Programs ..................................................................................................... 5.9 3.4 ......... –5.9 N/A
Transportation .................................................................................................................................... 27.0 2.7 ......... –27.0 N/A
Treasury .............................................................................................................................................. 0.5 ......... ......... –0.5 N/A
Corps of Engineers (Corps) ................................................................................................................. ......... 5.7 ......... ......... N/A
Small Business Administration .......................................................................................................... 2.0 1.2 ......... –2.0 N/A
Other Agencies .................................................................................................................................... 0.9 0.4 ......... –0.9 N/A
Subtotal, Emergency Requirements ...................................................................................................... 197.8 45.1 ......... –197.8 N/A
Program Integrity:
Health and Human Services .............................................................................................................. 0.5 0.5 0.6 +0.1 +16.1%
Labor .................................................................................................................................................... 0.1 0.1 0.3 +0.2 +210.8%
Social Security Administration ......................................................................................................... 1.3 1.3 1.5 +0.2 +16.1%
Subtotal, Program Integrity ................................................................................................................... 1.9 1.9 2.3 +0.5 +24.7%
Disaster Relief:
Homeland Security ............................................................................................................................. 17.1 17.1 19.7 +2.6 +15.2%
Small Business Administration .......................................................................................................... 0.1 0.1 0.1 ......... .........
Subtotal, Disaster Relief ......................................................................................................................... 17.3 17.3 19.9 +2.6 +15.0%
Wildfire Suppression:
Agriculture .......................................................................................................................................... 2.0 2.0 2.2 +0.2 +8.3%
Interior ................................................................................................................................................. 0.3 0.3 0.3 +* +9.7%
Subtotal, Wildfire Suppression ............................................................................................................... 2.4 2.4 2.6 +0.2 +8.5%
21st Century Cures appropriations:
Health and Human Services .............................................................................................................. 0.5 0.5 1.1 +0.7 +139.5%
Subtotal, Non-Base Discretionary Funding ...................................................................................... 219.8 67.1 25.9 –193.9 –88.2%
140
Summary Tabl
e
s
Table S–8. 2023 Discretionary Request by Major Agency—Continued
(Budget authority in billions of dollars)
2021 2022 2023
2023 Request Less
2021 Enacted
Actual 1 CR2 Request Dollar Percent
Total, Discretionary BA .......................................................................................................................... 1,594.0 1,460.5 1,607.9 +13.9 +0.9%
Total, BA excluding programs shifted to mandatory ................................................................................. 1,587.2 1,453.6 1,598.3 +11.1 +0.7%
Memorandum - Comparison of 2022 Omnibus to 2023 Request: 9
2022
CAA
2023
Request 2023 Request Less 2022 CAA
Total, Base Discretionary Funding ......................................................................................................... 1,472.9 1,582.0 +109.0 +7.4%
Base Discretionary by Defense and Non-Defense:
Defense ................................................................................................................................................. 782.2 813.3 +31.2 +4.0%
Non-Defense ......................................................................................................................................... 593.6 649.9 +56.3 +9.5%
Veterans Affairs Medical Care Program ........................................................................................... 97.2 118.7 +21.5 +22.2%
Base Discretionary by Security and Nonsecurity: 10
Security ................................................................................................................................................ 894.2 935.9 +41.7 +4.7%
Nonsecurity .......................................................................................................................................... 481.6 527.3 +45.8 +9.5%
Veterans Affairs Medical Care Program ........................................................................................... 97.2 118.7 +21.5 +22.2%
* Less than $50 million.
1 The 2021 actual level includes changes that occur after appropriations are enacted that are part of budget execution such as transfers, reestimates, and the rebasing as mandatory
any changes in mandatory programs (CHIMPs) enacted in appropriations bills. The 2021 levels are adjusted to add back OMB’s scoring of CHIMPs enacted in 2021 appropriations
Acts for a better illustrative comparison with the 2023 request.
2 At the time the 2023 Budget was prepared, 2022 appropriations remained incomplete and the 2022 column reflects at the account level annualized continuing appropriations
provided under the Continuing Appropriations Act, 2022 (division A of Public Law 117–43, as amended by division A of Public Law 117–70, division A of Public Law 117–86,
and Public Law 117–95; CR). The 2022 column also reflects enacted full-year emergency appropriations enacted in the Disaster Relief Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2022,
the Afghanistan Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2022, and the Additional Afghanistan Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2022 (divisions B and C of Public Law 117–43 and
division B of Public Law 117–70, respectively).
3 Funding for Food for Peace Title II Grants is included in the State and International Programs total. Although the funds are appropriated to the Department of Agriculture, the
funds are administered by the U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID).
4 The Department of Energy base total in 2021 includes an appropriation of $2.3 billion that had been designated as emergency in Public Law 116–260 since the activities were for
regular operations and not emergency purposes.
5 Funding from the Hospital Insurance and Supplementary Medical Insurance trust funds for administrative expenses incurred by the Social Security Administration that support
the Medicare program are included in the Health and Human Services total and not in the Social Security Administration total.
6 The 2023 Budget proposes to shift the Indian Health Service (IHS) in HHS as well as contract support costs and 105(l) leases within the Bureau of Indian Programs (BIA) in DOI to
the mandatory side of the Budget starting in 2023. See the “Budget Process” chapter of the Analytical Perspectives volume of the Budget for more information on these proposals.
7 The State and International Programs total includes funding for the Department of State, USAID, Treasury International, and 11 international agencies while the Treasury total
excludes Treasury’s International Programs.
8 The limitation enacted and proposed in the Justice Department’s Crime Victims Fund program and cancellations in the Children’s Health Insurance Program in HHS make up the
bulk of these offsets.
9 The 2023 Budget was finalized before 2022 appropriations were completed. To allow a high-level comparison of the 2023 Budget with enacted appropriations, this memorandum
section provides a preliminary summary of 2022 enacted base appropriations in the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2022 (Public Law 117–103; CAA), using the Congressional
Budget Office (CBO) estimate of the legislation (see CBO estimate for H.R. 2471, the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2022 on CBO’s website). This presentation of discretionary
excludes the proposed shifts to mandatory.
10 The definition of security and nonsecurity is the same as the definition specified in the Budget Control Act of 2011 with security including the Departments of Defense, Homeland
Security, Veterans Affairs, the National Nuclear Security Administration, the International Budget Function (150), and the Intelligence Community Management Account and
with all other discretionary programs in the nonsecurity category.
BUDG
ET OF TH
E U. S. GOV
ERNM
ENT FOR FISCAL Y
EAR 2023 141
Table S–9. Economic Assumptions 1
(Calendar years)
Actual
2020
Projections
2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Gross Domestic Product (GDP):
Nominal level, billions of dollars ............................................................. 20,894 22,899 24,631 25,853 26,966 28,064 29,200 30,380 31,626 32,957 34,382 35,877 37,437
Percent change, nominal GDP, year/year ................................................ –2.2 9.6 7.6 5.0 4.3 4.1 4.0 4.0 4.1 4.2 4.3 4.3 4.3
Real GDP, percent change, year/year ...................................................... –3.4 5.5 4.2 2.8 2.2 2.0 2.0 2.0 2.1 2.2 2.3 2.3 2.3
Real GDP, percent change, Q4/Q4 ........................................................... –2.3 5.1 3.8 2.5 2.1 2.0 2.0 2.0 2.1 2.2 2.3 2.3 2.3
GDP chained price index, percent change, year/year ............................. 1.3 3.9 3.3 2.1 2.0 2.0 2.0 2.0 2.0 2.0 2.0 2.0 2.0
Consumer Price Index, 2 percent change, year/year ......................... 1.2 4.6 4.7 2.3 2.3 2.3 2.3 2.3 2.3 2.3 2.3 2.3 2.3
Interest rates, percent: 3
91-day Treasury bills 4 .............................................................................. 0.4 * 0.2 0.9 1.6 1.9 2.1 2.2 2.3 2.3 2.3 2.3 2.3
10-year Treasury notes ............................................................................ 0.9 1.5 2.1 2.5 2.7 2.8 3.0 3.1 3.1 3.2 3.2 3.2 3.3
Unemployment rate, civilian, percent 3 ............................................... 8.1 5.4 3.9 3.6 3.7 3.8 3.8 3.8 3.8 3.8 3.8 3.8 3.8
* 0.05 percent or less
Note: A more detailed table of economic assumptions appears in Chapter 2, “Economic Assumptions and Overview,” in the Analytical Perspectives volume of the Budget.
1 The Administration’s forecast was finalized on November 10, 2021.
2 Seasonally adjusted CPI for all urban consumers.
3 Annual average.
4 Average rate, secondary market (bank discount basis).
142
Summary Tabl
e
s
Table S–10. Federal Government Financing and Debt
(Dollar amounts in billions)
Actual
2021
Estimate
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Financing:
Unified budget deficit:
Primary deficit .......................................................................... 2,423 1,058 758 724 766 680 622 725 565 667 663 692
Net interest ............................................................................... 352 357 396 476 564 648 729 808 879 948 1,019 1,092
Unified budget deficit ............................................................ 2,775 1,415 1,154 1,201 1,330 1,328 1,352 1,533 1,443 1,614 1,682 1,784
As a percent of GDP .......................................................... 12.4% 5.8% 4.5% 4.5% 4.8% 4.6% 4.5% 4.9% 4.4% 4.7% 4.7% 4.8%
Other transactions affecting borrowing from the public:
Changes in financial assets and liabilities: 1
Change in Treasury operating cash balance ....................... –1,567 535 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Net disbursements of credit financing accounts:
Direct loan and Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP)
equity purchase accounts .............................................. –18 147 42 32 38 11 24 19 19 17 20 27
Guaranteed loan accounts ................................................ 310 219 3 7 8 7 6 6 5 5 5 5
Net purchases of non-Federal securities by the National
Railroad Retirement Investment Trust (NRRIT) ............ 4 –1 –2 –2 –2 –2 –1 –1 –2 –2 –1 –1
Net change in other financial assets and liabilities 2 .......... –237 238 ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... ......... .........
Subtotal, changes in financial assets and liabilities ....... –1,508 1,138 44 37 44 17 28 23 22 20 23 31
Seigniorage on coins .................................................................. –* –* –1 –1 –1 –1 –1 –1 –1 –1 –1 –1
Total, other transactions affecting borrowing from the
public ................................................................................. –1,508 1,137 43 37 43 16 28 23 22 20 23 30
Total, requirement to borrow from the public (equals
change in debt held by the public) ........................... 1,267 2,552 1,197 1,237 1,373 1,344 1,380 1,555 1,465 1,634 1,705 1,815
Changes in Debt Subject to Statutory Limitation:
Change in debt held by the public ................................................. 1,267 2,552 1,197 1,237 1,373 1,344 1,380 1,555 1,465 1,634 1,705 1,815
Change in debt held by Government accounts ............................. 216 354 104 136 29 13 –146 –252 –148 –282 –281 –374
Change in other factors ................................................................. –2 1 1 1 –* * 1 1 * –1 –1 –1
Total, change in debt subject to statutory limitation .............. 1,481 2,907 1,302 1,374 1,402 1,358 1,235 1,304 1,317 1,352 1,423 1,440
Debt Subject to Statutory Limitation, End of Year:
Debt issued by Treasury ................................................................ 28,365 31,271 32,572 33,945 35,347 36,704 37,938 39,241 40,558 41,909 43,332 44,772
Adjustment for discount, premium, and coverage 3 ...................... 36 38 39 40 40 40 41 42 43 43 43 43
Total, debt subject to statutory limitation4 ............................. 28,401 31,309 32,611 33,984 35,386 36,744 37,979 39,283 40,600 41,952 43,374 44,814
Debt Outstanding, End of Year:
Gross Federal debt: 5
Debt issued by Treasury ........................................................... 28,365 31,271 32,572 33,945 35,347 36,704 37,938 39,241 40,558 41,909 43,332 44,772
Debt issued by other agencies .................................................. 21 21 21 21 22 22 22 22 22 23 24 25
Total, gross Federal debt ....................................................... 28,386 31,292 32,593 33,966 35,368 36,726 37,960 39,263 40,580 41,933 43,356 44,797
As a percent of GDP .......................................................... 127.0% 129.0% 127.5% 127.2% 127.3% 127.0% 126.2% 125.4% 124.4% 123.3% 122.1% 120.9%
BUDG
ET OF TH
E U. S. GOV
ERNM
ENT FOR FISCAL Y
EAR 2023 143
Table S–10. Federal Government Financing and Debt—Continued
(Dollar amounts in billions)
Actual
2021
Estimate
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032
Held by:
Debt held by Government accounts ......................................... 6,102 6,456 6,560 6,695 6,725 6,738 6,592 6,340 6,192 5,911 5,629 5,256
Debt held by the public 6 ........................................................... 22,284 24,836 26,033 27,271 28,644 29,988 31,368 32,923 34,388 36,022 37,727 39,542
As a percent of GDP .............................................................. 99.7% 102.4% 101.8% 102.2% 103.1% 103.7% 104.3% 105.2% 105.4% 105.9% 106.3% 106.7%
Debt Held by the Public Net of Financial Assets:
Debt held by the public .................................................................. 22,284 24,836 26,033 27,271 28,644 29,988 31,368 32,923 34,388 36,022 37,727 39,542
Less financial assets net of liabilities:
Treasury operating cash balance ............................................. 215 750 750 750 750 750 750 750 750 750 750 750
Credit financing account balances:
Direct loan and TARP equity purchase accounts ................ 1,595 1,742 1,784 1,816 1,854 1,865 1,889 1,908 1,926 1,943 1,963 1,990
Guaranteed loan accounts .................................................... –156 63 66 72 80 87 93 99 105 110 115 120
Government-sponsored enterprise stock7 ................................ 221 221 221 221 221 221 221 221 221 221 221 221
Air carrier worker support warrants and notes 8 .................... 15 15 15 15 14 13 13 12 12 6 ......... .........
Emergency capital investment fund securities ....................... ......... 3 3 3 3 3 3 3 3 3 2 2
Non-Federal securities held by NRRIT .................................... 28 26 25 23 22 20 19 17 16 14 13 11
Other assets net of liabilities .................................................... –307 –69 –69 –69 –69 –69 –69 –69 –69 –69 –69 –69
Total, financial assets net of liabilities ................................ 1,611 2,751 2,795 2,832 2,875 2,891 2,919 2,941 2,963 2,977 2,994 3,025
Debt held by the public net of financial assets ................ 20,673 22,085 23,238 24,439 25,769 27,097 28,449 29,982 31,425 33,045 34,732 36,516
As a percent of GDP ...................................................... 92.5% 91.0% 90.9% 91.6% 92.7% 93.7% 94.6% 95.8% 96.4% 97.1% 97.8% 98.6%
* $500 million or less.
1 A decrease in the Treasury operating cash balance (which is an asset) is a means of financing a deficit and therefore has a negative sign. An increase in checks outstanding (which
is a liability) is also a means of financing a deficit and therefore also has a negative sign. More information on the levels and changes to the operating cash balance is available in
Chapter 4, “Federal Borrowing and Debt” in the Analytical Perspectives volume of the Budget.
2 Includes checks outstanding, accrued interest payable on Treasury debt, uninvested deposit fund balances, allocations of special drawing rights, and other liability accounts; and, as
an offset, cash and monetary assets (other than the Treasury operating cash balance), other asset accounts, and profit on sale of gold.
3 Consists mainly of debt issued by the Federal Financing Bank (which is not subject to limit), the unamortized discount (less premium) on public issues of Treasury notes and bonds
(other than zero-coupon bonds), and the unrealized discount on Government account series securities.
4 The statutory debt limit is $31,381 billion, as enacted on December 16, 2021.
5 Treasury securities held by the public and zero-coupon bonds held by Government accounts are almost all measured at sales price plus amortized discount or less amortized
premium. Agency debt securities are almost all measured at face value. Treasury securities in the Government account series are otherwise measured at face value less
unrealized discount (if any).
6 At the end of 2021, the Federal Reserve Banks held $5,433.2 billion of Federal securities and the rest of the public held $16,850.9 billion. Debt held by the Federal Reserve Banks is
not estimated for future years.
7 Treasury’s warrants to purchase 79.9 percent of the common stock of the enterprises expire after September 7, 2028. The warrants were valued at $5 billion at the end of 2021.
8 Portions of the notes and warrants issued under the Air carrier worker support program (Payroll support program) are scheduled to expire in 2025, 2026, 2030, and 2031.

145
A
Lindsay Abate
Bryan Abbe
Allison Abbott
Andrew Abrams
Amal Abukar
Chandana L. Achanta
Laurie Adams
Jeffrey Adarkwa
Nana Abena Serwah
Addo
Drew Aherne
Saran Ahluwalia
Shagufta Ahmed
Benjamin Aidoo
Lina Al Sudani
Joseph Albanese
Isabel Aldunate
Erin Cheese Alejandre
Jason Alleman
Victoria Allred
Aaron Alton
Marc Alvidrez
Samantha Ammons
Michaela Amos
Starlisha Anderson
Kimberly Anoweck
Lisa Anuszewski
Kristine Arboleda
Nickole M. Arbuckle
Rachel Arguello
Alison Arnold
Aviva Aron-Dine
Anna R. Arroyo
Elham Ashoori
Emily Schultz Askew
Lisa L. August
Jeffrey Auser
B
Eileen Baca
Samuel Bagenstos
Drew Bailey
Jessie W. Bailey
Ally P. Bain
Paul W. Baker
Carol A. Bales
Pratik S. Banjade
Avital Bar-Shalom
Zachary Barger
Carl Barrick
Jody Barringer
Amy Batchelor
Paula M. Becker
Alicia Beckett
Sarah Belford
Jennifer Wagner Bell
Sara Bencic
Joseph J. Berger
Danielle Berman
Elizabeth A. Bernhard
Katherine Berrey
Timothy Best
William Bestani
James Bickford
Samuel J. Black
Sharon Block
Kate Bloniarz
Mathew C. Blum
Tia Boatman
Patterson
Brandon Bodnar
Amira C. Boland
Cassie L. Boles
Melissa B. Bomberger
Matthew Bowen
Derick A. Boyd Jr.
William J. Boyd
Michael D. Branson
Alex M. Brant
Victoria Bredow
Joseph F. Breighner
Nicholas Brethauer
Andrea M. Brian
Candice M. Bronack
Ashley A. Brooks
Katherine W. Broomell
Dustin S. Brown
Sheila Bruce
Michael T. Brunetto
Pearl Buenvenida
Tom D. Bullers
Coulton Bunney
Scott H. Burgess
Ben Burnett
Jordan C. Burris
Angela S. Burton
John C. Burton
Mark Bussow
Sean Butler
Dylan W. Byrd
C
Steven Cahill
Greg Callanan
Lekesha Fay Campbell
Amy Canfield
Eric D. Cardoza
Laura Carollo
Kevin Carpenter
Christina S. Carrere
William S. S. Carroll
Scott D. Carson
Corryne C. Carter
Mary I. Cassell
David Cassidy
Terry J. T. Cathopoulis
David Cerrato
Christina Cervantes
Dan Chandler
David Chang
Suzanne Chapman
Anthony Chase
James Chase
Nida Chaudhary
Anita Chellaraj
Fonda Chen
Amy Chenault
Dana Chisnell
Sophia Choudhry
Alex Ciepley
Damon J. Clark
Michael Clark
Sean Coari
Porchetta Cody
Alyssa Cogen
Jordan Cohen
Pamela Coleman
Victoria W. Collin
Debra M. Collins
Kelly T. Colyar
Jose A. Conde
David C. Connolly
Kyle Connors
Mary Rose Conroy
Shila R. Cooch
LaTiesha B. Cooper
Nicole Cordan
Benjamin E. Coyle
Brian Coyle
Drew W. Cramer
Ayana Crawford
William Creedon
Jill L. Crissman
Rose Crow
Jefferson Crowder
Albert Crowley
Juliana Crump
Lily Cuk
Pennee Cumberlander
C. Tyler Curtis
William Curtis
Patricia Cusack
D
Amanda Dahl
Nadir Dalal
Shaibya Love Dalal
J. Alex Dalessio
D. Michael Daly
Rody Damis
Neil B. Danberg
Elisabeth C. Daniel
OMB CONTRIBUTORS TO THE 2023 BUDGET
The following personnel contributed to the preparation of this publication. Hundreds, perhaps
thousands, of others throughout the Government also deserve credit for their valuable contributions.
146 OMB Contributors to the 2023 Budget
Kristy L. Daphnis
Joanne C. Davenport
Kelly Jo Davis
Kenneth L. Davis
Margaret B. DavisChristian
Karen De Los Santos
Kara DeFrias
Thomas Delrue
Tasha M. Demps
Paul J. Denaro
Catherine A. Derbes
Christopher DeRusha
Suzy Deuster
Kelly A. Deutermann
Joseph A. Di Rocco
Selene Diaz
John H. Dick
Jamie Dickinson
Amie M. Didlo
Rachel M. Diedrick
Cle Diggins
Jean Diomi Kazadi
Daniel Dister
Angela M. Donatelli
Paul S. Donohue
Cristin Dorgelo
Vladik Dorjets
Michelle Dorsey
Tobias A. Dorsey
Prashant A. Doshi
Celeste Drake
Megan Dreher
Carlton Drew
Lisa Cash Driskill
Mark A. Dronfield
Vanessa Duguay
Nathaniel Durden
Ryan Durga
Reena Duseja
E
Matthew C. Eanes
Jeanette Edwards
Melissa Eggleston
Christopher Eldredge
Matthew Eliseo
Michelle Enger
Diana F. Epstein
Troy M. Epstein
Bianca Escalante
Jorge Escobar
Celeste Espinoza
Robert Etter
Beatrix Evans
Erica Evans
Gillian Evans
Patrick Evans
F
Farnoosh Faezi-Marian
Edna Falk Curtin
Hunter Fang
Louis E. Feagans
Iris R. Feldman
Lesley A. Field
Sean C. Finnegan
Mary S. Fischietto
John J. Fitzpatrick
Cleones Fleurima
Daniel G. Fowlkes
Nicholas A. Fraser
Rob Friedlander
Christopher Froehlich
Laurel Fuller
Steven Furnagiev
G
Ethan Joshua Gabbour
Scott Gaines
Christopher D.
Gamache
Joseph R. Ganahl
Kyle Gardiner
Mathias A. Gardner
Arpit Garg
Marc Garufi
Anthony R. Garza
Alex Gaynor
Johannes J. Geist
Anna M. Gendron
Mariam Ghavalyan
Daniel Giamo
Carolyn Gibson
Brian Gillis
Jacob Glass
Porter O. Glock
Christopher Glodosky
Andrea L. Goel
Jeffrey D. Goldstein
Christopher Gomba
Anthony A. Gonzalez
Oscar Gonzalez
Alex Goodenough
Jonathan Sidney
Gould
Michael D. Graham
Anthony M. Grasso
David M. Gratz
Vivian Graubard
Colleen M. Gravens
Aron Greenberg
Brandon H. Greene
Robin J. Griffin
Justin Grimes
Hester C. Grippando
Stephanie F. Grosser
Benjamin Guhin
Kamari Guthrie
H
Michael B. Hagan
Tia Hall
Victor Hall
Dean Halstead
William F. Hamele
Christine E. Hammer
Rachel Han
Anna Hansen
Brian J. Hanson
Jennifer L. Hanson
Dionne Hardy
Deidre A. Harrison
Christopher Hart
Edward Hartwig
Paul Harvey
Abdullah Hasan
Sara A. Hastings
Joseph
Hatzipanagiotis
Laurel Havas
Nichole M. Hayden
Mark Hazelgren
Kelly A. Healton
Paul Heayn
Noreen Hecmanczuk
Andrew Heimowitz
Gary Hellman
Natalie D.
Hengstebeck
John David Henson
Matthew A. Herb
Mitchel Herckis
Jacobo Hernandez
Rachel Hernández
Alex Hettinger
Michael J. Hickey
Michael Hildner
Amanda M. Hill
Jonathan Hill
W. Frankie Hill
Nathaniel Hillard
Michelle Hilton
Leni Hirsch
Elke Hodson-Marten
Jennifer E. Hoef
Stuart Hoffman
Troy Holland
Shane Holloway
Brian Holm-Hansen
Javay C. Holmes
Michele Holt
Nicholas Holtz
Jennifer Ann Hommel
Alexander Hoover
Jack Hoskins
Clinton T. Hourigan
Devany Howard
Andrew P. Howe
Peter Hoy
Mina Hsiang
Grace Hu
Christine Huanasca
Rhea A. Hubbard
Kathy M. Hudgins
Thomas Huelskoetter
Shristi Humagai
Ashley Hungerford
Sally J. Hunnicutt
Alexander T. Hunt
Ginny Hunt
Lorraine D. Hunt
Timothy H. Hunt
James C. Hurban
Veta Hurst
I
Tae H. Im
Shelley Irving
Maya Israni
J
Maia Ruth
Jachimowicz
Charmaine Jackson
Scott W. Jackson
Aryeh Jacobsohn
Manish Jain
Harrison M. Jarrett
Ames R. Jenkins
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 147
Carol Jenkins
Connor Jennings
Julie D. Jent
Jeremy Etra Jick
Carol Johnson
Michael D. Johnson
Danielle Y. Jones
Denise Bray Jones
Lauren H. Jones
Lisa M. Jones
Devansh R.
Jotsinghani
Shannon Maire Joyce
Hursandbek
Jumanyazov
Hee Jun
Mark Junda
K
Jason Kahn
Riyad Kalla
Kosta Kalpos
Daniel S. Kaneshiro
Jacob H. Kaplan
Jenifer Liechty
Karwoski
Florence Kasule
Natalie Kates
Jason Kattman
Regina L. Kearney
Andrew Keeney
Christopher Keller
Mary W. Keller
Nancy B. Kenly
Moses I. Kennedy
Kameron Kerger
Blair W. Kessler
Jung H. Kim
Maria Kim
Michael B. Kim
Rachael Y. Kim
Kelly C. King
Kelly A. Kinneen
Marina Kirakosian
Jessica Elizabeth
Kirby
Robert T. Klein
Hank Knaack
Carmen Knight
Ellen Knight
Bobby Kogan
Lara Kohl
Nick Koo
Andrea G. Korovesis
Katelyn V. Koschewa
Steven Kovacs
Anneli Faride Kraft
Charles Kraiger
Lori A. Krauss
Harold Krent
Alyssa Kropp
Megan K. Kruse
Steven B. Kuennen
Jennifer J. Kuk
Anshul Kumar
Tara Kumar
Christine J. Kymn
L
Vincent La
Christopher D. LaBaw
Sherry E. Lachman
Leonard L. Lainhart
Chad A. Lallemand
Kristine Lam
Lawrence L. Lambert
Michael Landry
Daniel LaPlaca
Tracie B. Lattimore
Eric P. Lauer
Jessie L. LaVine
Daniel Lawver
Loc N. Le
Jessica K. Lee
Theodore Taewoo Lee
Susan E. Leetmaa
Carmine Leggett
Stephen Leibman
Bryan P. León
Daniel Leonardini
Kerrie Leslie
Ariel Leuthard
John C. LevockSpindle
Sheila Lewis
Andrew Lewndowski
Thomas M. Libert
Andrew Lieberman
Jennifer Liebschutz
Jane C. Lien
Ming Ligh
Kristina E. Lilac
Erika Liliedahl
Michael Linden
John E. Lindner
Jennifer M. Lipiew
Adam Lipton
Kim Lopez
Sara R. Lopez
Zuzana Love
Adrienne Lucas
Alisa Luu
Kelvin Luu
M
Steven Parsons
Mackey
Ryan MacMaster
Christian MacMillan
Brett Maden
Claire A. Mahoney
Bianca Majumder
Dominic J. Mancini
Caroline Manela
Noah S. Mann
Iulia Z. Manolache
Roman Manziyenko
Italy Martin
Rochelle Martinez
Nicole Martinez Moore
Clare Martorana
Gina Mason
Stephen Massoni
Kimie Matsuo
Beth Mattern
Joshua May
Steven M. McAndrews
Jessica Rae McBean
Alexander J.
McClelland
John L. McClung
Malcolm P. McConnell
Daniela McCool
Jeremy P. McCrary
Charquinta Regina
McCray
Anthony W. McDonald
Christine A. McDonald
Katrina A. McDonald
Renford McDonald
Trevor R. McKie
Michael McManus
Frank McNally
William McNavage
Christopher McNeal
Maya Mechenbier
Andrea Medina-Smith
Edward Meier
Julie Meloni
Barbara A. Menard
Flavio Menasce
Ryan Mercer
Margaret Mergen
P. Thaddeus
Messenger
Lauren Michaels
Daniel J. MichelsonHorowitz
Eric Mill
Jason Miller
Kimberly Miller
Scott William Miller
Sofie Miller
Susan M. Minson
Katherine Mlika
Abdullahi Mohamed
Emily A. Mok
Kirsten J. Moncada
Allyce Moncton
Claire E. Monteiro
Joseph Montoni
Andrea J. Montoya
Julia C. Moore
Natalie Moore
Betty T. Morrison
Savannah M. Moss
Austin B. Mudd
Robin McLaughry
Mullins
Ian Munoz
Daenuka
Muraleetharan
Jonathan J. Murphy
Molly Murray
Christian G. Music
Hayley W. Myers
Heather Myers
Kimberley L Myers
David D. Myklegard
N
Andrew Nacin
Jeptha E. Nafziger
Larry J. Nagl
Katherine Nammacher
Barry Napear
Robert Nassif
Emma Nechamkin
Beverly Nelson
Kimberly P. Nelson
Michael D. Nelson
Anthony Nerino
148 OMB Contributors to the 2023 Budget
Melissa K. Neuman
Travis Newby
Joanie F. Newhart
Kimberly Armstrong
Newman
Annie Nguyen
Hieu Nguyen
Stephanie Nguyen
Thomas Nielsen
Greg Novick
Tim H. Nusraty
Joseph B. Nye
O
Erin O’Brien
Kerry Clinton O’Dell
Melanie Ofiesh
Michael Ogren
Matthew J. O’Kane
Cassandra Olson
Kathryn Olson
Brendan J. O’Meara
Matthew Oreska
Timothy F. O’Shea
Jared Ostermiller
P
Heather C. Pajak
Farrah N. Pappa
Jacob A. Parcell
Amy Paris
John C. Pasquantino
Michael Pauls
Brian Paxton
Casey Pearce
Michael D. Pearlstein
Liuyi Pei
Zachary T. Pendolino
Sean Pennino
Falisa L. Peoples-Tittle
Emma C. Perron
Michael A. Perz
Erik Brandon Peters
Whitney L. Peters
William C. Petersen
Andrea M. Petro
Laura M. Pettus
Amy E. Petz
Kathy Pham (Evans)
Stacey Que-Chi Pham
Carolyn R. Phelps
Karen A. Pica
Brian Pickeral
Alexandria Elise
Pinckney
Brian Pipa
Joseph Pipan
Amy Pitelka
Megan Policicchio
Nicholas Polk
Mark J. Pomponio
Ruxandra Pond
Imani Pope-Johns
Meril A. Pothen
Larrimer S. Prestosa
Jamie M. Price
Alanna B. Pugliese
Robert B. Purdy
Hannah Pyper
Q
Syeda Quadry
R
Lucas R. Radzinschi
Kazi Sabeel Rahman
Zahid Rashid
Houman Rasouli
Johnnie Ray
Alex Reed
Maurice Reeves
Heather Regen
Thomas M. Reilly
Cody Reinold
Bryant D. Renaud
Keri A. Rice
Natalie Rico
Kyle S. Riggs
Glorimar Ripoll Balet
Jamal Rittenberry
Maria Roat
Becci Roberts
Beth Higa Roberts
Brian Roberts
Donovan Robinson
Marshall J. Rodgers
Drew J. Rodriguez
Jung Mary Roh
Samantha Romero
Meredith B. Romley
Andrea L. Ross
Jeffrey R. Ross
Alicia Rouault
Alexander Joseph
Rougeau
David J. Rowe
Amanda Roy
Danielle Royal
Brian Rozental
Tamia Russell
Erika H. Ryan
S
Julianna R. St. Onge
Adam N. Salazar
John Asa Saldivar
Sarah Saltiel
Zohaib Sameer
Mark S. Sandy
Nathan T. Sanfilippo
Ruth Saunders
Joel Savary
Jason K. Sawyer
Sarah Scheinman
Zachary Scherer
Kirsten Scheyer
Christina Schildroth
Tricia Schmitt
Andrea Schneider
Rio Schondelmeyer
Daniel K. Schory
Ian Schurr
Margo Schwab
Mariarosaria
Sciannameo
Kristi Scott
Jasmeet K. Seehra
Owen Seely
Kimberly Segura
Robert B. Seidner
Andrew Self
Megan Shade
Vimal Shah
Shabnam
Sharbatoghlie
Amy K. Sharp
Dianne Shaughnessy
Pooja Shaw
Paul Shawcross
Rachel Lee Shepherd
Gary F. Shortencarrier
Matthew Sidler
Becca Siegel
Jared Siegel
Leticia Sierra
Sara R. Sills
Celeste Simon
Daniel Liam Singer
Sarah Sisaye
Robert Sivinski
Benjamin J. Skidmore
Evan C. Skloot
Curtina O. Smith
Jennifer Smith
Matthew Smith
Sarah B. Smith
Stannis M. Smith
Silvana Solano
Roderic A. Solomon
Timothy Soltis
Suzanne Soroczak
Amanda R.K. Sousane
Megan Sowder-Staley
Candice G. Spalding
Rebecca L. Spavins
Valeria Spinner
Christopher Spiro
John H. Spittell
Sarah Whittle Spooner
Madhu Sreekumar
Langer Stacey
Travis C. Stalcup
Scott R. Stambaugh
Nora Stein
Christopher Paul
Steiner
Erica Stephens
Meredith Stewart
Ryan Stoffers
Gary R. Stofko
Andrew Stoll
Kelly M. Strachan
Benjamin Strahs
Terry W. Stratton
Thomas J. Suarez
Kevin J. Sullivan
Patrick Sullivan
Abe Sussan
Ariana Sutton-Grier
Shelby Switzer
Katherine M. Sydor
BUDGET OF THE U. S. GOVERNMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023 149
T
Jamie R. Taber
Naomi S. Taransky
Masrifa Tasnim
Andrea Taverna
Kelly Taylor
Myra Taylor
Whitney Teal
Jay F. Teitelbaum
Fatima Terry
Emma K. Tessier
Lan Thai
Amanda L. Thomas
Barbara E. Thomas
Jennifer Thomas
Judith F. Thomas
Payton A. Thomas
Will Thomas
Serita K. Thornton
Parth Tikiwala
Thomas Tobasko
Erika Tom
Gia Tonic
Gil M. Tran
Susanna Troxler
Patrick Trulock
Austin Turner
U
Shraddha A.
Upadhyaya
Darrell J. Upshaw
V
Matthew J. Vaeth
Candace Vahlsing
Areletha L. Venson
Alexandra Ventura
Shaun Verch
Carl Vernetti
Jesus Vidaurri
Eileen Vidrine
Merici Vinton
Kalpana Vissa
Andrea Viza
Megha Vyas
W
James A. Wade
Lucinda Wade
Brett Waite
Nicole Waldeck
Joseph Waldow
Rachel Wallace
Heather V. Walsh
Tim Wang
Ben A. Ward
Michelle Ward
Clarence Wardell
Benjamin Warfield
Peter H. Waterman
Gary Waxman
Bess M. Weaver
Jacqueline K. Webb
Daniel Week
William J. Weinig
David M. Weisshaar
Michael Weissman
Lillian Welch
Philip R. Wenger
Max West
Arnette C. White
Ashley M. White
Curtis C. White
Kim S. White
Sherron R. White
Alison Whitty
Amy Widman
Brian A. Widuch
Sabrina Williams
Alex O. Wilson
Kimberly Claire
Wilson
Catherine Winters
Christopher Winters
Minzy Won
Alegra E. Woodard
Gwyneth Woolwine
Nicholas John
Woroszylo
Christopher Wren
Sophia M. Wright
Bertram J. Wyman
Y
Danny Yagan
Melany N. Yeung
David Y. Yi
Samantha Paige Yi
Christian T. Yonkeu
Xia You
Frank (Tom) Young
Rita Young
Shalanda D. Young
Susse Yuan
Janice Yun
Z
Elizabeth Zahorian
Eliana M. Zavala
Erica H. Zielewski
Timothy Ziese
Jeremy Zitomer


F ro as le t yb eh S epu ri tn e edn tn fo D co mu e tn ,s I tn er en t: tskoob ro e P vog.opg. enoh : lot l f ree ( 668 Fa :x ( )202 -215 aM 4012 il: I potS DCC W , ISBN 978-0-16-0ISBN 978-0-16-095232-6
9 780160 952326
90000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE PRESIDENT
OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20503
